CHAPTER I.
And yet it is said,  Labour in thy vocation: which is as much
as to say,  let the magistrates be labouring men; and therefore
should we be magistrates.
King Henry VI
.
In
a minute or two the tumult ceased, and a singular
scene presented itself. The church had four separate groups
or parties left in it, besides the Injins, who crowded the
main isle. The chairman, secretary, two ministers and
lecturer
,
remained perfectly tranquil in their seats, probably
understanding quite well
they
had nothing to fear from the
intruders. Mr. Warren and Mary were in another corner,
under the gallery, he having disdained flight, and prudently
kept his daughter at his side. My uncle and myself were
the
pendants
of the two last named, occupying the opposite
corner, also under the gallery. Mr. Hall, and two or three
friends who stuck by him, were in a pew near the wall, but
about half way down the church, the former erect on a seat,
where he had placed himself to speak.
Proceed with your remarks, sir, coolly observed the
chairman, who was one of those paradoxical anti-renters
who has nothing to do with the Injins, though he knew all
about them, and, as I have been told, was actually foremost
in collecting and disbursing their pay. At this instant
Seneca
Newcome sneaked in at a side door, keeping as far as
possible from the disguised and armed, but curious to
ascertain what would come next.
As for Hall, he behaved with admirable self-possession.
He probably knew that his former auditors were collecting
under the windows, and by raising his voice he would be
easily heard. At all events, he did elevate his voice, and
went on as if nothing had happened.
I was about to say a word, Mr. Chairman, on the natur'
of the two qualities that have, to me, at least, seemed
uppermost
in the lecturer's argoomentyes, this sensible,
well-principled man actually used that detestable sound, just
as I have written it, calling `argument' `argooment'what
a pity it is that so little attention is paid to the very first
principles of speaking the language well in this country, the
common schools probably doing more harm than they do
good in this respectthat have, to me, at least, seemed
uppermost in the lecturer's argooment, and they are both
those that God himself has viewed as of so great importance
to our nature as to give his express commandments about
them. He has commanded us not to steal, and he has
commanded
us not to covet our neighbour's goods; proof
sufficient
that the possession of property is sanctioned by divine
authority, and that it is endowed with a certain sanctity of
privilege. Now for the application.
You can do nothing as to leases in existence, because
the State can't impair a contract. A great deal is said about
this government's being one of the people, and that the
people
ought to do as they please. Now, I 'm a plain man,
and am talking to plain men, and mean to talk plainly.
That this is a government of the people, being a democracy,
or because the sovereign power, in the last resort, resides
in the body of the people, is true; but that this is a
government
of the people, in the common signification, or as too
many of the people themselves understand it, is not true.
This very interest, about which there is so much
commotion
,
or the right to interfere with contracts, is put beyond
the people of the State by a clause in the constitution of the
United States. Now, the constitution of the United States
might be altered, making another provision saying that `no
State shall ever pass any law to do away with the existence
of durable leases,' and every man, woman and child in New
York be opposed to such a change, but they would have to
swallow it. Come, let us see what figures will do. There
are twenty-seven States in actual existence, and soon will
be thirty. I don't care on which number you calculate;
1 *
say thirty, if you please, as that is likely to be the number
before the constitution could be altered. Well, twenty-three
of these States can put a clause into the constitution, saying
you shan't meddle with leases. This might leave the seven
most popular States, with every voter, opposed to the change.
I 've made a calculation, and find what the seven most
populous
States had in 1840, and I find that more than half of
all the population of the country is contained in them seven
States, which can be made to submit to a minority. Nor
is this all; the alteration may be carried by only one vote
in each of the twenty-three States, and, deducting these from
the electors in the seven dissenting States, you might have
a constitutional change made in the country against a
majority
of say two millions! It follows that the people, in
the common meaning, are not as omnipotent as some
suppose
.
There 's something stronger than the people, after
all, and that 's principles, and if we go to work to tear to
pieces our own
It was impossible to hear another word that the speaker
said. The idea that the people are not omnipotent, was one
little likely to find favour among any portion of the
population
that fancies themselves to be peculiarly the people. So
much accustomed to consider themselves invested with the
exercise of a power which, in any case, can be rightfully
exercised by only the whole people, have local assemblages
got to be, that they often run into illegal excesses, fancying
even their little fragment of the body politic infallible, as
well as omnipotent, in such matters at least. To have it
openly denied, therefore, that the popular fabric of American
institutions is so put together, as to leave it in the power of
a decided minority to change the organic law, as is
unquestionably
the fact in theory, however little likely to occur in
practice, sounded in the ears of Mr. Hall's auditors like
political blasphemy. Those under the windows groaned,
while the gang in the aisle whooped and yelled, and that in
a fashion that had all the exaggeration of a caricature. It
was very apparent that there was an end of all the
deliberative
part of the proceedings of the day.
Hall seemed neither surprised nor uneasy. He wiped his
face very coolly, and then took his seat, leaving the Injins
to dance about the church, flourishing their rifles and knives,
in a way that might have frightened one less steady. As
for Mr. Warren, he led Mary out, though there was a
movement
that threatened to stop him. My uncle and myself
followed, the whooping and screaming being really
unpleasant
to the ear. As to the chairman, the secretary, and the
two ministers of the gospel, they kept their stations on the
stage, entirely self-possessed and unmolested. No one went
near them, a forbearance that must have been owing to the
often alleged fact that the real anti-renters, the oppressed
tenantry of New York, and these vile masqueraders, had
nothing to do with each other!
One of the astounding circumstances of the times, is the
general prevalence of falsehood among us, and the almost
total suppression of truth. No matter what amount of
evidence
there may be to contradict a statement, or how often
it has been disproved, it is reaffirmed, with just as much
assurance, as if the matter had never been investigated; ay,
and believed, as if its substance were uncontradicted. I am
persuaded there is no part of the world, in which it is more
difficult to get a truth into the public mind, when there is a
motive to suppress it, than among ourselves. This may
seem singular, when it is remembered how many journals
there are, which are uttered with the avowed purpose to
circulate information. Alas! the machinery which can be
used to give currency to truth, is equally efficient in giving
currency to falsehood. There are so many modes, too, of
diluting truth, in addition to the downright lies which are
told, that I greatly question if one alleged fact, out of twenty
that goes the rounds of the public prints, those of the
commoner
sort excepted, is true in all its essentials. It requires
so much integrity of purpose, so much discrimination, such
a sensitiveness of conscience, and often so large a degree of
self-sacrifice in men to speak nothing but truth, that one is
not to expect that their more vulgar and irresponsible agents
are to possess a quality that is so very rare among the very
best of the principals.
If I was glad to get out of the church myself, the reader
may depend on it, I was rejoiced when I saw Mr. Warren
leading Mary towards the place where I had left his wagon,
as if about to quit a scene that now promised nothing but
clamour and wrangling, if not something more serious.
Uncle Ro desired me to bring out the wagon in which we
had left the farm; and, in the midst of a species of general
panic, in which the women, in particular, went flying about
in all directions, I proceeded to comply. It was at this
moment that a general pause to all movements was
produced
by the gang of Injins pouring out of the church,
bringing in their centre the late speaker, Mr. Hall. As the
chairman, secretary, lecturer, and the two ministers of the
gospel, followed, it was conclusive as to the termination of
anything like further discussion.
My uncle called me back, and I thought was disposed to
assist Hall, who, manfully supported by the two or three
friends that had stood by him the whole day, was now
moving towards us, surrounded by a cluster of wrangling
and menacing Injins; the whole party bearing no little
resemblance to a pack of village curs that sets upon the
strange dog that has ventured in among them.
Oaths and threats filled the air; and poor Hall's ears
were offended by an imputation that, I dare say, they then
heard for the first time. He was called a dd
aristocrat
.
and a hireling in the pay of dd aristocrats. To
all this, however, the sturdy and right-thinking blacksmith
was very indifferent; well knowing there was not a fact
connected with his existence, or a sentiment of his moral
being, that would justify any such charge. It was in
answer
to this deadly imputation, that I first heard him speak
again, after he had been interrupted in the church.
Call me what you please, he cried, in his clear, full
voice; I don't mind hard names. There isn't a man
among you who thinks I 'm an aristocrat, or the hireling of
any one; but I hope I am not yet so great a knave as to
wish to rob a neighbour because he happens to be richer
than I am myself.
Who gave Hugh Littlepage his land? demanded one,
in the midst of the gang, speaking without the affectation
of mimicry, though the covering to his head sufficiently
changed his voice. You know, yourself, it came from
the king.
He never worked for an acre of it! bawled another.
If he was a hard-working, honest man, like yourself, Tim
Hall, we might bear it; but you know he is not. He 's a
spendthrift and an aristocrat.
I know that hard hands don't make a man honest, any
more than soft hands make him a rogue, answered Tim
Hall, with spirit. As for the Littlepages, they are
gentlemen
in every sense of the word, and always have been.
Their word will pass even now, when the bond of many a
man who sets himself up ag'in them wouldn't be looked at.
I was grateful and touched with this proof that a
character
,
which I fully believed to be merited, was not lost on
one of the most intelligent men of his class, in that part of
the country. Envy, and covetousness, and malignancy,
may lie as they will, but the upright recognize the upright;
the truly poor know who most assuage their sorrows and
relieve their wants; and the real lover of liberty
understands
that its privileges are not to be interpreted altogether
in his own favour. I did not like the idea of such a man's
being ill-treated by a gang of disguised blackguards
fellows
,
who added to the crime of violating a positive law,
the high moral offence of prostituting the sacred principles
of liberty, by professing to drag them into the service of a
cause, which wanted very little, in its range, to include all
the pickpockets and thieves in the land.
They will do that noble fellow some injury, I fear, I
whispered to my uncle.
If it were not for the mortification of admitting our
disguise
,
I would go forward at once, and attempt to bring him
out of the crowd, was the answer. But that will not do,
under the circumstances. Let us be patient, and observe
what is to follow.
Tar and feathers! shouted some one among the Injins;
Tar and feather him! Crop him, and send him home!
answered others. Tim Hall has gone over to the enemy,
added the Injin who asked whence I had my lands.
I fancied I knew that voice, and when its tones had been
repeated two or three times, it struck me it was that of
Seneca Newcome. That Seneca was an anti-renter, was
no secret; but that he, a lawyer, would be guilty of the great
indiscretion of committing felony, was a matter about which
one might well entertain a doubt. To urge others to be
guilty, was a different matter, but to commit himself seemed
unlikely. With a view to keep an eye on the figure I
distrusted
,
I looked out for some mode by which he might be
known. A patch, or rather goar in the calico, answered
admirably, for on looking at others, I saw that this goar
was accidental, and peculiar to that particular dress, most
probably owing to a deficiency in the material originally
supplied.
All this time, which indeed was but a minute or two, the
tumult continued. The Injins seemed undetermined what
to do; equally afraid to carry out their menaces against
Hall, and unwilling to let him go. At the very instant
when we were looking for something serious, the storm
abated, and an unexpected calm settled on the scene. How
this was effected, I never knew; though it is reasonable to
suppose an order had been communicated to the Injins, by
some signal that was known only to themselves. Of the
result there was no doubt; the crowd around Hall opened,
and that sturdy and uncompromising freeman came out of
it, wiping his face, looking heated and a little angry. He
did not yield, however, remaining near the spot, still
supported
by the two or three friends who had accompanied him
from Mooseridge.
My uncle Ro, on reflection, conceived it wisest not to seem
in a hurry to quit the village, and as soon as I had
ascertained
that Mr. Warren had come to a similar decision, and
had actually taken refuge in the house of a parishioner, I
`was agreeable,' as the English say. While the pedlar,
therefore, made a new display of his watches, I strolled
round among the crowd, Injins and others intermixed, to see
what could be seen, and to glean intelligence. In the course
of my wanderings, chance brought me close to the side of
the masquer in the dress with the goar. Tickling him
gently
on the elbow, I induced him to step a little aside with me,
where our conversation would not be overheard.
Why might you be Injingentleman as you be? I
asked, with as much of an air of simplicity, as I could
assume.
The start with which this question was met, convinced
me I was right; and I scarce needed farther confirmation
of the justice of my suspicion. If I had, however, it was
afforded.
Why ask Injin dat? returned the man with the
goar.
Vell, dat might do, and it might not do, 'Squire
Newcome
;
but it might not do wid one as knows you as vell as
I know you. So dell me; vy might you be Injin?
Harkee, said Seneca, in his natural speech, and
evidently
much disturbed by my discovery; you must, on no
account, let it be known who I am. You see, this Injin
business
is ticklish work, and the law mightthat is
you
could
get nothing by mentioning what you know, but as you have
said, as I'm a gentleman, and an attorney at law, it wouldn't
sound well to have it said that I was caught dressed up in
this manner, playing Injin.
Ja  ja  I oonderstants  gentlemans might not do
sich dings, und not be laughed atdat's all.
Ye-e-e-sthat's all, as you say, so be careful what you
say, or hint about it. Well, since you've found me out, it's
my treat. What shall 't be?
This was not very elegant for a `gentleman,' and `an
attorney
at law,' certainly, but, as it belonged to the school of
Mr. Newcome, it struck me it might not be prudent for me
to betray that I belonged to one of a different sort.
Affecting
contentment, therefore, I told him what he pleased, and
he led me to a store of all business, that was kept by his
brother, and in which, as I afterwards found, he himself
was a partner. Here he generously treated me to a glass
of fiery whiskey, which I managed to spill in a way that
prevented my being choked. This was adroitly enough
effected, as a refusal to drink would have been taken as a
most suspicious circumstance in a German. As respects
Americans of my assumed class, I am happy to say it is now
more possible for one to refuse a glass than to accept it. It
says a good deal in favour of the population of a country,
when even the coachman declines his whet. Nevertheless,
a nation may become perfectly sober, and fall away with
fearful rapidity on other great essentials. On the subject of
sobriety, I agree altogether with my uncle, in thinking that
the Americans drink much less than most, if not less than any
European nation; the common notion that long prevailed to
the contrary in the country, being no more than the fruits
of the general disposition, in other people, to decry
democracy
,
aided somewhat, perhaps, by the exaggerations that
are so common in all the published statistics of morals.
I remarked that very few even of the Injins drank, though
they now began to circulate freely among the crowd and in
the stores. Seneca left me as soon as he fancied he had
clenched my discretion with a treat, and I stood looking
round at the manner in which the armed and disguised
conducted themselves. One fellow, in particular, attracted
my attention; and his deportment may be taken as a
specimen
of that of many of his comrades.
I was soon struck by the fact that Orson Newcome,
Seneca's
brother and partner, was obviously desirous of
having
as little to do with any of the Injins as possible. As
soon as one entered his store, he appeared uneasy; and
whenever one left it, he seemed glad. At first, I was
inclined
to think that Orson,what names will not the great
eastern family adopt, before they have got through with their
catalogue!  really, they seem to select their appellations
as they do so many other things, or to prove that they 'll
do as they please;but, Orson, I fancied at first, was
influenced
by principle, and did not care to conceal the disgust
he felt at such audacious and illegal proceedings. But I
soon discovered my mistake, by ascertaining the true cause
of his distaste for the presence of an Injin.
Injin want calico, for shirtsaid one of these worthies
significantly, to Orson, who, at first, affected not to hear
him.
The demand was repeated, however, with additional
significance
,
when the cloth was reluctantly thrown on the
counter.
Good, said the Injin, after examining the quality;
cut Injin twenty yard
good
measure, hear!
The calico was cut, with a sort of desperate submission;
the twenty yards were folded, enveloped, and handed to the
customer, who coolly put the bundle under his arm, saying,
as he turned to leave the storeCharge it to Down Rent.
The mystery of Orson's sullenness was now explained.
As invariably follows the abandonment of principle, the
fomenters of wrong were suffering smartly through the
encroachments
of their own agents. I ascertained, afterwards,
that these very Injins, who had been embodied in hundreds,
with a view to look down law, and right, and the sacred
character of contracts, had begun to carry out their main
principle; and were making all sorts of demands, on the
pockets and property of their very employers, under one
pretence or another, but with very obvious tendencies
to-wards
their own benefit. The Spirit of anti-Rentism was
beginning to develope itself in this form, under the system
of violence; as, under that of legislative usurpation, and
legislative truckling to numbers, which is most to be feared
from the character of our representatives, it will as
certainly
be developed, unless suppressed in the bud, by such
further demands on its complaisant ministers, as will either
compel them to repent of their first false step, will drive the
State to civil war, or will drive all the honest men out of it.
I did not remain long in the store. After quitting it, I
went in quest of Mr. Warren and Mary, anxious to know
if I could be of any service to them. The father thanked
me for this attention, and let me know that he was now
about to quit the village, as he saw others beginning to go
away, among whom were Hall, who was an old and much
valued acquaintance of his, and whom he had invited to stop
at the rectory to dine. He advised us to imitate the
example
,
as there were strangers among the Injins, who might
be addicted to drinking.
On this information I hunted up my uncle, who had
actually
sold most of his trinkets, and all his watches but one,
the secret of his great success being the smallness of his
prices. He sold for what he had bought, and in some
instances
for even less, quitting the place with the reputation
of being the
most reasonable
jewel-pedlar who had ever
appeared in it.
The road was beginning to be lined with vehicles
carrying
home the people who had collected to hear the lecture.
As this was the first occasion which offered for witnessing
such an exhibition, since my return, I examined the
different
parties we passed, with a view to comparison. There
is a certain air of rusticity, even in the large towns of
America
,
which one does not meet with in the capitals of the old
world. But the American country is less rustic than any
part of the world with which I am acquainted, England
alone excepted. Of course, in making such a remark, no
Vol. II.2
allusion is intended to the immediate environs of very large
towns; though I am far from certain that the population of
St. Ouen, the Runnymede of France, and which stands
within a league of the walls of Paris, would not have offered
a more decidedly rustic spectacle, than that which we then
saw. As respects females, this was very strikingly true;
scarce one being visible who had that air of coarseness, and
ignorance, and vulgarity, which denotes a degraded
condition
and a life of hardships. There was little apparent that
marked a peasantry in the moral sense of the word; but the
whole population seemed to be at their ease, using neat and
well-kept vehicles; solid, active horses; and being
themselves
reasonably well, though not very tastefully clad.
Yet, all this was on a leased estate, under the dire
oppression
of a landlord, and beneath the shadow of aristocracy!
A short dialogue which took place between my uncle and
two sturdy weather-beaten husbandmen, who drove their
horses
a short distance, on a walk at the side of ours,
made the impression produced by such facts deeper than it
might otherwise have been. I will relate it.
You are Jarmans, I b'lieve, commenced the oldest of
the two men, a grey-headed tenant of my own, of the name
of Holmes, who was well known to us both  Jarmans,
from the old countries, I hear?
Ja  we bees from der olt coontries; und dat is a great
vay off.
Ye-e-s, I s'pose it isI 've heern tell of them countries,
often. Doos the landlord system exist there?
Ja  dere ist landtlorts all ofer dis worlt, I do dinks;
und denants, deo.
Well, and how is the plan liked there; or be folks
thinking
of getting red (rid) on't?
Nein  how might dey gets red of it? It ist der law,
you might see, und vhat ist der law moost be done.
This answer puzzled old Holmes a good deal. He passed
a hand over his face, and turned to his companion, one
Tubbs, also a tenant on my estate, as if to ask assistance.
Tubbs was one of the new school; a school that makes
more laws than it respects, and belongs to the movement.
He is a man that fancies the world never knew anything
of principles, facts, or tendencies, until the commencement
of this century.
What sort of a government had you, in your own
country
?
demanded Tubbs.
Bretty goot. Mein coontry was Preussen; und dat might
be t'ought a bretty goot gofernment.
Yes, but it 's a kingly government, I take it;it seems
to me, I have heern tell of kings in that land.
Ja, jadere ist ein koenigone king. De last might
be der goet koenig Vilhelm, und now dere ist his son, who
ist a goot koenig, too, as I might dink. Ja, jadere ist a
king.
That explains it all, cried Tubbs, with a sort of
triumph
.
You see, they have a king, and so they have
tenants; but, here we have no king, and we have no need
of landlords. Every man, in a free country, should be his
own landlord; that 's my doctrine, and to that I 'll stick.
There is some reason in that, fri'nd; isn't that your
idee? asked Holmes.
Vell, I might not oonderstandt. Dost der shentlemans
object to landlordts, in his coontry, because dere might be
landlordts in dem coontries ast might haf kings?
That 's it! That 's just the reason on't, and the true
principle! answered Tubbs. Kings and liberty can't go
together, and landlords and liberty can't go together.
But, might not der law in dis coontry be to haf
landlordts
,
too? I hear dat it ist so.
Yes, that is the law, as it stands; but we mean to alter
it, all. We have got so many votes, now, as to be sure
to have both parties with us, at a gin'ral election; and give
us the governor on our side, with the sartainty of votes
enough to turn an election, and we 're pretty confident of
success
.
Votes is all that is wanting, in a truly free country,
for men to have things pretty much in their own way.
Und dost you mean to haf not'in dat might be in de
coontries ast haf kings?
To be sure not. What do we want of any of your
lordly contrivances, to make the rich richer, and the poor
poorer.
Vell, you moost alter de law of nature, if de rich vilt
not get riches, und de poor vill not feel dey be poor. De
piple dells us dat de misery of de poor ist deir poverty.
Ay, ay, bible talk don't go for much in politics. Sabba'
days are set aside for the bible, and week days for public
and private matters. Now, here is Hugh Littlepage, of the
same flesh and blood as my neighbour Holmes and myself
beno better and no worse; yes, I 'm willing to allow he 's
no worse, in the main, though in some things I do think we
might claim the preference; but I 'll allow he 's no worse,
for the sake of argooment. Each on us rents a farm of this
Littlepage, of a hundred acres good. Wa-al, this land
we till, and crop, and labour, with our hands, and the hands
of our sons, and hired help, perhaps; and yet we have to
pay fifty dollars a-piece, annually, to that youngster Hugh
Littlepage, for rent; which money he takes and squanders
where he pleases, in riotous livin', for 't we know. Now,
is that right, I ask; and isn't it an onsuitable state of things
for a republican country?
Und you dinks yoong Littlebage might spend his money
in riotous lifin' in foreign landts?
Sartainthat 's the tale, hereabouts; and I have seen a
man who knows another, that has an acquaintance who has
been in Paris, and who tells the people of his neighbourhood
that he stood at the door of the king's palace one day, and
actually saw both the Littlepages going in to pay `tribute
unto Csar,' as it is calledI suppose you know; and they
tell me that all that goes to see a king, has to kneel and kiss
his handsome say his toe. Do you happen to know how
it is in the old countries?
It ist not so; I haf seen more kings as half a dozen,
und dey dost not kneel down and kiss deir hants, except on
sartain business. Dey might not allvays hear what ist true,
in dis coontry.
Wa-a-l, I don't know  I never was there to see,
answered
Tubbs, in that peculiar manner, which, whenever it
is used by an American, may safely be interpreted to mean,
I 'll not contradict you, but I 'll believe what I please.
That is what I 've heern say. But, why should we pay
rent to young Littlepage to spend in riotous living?
I might not know, oonless you haf hiret his landt, und
agree't to pay him rent; in which case you might do as you
agree't.
But when the bargain's of a kingly natur', I say no.
Every country has its natur', and every government has its
natur', and all things should be in conformity with natur'.
Now its ag'in natur' to pay rent in a republican country. We
want nothing here, that's in common with lords and kings.
Vell, den, you most alter your whole country. You
might not haf wifes und children; you might not lif in
houses, and plough de landt; you might not eat und drink,
und you might not wear any shirt.
Tubbs looked a little astonished. Like the
Bourgeois
Gentilhomme
, he was amazed to find he had been talking
prose all his life without knowing it. There is no question
that laws unsuitable to the institutions of a republic might
exist in a kingdom, but it is equally certain that the law
which compels the tenant to pay for the use of his house, or
farm, is not one of the number. Tubbs, however, had been
so thoroughly persuaded, by dint of talking, there was
something
exceedingly anti-republican in one man's paying rent
to another, that he was not disposed to give the matter up
so easily.
Ay, ay, he answered, we have many things in
common
with kingdoms, as
men
, I must allow; but why should
we have anything in common of this aristocratic natur'?
A free country should contain freemen, and how
can
a man
be free if he doesn't own the land out of which he makes his
living?
Und if he makes his lifin' out of anoder man's land, he
might be honest enough to pay for its use, I dinks.
But, we hold it
ought
not to be another man's land, but
the land of him who works it.
Dell me disdost you efer let out a field to a poor
neighbour on shares?
Sartain; we all do that, both to accommodate folks, and
to get crops when we are crowded with work ourselves.
Und why might not all dat crop pelong to him dat works
de field?
Oh! that's doin' business on a small scale, and can't do
anybody harm. But the American institutions never
intended
2 *
that there should be a great privileged class among
us, like the lords in Europe.
Did you efer haf any difficulty in getting your hire for
a field dat might be so let out?
Sartain. There's miserable neighbours as well as them
that isn't. I had to sue the very last chap I had such
dealin's
with.
Und dit das law let you haf your money?
To be sure it did! What would law be good for, if it
didn't help a body to his rights?
Und dost den tenants of dis broperty let Hugh Littlebage
haf his rents, ast might be due?
That's a different thing, I tell you. Hugh Littlepage
has more than he wants, and spends his money in riotous
livin' in foreign parts.
Vell, und sooppose your neighpours might vants to ask
you what you do wit' your tollars after you shall sell your
pork and beef, to see you mate goot use of itmight dat be
liperty?
That! Why, who do you think would trouble himself
about my 'arnin's. It's the big fish, only, that folks talk
about, and care about, in such matters.
Den folks make Hugh Littlebage a big fish, by dair own
mettlin', und enfy, und cofetousnessis it not so?
Harkee, fri'nd, I some think you're leanin' yourself to
kingly ways, and to the idees in which you was brought up.
Take my advice, and abandon all these notions as soon as
you can, for they'll never be popular in this part of the
world.
Popular! How broad has the signification of this word
got to be! In the eyes of two-thirds of the population it
already means, `what is right.'
Vox populi, vox dei
. To
what an extent is this little word made to entwine itself
around all the interests of life! When it is deemed
expedient
to inculcate certain notions in the minds of the people,
the first argument used is to endeavour to persuade the
inhabitants
of New York that the inhabitants of Pennsylvania
are already of that mind. A simulated public opinion is the
strongest argument used, indeed, on every occasion of the
public discussion of any disputed point. He that can count
the most voices is a better man than he who can give the
most reasons; numbers carrying more weight with them,
than facts, or law. It is evident, that, while in some things,
such a system may work well, there are others, and those
of overshadowing importance, in which its tendency is direct
and fearful towards corruption.
As soon as Tubbs had given his admonition, he applied
the whip to his horse, and trotted on, leaving us to follow at
the best gait we could extort from Tom Miller's hack.
CHAPTER II.
If he were with me, King of Tuscarora,
Gazing as I upon thy portrait now,
In all its medalled, fringed, and bearded glory,
Its eyes' dark beauty, and its thoughtful brow
Its brow, half-martial and half-diplomatic;
Its eye, upsoaring, like an eagle's wings;
Well might he boast that we, the democratic,
Outrival Europeeven in our kings.
Red Jacket
.
My
uncle Ro said nothing, when the two tenants left us;
though I saw, by his countenance, that he felt all the
absurdity
of the stuff we had just been listening to. We had
got within half a mile of the woods, when eight Injins came
galloping up to a wagon that was directly behind us, and
which contained another of my tenants, with his eldest son,
a lad of sixteen, whom he had brought with him as a
scholar
,
in having his sense of right unsettled by the selfish
mystification that was going on in the land; a species of
fatherly care that was of very questionable merit. I said
there were eight of these Injins, but there were only four
horses, each beast carrying double. No sooner did the
leaders of the party reach the wagon I have mentioned,
than it was stopped, and its owner was commanded to alight.
The man was a decided down-renter, but he obeyed the
order with a very ill grace; and did not obey at all, indeed,
until he was helped out of the wagon, by a little gentle
violence of this fragment of his own
corps d'arme
. The
boy was soon put into the highway, when two of the
disguised
and armed leaped into the vacant places, and drove
on, passing us at a furious pace, making a parting nod to
the owner of the vehicle, and consoling him for its
temporary
loss, by calling out, Injin want him  Injin good
fellowyou know.
Whether the discomfited farmer
knew
or not, we could
not tell; but he
looked
as if he wished the Injins anywhere
but in their happy hunting grounds. We drove on
laughing, for it was in human nature to be amused at such
an exhibition of the compulsory system, or of liberty and
equality carried out; and more particularly so, when I
was certain that the honest, hard-working, horny-hand
tiller of the soil, wanted to cheat me out of a farm; or, to
put his case in the most favourable point of view, wanted
to compel me to sell him one at his own price. Nor did our
amusement stop here. Before we reached the woods, we
found Holmes and Tubbs in the highway, too; the other
two worthies who had been mounted
en croupe
having
dispossessed
them of their wagon also, and told them to
charge it to Injin. We afterwards learned that this
practice was very general; the owner recovering his horse
and team, in the course of a few days, by hearing it had
been left, secretly, at some tavern within a few miles of his
residence. As for old Holmes, he was in an honest
indignation
when we came up with him, while even Tubbs
looked soured and discontented, or as if he thought friends
were entitled to better treatment.
Vhat ist der matter? cried out uncle Ro, who could
hardly keep from laughing the whole time; vhat ist der
matter now? Vhere might be your hantsome vaggin and
your gay horse?
It 's too bad!  yes, it 's eeny most too bad! grunted
Holmes. Here am I, past three-score-and-ten, which is
the full time of man, the bible says  and what the bible
says
must
be true, you know!here have they trundled me
into the highway, as they would a sack of potatoes, and
left me to walk every step of four miles to reach my own
door! It 's too bad  it 's eeny most too bad!
Oh! dat might be a trifle, compared to vhat it vould
be to haf peen drundelled out of your farm.
I know 't!I know 't!I understand!it's all meant
for the good cause  to put down aristocracy, and make
men raa'ly equal, as the law intends them to be  but this,
I say, is eeny most too bad!
Und you so olt!
Seventy-six, if I 'm a day. My time can't be long, and
my legs is weak, they be. Yes, the bible says a man's
time is limited pretty much to three-score-and-tenand I 'll
never stand out ag'in the bible.
Und vhat might der piple say apout vanting to haf
your neighpours' goots?
It cries that down dreadfully! Yes, there 's plenty of
that in the good book, I know from havin' heard it read
ay, and havin' read it myself, these three-score years; it
doos
cry it down, the most awfully. I shall tell the Injins
this, the next time they want my wagon. There's bible
ag'in all sich practices.
Der piple ist a goot pook.
That it isthat it isand great is the consolation and
hope that I have known drawn from its pages. I'm glad to
find that they set store by the bible in Jarmany. I was
pretty much of the notion, we had most of the religion that's
goin', in Ameriky, and it's pleasant to find there
is
some
in Jarmany.
All this time old Holmes was puffing along on foot, my
uncle Ro walking his horse, in order to enjoy his discourse.
Oh! jaja, jadere might be
some
religion left in der
olt worltde puritans, as you might call dem, did not pring
it all away.
Desp'rate good people them! We got all our best
sarcumstances
from our puritan forefathers. Some folks say
that all Ameriky has got, is owing to them very saints!
Jaund if it bees not so, nefer mind; for dey will be
sartain to get all Ameriky.
Holmes was mystified, but he kept tugging on, casting
wistful glances at our wagon, as he endeavoured to keep
up with it. Fearful we might trot on and leave him, the
old man continued the discourse. Yes, he said, our
authority for everything must come from the bible, a'ter all.
It tells us we hadn't ought to bear malice, and that's a rule
I endivour to act up to; for an old man, you see, can't
indulge his sinful natur' if he would. Now, I've been down
to Little Neest to attend a Down Rent Meetin',but I bear
no more malice ag'in Hugh Littlepage, not I, no more than
if he wern't a bit of my landlord! All I want of him is my
farm, on such a lay as I can live by, and the b'ys a'ter me.
I look on it as dreadful hard and oppressive that the
Littlepages
should refuse to let us have the place, seein' that I
have worked it now for the tarm of three whull lives.
Und dey agreet dat dey might sell you de farm, when
dem dree lifes wast up?
No, not in downright language they didn't, as I must
allow. In the way of bargain, I must own the advantage
is altogether on the side of Littlepage. That was his
grand'ther's act; and if you wun't drive quite so fast, as I'm
getting a little out of wind, I'll tell you all about it. That
is just what we complain on; the bargain being so much in
his favour. Now, my lives
have
hung on desp'rately,
haven't they, Shabbakuk? appealing to Tubbs. It's
every hour of forty-five years sin' I tuck that lease, and one
life, that of my old woman, is still in bein', as they call it,
though it's a sort of bein' that a body might as well not
have as have. She can't stand it a great while longer, and
then that farm that I set so much store by, out of which I've
made my livelihood most of my life, and on which I've
brought up fourteen children, will go out of my hands to
enrich Hugh Littlepage, who's got so much now he can't
spend it at hum like honest folks, but must go abroad, to
waste it in riotous living, as they tell us. Yes, onless the
governor and the legislature helps me out of my difficulty, I
don't see but Hugh Littlepage must get it all, making the
`rich richer, and the poor poorer.'
Und vhy must dis cruel ding come to pass? Vhy
might not mans keep his own in Ameriky?
That's jest it, you see. It isn't my own, in law, only
by natur', like, and the `speret of the Institutions,' as they
call it. I'm sure I don't kear much how I get it, so it only
comes. If the governor can only make the landlords sell,
or even give away, he may sartainly count on my support,
providin' they don't put the prices too high. I hate high
prices, which is onsuitable to a free country.
Fery drue. I sooppose your lease might gif you
dat farm quite reasonaple, as it might be mate so long
ago?
Only two shillings the acre, answered the old fellow,
with a knowing look, which as much as boasted of the
capital bargain he had in the affair, or twenty-five dollars
a year for a hundred acres. That's no great matter, I'm
ready to allow; but my lives havin' held on so desp'rately,
until land's got up to forty dollars an acre about here, I
can't no more expect sich another lay than I can expect to
go to Congress. I can rent that place, to-morrow mornin',
for $150 of as good money as any man can pay.
Und how much might you expect 'squire Littlebage
woult ask on a new lease?
Some think as much as $62.50; though other some
think he would let it go to
me
for $50, for three lives longer.
The old gin'ral told me when he signed the lease that I was
gettin' a bargain, `but, niver mind,' said he, `if I give you
good tarms, `you'll make the better tenant, and I look to
posterity and their benefit as much as I do to my own. If
I don't get the advantage I might,' says he, `my children,
or my children's children, will. A man mustn't altogether
live for himself in this world, especially if he has children.'
Them was good idees, wasn't they?
You might not dink differently. Und, how moch woult
you love to bay for a deet of de farm?
Wa-a-l, there 's differences of opinion on that subject.
The most approved notion is, that Hugh Littlepage ought to
be made to give warrantees, with full covenants, as it 's
called
;
and covenants is all in all, in a deed, you know
But might not be in a lease? put in uncle Ro,
somewhat
drily.
That depindsBut, some say them deeds ought to be
given, if the tenants allow the landlords the worth of the
land, when the patentee got it, and interest down to the
present
day. It does seem a desp'rate price to pay for land, to
give principal and interest, and to throw in all that has been
paid beside?
Haf you made a calculation, to see vhat it might come
to?
Shabbakuk hastell the gentleman, Shabbakuk, how
much you made it come to, the acre.
Shabbakuk was a far deeper rogue than his neighbour
Holmes. The last was merely a man of selfish and narrow
views, who, from passing a long life with no other object
before him than that of scraping together property, had got
his mind completely ensnared in the meshes of this world's
net; whereas, his companion took the
initiative
, as the
French have it, in knavery, and not only carried out, but
invented the schemes of the wicked. He clearly did not
like this appeal to his arithmetic, but having no suspicion to
whom he was talking, and fancying every man in the lower
conditions of life must be an ally in a plan to make the rich,
poorer; and the poor, richer; he was a little more
communicative
than might otherwise have been the case. After
reflecting a moment, he gave us his answer, reading from a
paper in his hand, on which the whole sum had been
elaborately
worked for the occasion of the late meeting.
The land was worth ten cents an acre, maybe, when
the first Littlepage got it, and that is a liberal price. Now,
that was eighty years since, for we don't count old Herman
Mordaunt's time, as anything; seeing that the land was
worth next to nothin', in his time. The interest on ten cents
at 7 per cent. is 7 mills a year, or 560 mills for 80 years.
This is without compound; compound being unlawful, and
nothin' ag'in law should be taken into the account. Add
the 10 cents to the 560 mills, and you get 660 mills, or
66 cents. Now this sum, or a sum calculated on the same
principles, all the tenants are willing to pay for their farms,
[1]
[1]
In order that the reader may understand Mr. Hugh Littlepage is
not inventing, I will add that propositions still more extravagant than
these have been openly circulated among the anti-renters, up and down
the country.
Editor
.
and if justice prevails they will get them.
Dat seems but little to bay for landt dat might now rent
for a dollar an acre, each year.
You forgit that the Littlepages have had the rent these
eighty years, the whull time.
Und de denants haf hat de farms dese eighty years, de
whole time, too.
Oh! we put the land ag'in the work. If my neighbour
Holmes, here, has had his farm forty-five years, so the farm
has had his work forty-five years, as an off-set. You may
depind on 't the governor and the legislature understand all
that.
If dey does, answered Uncle Ro, whipping his horse
into a trot, dey must be fit for deir high stations. It is
goot for a country to haf great governors, and great
legisladurs
.
Guten Tag
.
Away he went, leaving neighbour Holmes, Shabbakuk
Tubbs, the governor and legislature, with their joint morals,
wisdom, logic and philosophy, in the highway, together.
My uncle Ro shook his head, and then he laughed, as the
absurdity of what had just passed forced itself on his
imagination
.
I dare say many may be found, who have openly
professed
principles and opinions identical, in substance, with
what has just been related here, who will be disposed to
deny them, when they are thrown into their faces. There
is nothing unusual in men's refusing to recognise their own
children, when they are ashamed of the circumstances that
brought them into being. But, in the course of this
controversy
,
I have often heard arguments in discourse, and have
often read them in the journals, as they have been put into
the mouths of men in authority, and that too in their public
communications, which, stripped of their very thin coverings,
are pretty much on the level with those of Holmes and Tubbs.
I am aware that no governor has,
as yet
, alluded to the
hard-ships
of the tenants, under the limited leases, but it would
be idle to deny that the door has been opened to principles,
or, a want of principles, that must sweep away all such
property in the current of reckless popular clamour, unless
the evil be soon arrested. I say
evil
, for it must prove a
curse to any community to break down the securities of
property, as it is held in what has hitherto been thought its
most secure form, and, what is still of more importance in a
moral point of view, all to appease the cravings of cupidity,
as they are exhibited in the masses.
We were soon out of sight of Holmes and Tubbs, and in
Vol. II.  3
the woods. I confess that I expected, each instant, to
overtake
Hall in the hands of the Injins; for the movement
among that class of persons had appeared to me as one
directed
particularly against him. We saw nothing of the
sort, however, and had nearly reached the northern limits
of the bit of forest, when we came in sight of the two
wagons which had been so cavalierly taken possession of,
and of the two horses ridden by the mounted men. The
whole were drawn up on one side of the highway, under the
charge of a single Injin, in a manner to announce that we
were approaching a point of some interest.
My uncle and myself fully expected to be again stopped,
as we drove up to the place just mentioned; not only was
the track of the road left clear, however, but we were
suffered
to pass without a question. All the horses had been
in a lather, as if driven very hard; though, otherwise, there
was nothing to indicate trouble, if we except the presence
of the solitary sentinel. From this fellow, neither sign, nor
order molested us; but on we went, at Tom Miller's horse's
favourite amble, until we were so near the verge of the
wood, as to get a view into the open fields beyond. Here,
indeed, we obtained a sight of certain movements that, I
confess, gave me some little concern.
Among the bushes that lined the highway, and which
have been already mentioned, I got a glimpse of several of
the disguised and armed, who were evidently lying in
ambush. Their number might have been twenty in all;
and, it was now sufficiently apparent, that those who had
pressed the wagons had been hurrying forward to re-enforce
their party. At this point, I felt quite certain we should
be stopped; but we were not. We were suffered to pass
without question, as we had just passed the wagons and
horses, though it must have been known to the party that
we were fully aware of their presence at that particular
spot. But, on we went, and were soon, unmolested, in the
open country.
It was not long, however, before the mystery was
explained
.
A road descended from the higher ground, which
lay to the westward of us, a little on our left, and a party
of men was coming down it, at a quick walk, which, at
the first glance, I mistook for a detachment of the Injins;
but which, at a second look, I ascertained to be composed
of Indians, or real red men. The difference between the
two is very great, as every American will at once admit,
though many who read this manuscript will be obliged to
me for an explanation. There is Indian and Injin.
The Injin is a white man, who, bent on an unworthy and
illegal purpose, is obliged to hide his face, and to perform
his task in disguise. The Indian is a red man, who is
neither
afraid, nor ashamed, to show his countenance, equally
to friend or enemy. The first is the agent of designing
demagogues, the hireling of a discontented and grasping
spirit, who mocks at truth and right by calling himself one
who labours to carry out the spirit of those Institutions
which he dishonours and is afraid to trust; while the other
serves himself only, and is afraid of nothing. One is
skulking
from, and shirking the duties of civilization, while the
other, though a savage, is, at least, true to his own
professions
.
There they were, sure enough, a party of some sixteen
or eighteen of the real aborigines. It is not an uncommon
thing to meet with an Indian, or two, strolling about the
country selling baskets  formerly it was brooms of birch,
but the march of improvement has nearly banished so rude
a manufacture from the countrywith a squaw, or two, in
company; but it is now very unusual to meet a true Indian
warrior in the heart of the State, carrying his rifle and
tomahawk, as was the case with all those who were so
swiftly descending the road. My uncle Ro was quite as
much astonished as I was myself; and he pulled up at the
junction of the two highways, in order to await the arrival
of the strangers.
These are real Redskins, Hughand of a noble tribe,
cried my uncle, as a still nearer approach gave him a better
and better view. Warriors of the West, out of all question,
with one white man in attendancewhat can such a party
possibly want at Ravensnest!
Perhaps the anti-renters intend to enlarge their plans,
and have a scheme to come out upon us, with an alliance
formed with the true sons of the forestmay they not intend
intimidation?
Whom could they thus intimidate, but their own wives
and children? But, here they come, in a noble body, and
we can speak to them.
There they did come, indeed; seventeen of the finer
specimens
of the Redskins, as they are now sometimes seen
passing
among us in bodies, moving to or from their distant
prairies; for the white man has already forced the Indian,
with the bears, and the elk, and the moose, out of the forests
of America, upon those vast plains.
What is to be the end of the increase of this nation, is one
of the mysteries of Divine Providence. If faithful to the
right, if
just
, not in the sense of yielding to the clamours of
the many, but in the sense of good laws, if true to
themselves
,
the people of this republic may laugh at European
interference and European power, when brought to bear on
their home interests, as so much of the lumbering policy of
ages no longer suited to the facts and feelings of our own
times, and push on to the fulfilment of a destiny, which, if
carried out on the apparent designs of the ruler of the earth,
will leave that of all other States which have preceded us,
as much in the shade, as the mountain leaves the valley. But,
it must not be forgotten that the brightest dawns often usher
in the darkest days; that the most brilliant youths frequently
precede manhoods of disappointment and baffled wishes;
that even the professed man of God can fall away from his
vows and his faith, and finish a career that was commenced
in virtue and hope, in profligacy and sin. Nations are no
more safe from the influence of temptation than individuals,
and this has a weakness peculiarly its own. Instead of
falling
back on its popular principle, in extremities, as its
infallible
safeguard, it is precisely in the irresponsible and
grasping
character of that principle that its danger is to be
apprehended
.
That principle, which, kept within the limits of
right, is so admirably adapted to restraining the ordinary
workings of cupidity and selfishness, as they are familiarly
seen in narrow governments, when permitted to overrun the
boundaries placed for its control, becomes a torrent that has
broken out of its icy bed, in the Spring, and completely
defaces
all that is beneficial or lovely, in either nature or art,
that may happen to lie in its course. As yet, the
experience
of two centuries has offered nothing so menacing to
the future prosperity of this country, as the social
fermentation
which is at this moment at work, in the State of New
York. On the result of this depends the solution of the
allimportant
question, whether principles are to rule this
republic
,
or men; and these last, too, viewed in their most vulgar
and repulsive qualities, or as the mere creatures of self,
instead
of being the guardians and agents of that which ought
to be. It is owing to this state of things, that we have
already
seen a legislature occupied with discussing the modes
of evading the provisions of its own laws, and men who
ought to stand before the world, stern and uncompromising
in their public morals, manifesting a most pernicious
ingenuity
in endeavouring to master and overreach each other
in wielding the arts of the demagogue.
As the Indians entered the north and south road, or that
in which we had stopped, the whole party came to a halt,
with characteristic courtesy, as if to meet our wish to speak
to them. The foremost of the band, who was also the oldest,
being a man of sixty, if not older, nodded his head, and
uttered
the usual conventional salutation of Sago, sago.
Sago, said my uncle, and Sago put in I.
How do? continued the Indian, who we now discovered
spoke English. What call this country?
This is Ravensnest. The village of Little Nest is about
a mile and a half on the other side of that wood.
The Indian now turned, and in his deep guttural tones
communicated this intelligence to his fellows. The
information
obviously was well received, which was as much as
saying that they had reached the end of their journey. Some
conversation next succeeded, delivered in brief, sententious
remarks, when the old chief again turned to us. I call him
chief, though it was evident that the whole party was
composed
of chiefs. This was apparent by their medals, their
fine appearance generally, and by their quiet, dignified, not
to say lofty, bearing. Each of them was in a light summer
attire, wearing the moccasin and leggings, &c.; the calico
shirt, or a thin blanket, that was cast around the upper part
of the person, much as the Roman may be supposed to have
worn his toga; all carrying the rifle, the bright, well-scoured
tomahawk, and the sheathed knife. Each, too, had his horn
and his bullet-pouch, and some of the more youthful were a
little elaborate in their ornaments, in the way of feathers,
3*
and such presents as they had received on their long
journey
.
Not one of them all, however, was painted.
This Raven-nest, eh? continued the old chief, speaking
directly, but with sufficient courtesy.
As I have said. The village lies on the other side of
that wood; the house from which the name is taken is a
mile and a half in the other direction.
This, too, was translated, and a low, but general
expression
of pleasure was given.
Any Injins 'bout here, eh? demanded the chief, looking
so earnestly at the same time as to surprise us both.
Yes, answered my uncle. There
are
Injinsa party
is in the edge of the wood, there, within thirty rods of you,
at this moment.
With great rapidity this fact was communicated to the
eager listeners, and there was a sensation in the party,
though it was a sensation betrayed as such feelings are only
betrayed among the aborigines of this part of the world;
quietly, reservedly, and with a coldness amounting nearly
to indifference. We were amused, however, at noting how
much more interest this news awakened than would
probably
have been excited had these red-men been told a town
like London was on the other side of the wood. As
children
are known to feel most interest in children, so did these
children of the forest seem to be most alive to an interest in
these unexpected neighbours, brethren of the same habits
and race, as they unquestionably imagined. After some
earnest discourse among themselves, the old chief, whose
name turned out to be Prairiefire, once more addressed
himself to us.
What tribe, eh? Know tribe?
They are called Anti-rent Injinsa new tribe in this
part of the country, and are not much esteemed.
Bad Injin, eh?
I am afraid so. They are not honest enough to go in
paint, but wear shirts over their faces.
Another long and wondering conference succeeded. It
is to be supposed that such a
tribe
as that of the Anti-renters
was hitherto unknown among the American savages. The
first intelligence of the existence of such a people would
naturally awaken great interest, and we were soon required
to show them the way to the spot where this unheard of
tribe might be found. This was going somewhat further
than my uncle had anticipated, but he was not a man to beat
a retreat when he had once undertaken an enterprise. After
a short deliberation with himself, he signified his assent;
and alighting from our wagon, we fastened Tom Miller's
horse to a stake of one of the fences, and set off, on foot, as
guides to our new brethren, in seeking the great tribe of the
Anti-renters! We had not gone half the distance to the
woods before we met Holmes and Tubbs, who, getting a
cast in another wagon, until they reached the place where
their own vehicle was stationed, had recovered that, and
were now on their way home, apprehensive that some new
freak of their great allies might throw them out into the
highway again. This wagon, our own excepted, was the
only one that had yet emerged from the wood, the owners
of some twenty others preferring to remain in the
back-ground
until the development of the meeting between the
tribes should occur.
What, in natur', does all this mean? exclaimed old
Holmes, as we approached him, reining in his horse, for the
purposes of a conference. Is the governor sending out
ra-al Injins ag'in' us, in order to favour the landlords?
This was taking a harsh and most uncharitable view of
the course of the governor, for an anti-renter; but that
functionary
having made the capital blunder of serving,
altogether
,
neither God nor Mammon in this great question,
must expect to take it right and left, as neither God nor
Mammon will be very likely to approve of his course.
Vell, I don't know, was my uncle's answer. Dese
ist ra-al red-men, und dem younder ist ra-al Injins, dat's
all. Vhat might bring dese warriors here, joost now, you
must ask of demselves, if you wants to l'arn.
There can be no harm in asking; I 'am no way skeary
about redskins, having seen 'em often, and my father fit 'em
in his day, as I 've heern him tell. Sago, Sago.
Sago, answered Prairiefire, with his customary
courtesy
.
Where, in natur', do you red-men all come
from
, and
where
can
ye be goin'?
It was apparent that Holmes belonged to a school that
never hesitated about putting any question; and that would
have an answer, if an answer was to be got. The old chief
had probably met with such pale-faces before, the untrained
American being certainly among the most diligent of all the
human beings of that class. But, on the other hand, the
red-man regards the indulgence of a too eager curiosity as
womanish, and unworthy of the self-command and dignity
of a warrior. The betraying of surprise, and the indulgence
of a curiosity fit only for squaws, were two things that
Prairiefire
had doubtless been early told were unworthy of his
sex; for to some such in-and-in breeding alone could be
referred the explanation of the circumstance that neither
Holmes' manner, address, nor language, caused in him the
least expression of emotion. He answered the questions,
however, and that with a coldness that seemed of proof.
Come from setting sun  been to see Great Father, at
Washington  go home, was the sententious reply.
But, how come ye to pass by Ravensnest?I 'm afeared
the governor, and them chaps at Albany, must have a hand
in this, Shabbakuck?
What Shabbakuck thought of the governor, and them
chaps at Albany is not known, as he did not see fit to
make any reply. His ordinary propensity to meddle was
probably awed by the appearance of these real Redskins.
I say,
why
do ye come this-a-way? Holmes continued,
repeating his question. If you 've been to Washington,
and found him to hum (Anglice, `at home'), why didn't ye
go back by the way ye come?
Come here to find Injin; got no Injin here, eh?
Injin? why, of one sort we 've got more of the critturs
than a body can very well git along with. Of what colour
be the Injins you want to find?  Be they of the pale-face
natur', or be they red like yourselves?
Want to find red-man. He ole, now; like top of dead
hemlock, wind blow t'rough his branches till leaf all fall
off.
By George, Hugh, whispered my uncle, these
red-skins
are in search of old Susquesus! Then entirely
forgetting
the necessity of maintaining his broken English in
the presence of his two Ravensnest listeners, Shabbakuck
Tubbs, in particular, he turned, somewhat inconsiderately
for one of his years, to the Prairiefire, and hastily
remarked
I can help you in your search. You are looking for a
warrior of the Onondagoes; one who left his tribe a
hundred
summers ago, a red-man of great renown for finding
his path in the forest, and who would never taste fire-water.
His name is Susquesus.
Until this moment, the only white man who was in
company
with this strange party  strange at least in our
portion
of the State of New York, though common enough,
perhaps, on the great thoroughfares of the countrybroke
silence. This man was an ordinary interpreter, who had
been sent with the party in case of necessity; but being
little
more acquainted with the ways of civilization than those
whom he was to guide, he had prudently held his tongue
until he saw that he might be of some use. We afterwards
learned that the sub-agent who had accompanied the chiefs
to Washington, had profited by the wish of the Indians to
pay their passing homage to the Withered Hemlock, that
still stands, as they poetically called Susquesus in their
own dialectsfor Indians of several tribes were presentto
pay a visit to his own relatives in Massachusetts, his
presence
not being deemed necessary in such a purely pious
pilgrimage.
You 're right, observed the interpreter. These chiefs
have not come to look up any
tribe
, but there are two of
the ancient Onondagoes among them, and their traditions
tell of a chief, called Susquesus, that has outlived
everything
but tradition; who left his own people long, long ago,
and who left a great name behind him for vartue, and that
is a thing a red-skin never forgets.
And all these warriors have come fifty miles out of their
way, to pay this homage to Susquesus?
Such has been their wish, and I asked permission of the
Bureau at Washington, to permit them to come. It costs
Uncle Sam $50 or a $100 more than it otherwise might,
but such a visit will do all the warriors of the West a
million
of dollars of good; no men honour right and justice
more than redskins, though it 's in their own fashion.
I am sure Uncle Sam has acted no more than
right-eously
,
as I hope he always may act as respects these
people
.
Susquesus is an old friend of mine, and I will lead
you to him.
And who in natur' be
you
? demanded Holmes, his
curiosity
starting off on a new track.
Who am I?  You shall know who I am, answered
uncle Ro, removing his wig, an action that I imitated on
the spot,  I am Roger Littlepage, the late trustee of this
estate, and this is Hugh Littlepage, its owner. Old
Holmes was good pluck in most matters; of far better stuff
at the bottom, than the sneaking, snivelling, prating
demagogue
at his side; but by this discovery he was
dumbfounded
!
He looked at my uncle, then he looked at me;
after which, he fastened a distressed and inquiring gaze on
Shabbakuck. As for the Indians, notwithstanding their
habitual
self-command, a common hugh! was uttered among
them, when they saw two men, as it might be, thus scalping
themselves. Uncle Ro was excited, and his manner was,
in the least degree, theatrical, as with one hand he removed
his cap, and with the other his wig; holding the last, with
an extended arm, in the direction of the Indians. As a
red-man
is rarely guilty of any act of rudeness, unless he mean
to play the brute in good earnest, it is possible that the
Chippewa towards whom the hand which held the wig was
extended, mistook the attitude for an invitation to examine
that curious article, for himself. It is certain he gently
forced it from my uncle's grasp, and, in the twinkling of an
eye, all the savages were gathered round it, uttering many,
but low and guarded expressions of surprise. Those men
were all chiefs, and they restrained their astonishment at
this point. Had there been any of the ignoble vulgar among
them, there is little doubt that the wig would have passed
from hand to hand, and been fitted to a dozen heads, already
shaved to receive it.
CHAPTER III.
The Gordon is gude in a hurry,
An' Campbell is steel to the bane;
An' Grant, an' Mackenzie, an' Murray,
An' Cameron will truckle to nane.
Hogg
.
The
interruption of this scene came from old Holmes, who
cried to his companion, on the high key in which it was
usual for him to speak:
This is downright bad, Shabbakuk  we'll never get
our leases a'ter this!
Nobody can sayanswered Tubbs, giving a loud hem,
as if determined to brazen the matter out. Maybe the
gentleman will be glad to compromise the matter. It's
ag'in law, I believe, for any one to appear on the highway
disguisedand both the 'Squire Littlepages, you'll notice,
neighbour Holmes, be in the very
middle
of the road, and
both was disguised, only a minute ago.
That's true.D'ye think anything can be got out o'
that? I want profitable proceedin's.
Shabbakuk gave another hem, looked behind him, as if
to ascertain what had become of the Injins, for he clearly
did not fancy the real `article' before him, and then he
answered
:
We may get our farms, neighbour Holmes, if you'll
agree, as I'm willin' to do, to be reasonable about this
matter
,
so long as 'Squire Littlepage wishes to hearken to his
own interests.
My uncle did not deign to make any answer, but,
knowing
we had done nothing to bring us within the view of the
late statute, he turned towards the Indians, renewing his
offer to them to be their guide.
The chiefs want very much to know who you are, and
how you two came by double scalps, said the interpreter,
smiling like one who understood for his own part, the nature
of a wig very well.
Tell them that this young gentleman is Hugh
Littlepage
,
and that I am his uncle. Hugh Littlepage is the
owner of the land that you see on every side of you.
The answer was communicated, and we waited for its
effect on the Indians. To our surprise, several of them soon
gathered around, evidently regarding us both, with interest
and respect.
The claims of a landlord seem to be better understood
among these untutored savages, than among your own
tenants, Hugh, said my uncle. But there goes old
Holmes, the inbred rogue, and his friend Shabbakuk, back
to the woods; we may have an affair on hand with
his
Injins.
I think not, sir. It does not appear to me that there is
valour enough in that tribe, to face this. In general, the
white man is fully a match for the redskin; but it may be
doubted whether chiefs like these, would not prove too much
for twice their number of varlets, of the breed of yonder
skulking scoundrels.
Why do the chiefs manifest so much interest in us?
asked my uncle, of the interpreter. Is it possible that they
pay so much respect to us, on account of our connection
with this estate?
Not at allnot at all. They know the difference
between
a chief and a common man well enough, it is true,
was the answer; and twenty times, as we have come
down through the country, have they expressed their
surprise
to me, that so many common men should be chiefs,
among the pale-faces; but, they care nothing for riches.
He is the greatest man among them, who is best on a war
path, and at a council-fire; though they
do
honour them
that has had great and useful ancestors.
But, they seem to betray some unusual and
extraordinary
interest in us, too; perhaps they are surprised at
seeing
gentlemen in such dresses?
Lord, sir, what do men care for dresses, that are used
to see the heads of factories and forts, half the time dressed
in skins. They know that there be holidays and
vorkin'days
;
times for every-day wear, and times for feathers and
paint. Nonothey look at you both, with so much
interest
,
on account of their traditions.
Their traditions! What can these have to do with us?
We have never had anything to do with Indians.
That's true of you, and may be true of your fathers;
but it's not true of some of your ancestors. Yesterday, after
we had got to our night's stopping-place, two of the chiefs,
this smallish man with the double plate on his breast, and
that elderly warrior, who has been once scalped, as you can
see by his crown, began to tell of some of the treacheries of
their own tribe, which was once a Canada people. The
elderly chief related the adventures of a war-path, that led
out of Canada, across the large waters, down to a
settlement
where they expected to get a great many scalps, but
where in the end they lost more scalps than they found;
and where they met Susquesus, the upright Onondago, as
they call him in that tongue, as well as the Yengeese owner
of the land, at this very spot, whom they called by a name
something like your own, who was a warrior of great
courage
and skill by their traditions. They suppose you to be
the descendants of the last, and honour you accordingly;
that's all.
And, is it possible that these untutored beings have
traditions
as reliable as this?
Lord, if you could hear what they say among
themselves
,
about the lies that are read to them out of the
pale-face
prints, you would I'arn how much store they set by
truth! In my day, I have travelled through a hundred
miles of wilderness, by a path that was no better, nor any
worse, than an Indian tradition of its manner of running;
and a tradition that must have been, at least, a hundred
summers old. They know all about your forefathers, and
they know something about you, too, if you be the gentleman
that finds the upright Onondago, or the Withered Hemlock,
in his old age, with a wigwam, and keeps it filled with food
and fuel.
Is this possible! And all this is spoken of, and known
among the savages of the Far West?
If you call these chiefs, savages, returned the
interpreter
,
a little offended at hearing such a term applied to his
best friends and constant associates. To be sure they
have their ways, and so have the pale-faces; but Injin ways
be not so very savage, when a body gets a little used to
Vol. II.4
them. Now, I remember it was a long time before I could
get reconciled to seeing a warrior scalp his enemy; but as I
reasoned on it, and entered into the spirit of the practice, I
began to feel it was all right.
I was walking just in front of my uncle, for we were in
motion again on our way to the wood, but could not help
turning and saying to him with a smile
So it would seem that this matter of the `spirit' is to
be found in other places besides the legislature. There is
the `spirit of scalping,' as well as the `spirit of the
institutions
!'
Ay, Hugh, and the `spirit of fleecing,' as a consequence
of what is profanely termed the last. But, it may be well
to go no nearer to the wood, than this spot. The Injins I
have told you of are in these bushes in front, and they are
armed  I leave you to communicate with them in any
manner
you please. They are about twenty in number.
The interpreter informed his chiefs of what had been said,
who spoke together in earnest consultation for a moment.
Then Prairiefire, himself, plucked a branch off the nearest
bush, and holding it up he advanced close to the cover, and
called out aloud, in some one, or in many of the different
dialects with which he was acquainted. I saw by the
moving of their branches, that men were in the bushes; but
no answer of any sort was made. There was one savage
in our band, who betrayed manifest impatience at these
proceedings. He was a large, athletic Iowa chief, called in
English Flintyheart, and, as we subsequently learned, of great
renown for martial exploits. It was always difficult to hold
him in, when there was a prospect of scalps, and he was
now less restrained than common, from the circumstance of
his having no superior of his own particular tribe present.
After Prairiefire had called two or three times in vain to the
party in the cover, Flintyhead stepped out, spoke a few
words, with energy and spirit, terminating his appeal by a
most effective, not to say appalling, whoop. That sound
was echoed back by most of the band, when they all broke
off, right and left, stealing more like snakes than bipeds to
the fences, under cover of which they glanced forward to
the wood, in which every man of them buried himself, in the
twinkling of an eye In vain had the interpreter called to
them, to remind them where they were, and to tell them
that they might displease their Great Father, at Washington;
and Prairiefire stood his ground, exposed to any shot the
supposed foe might send at him; on they went, like so many
hounds that have struck a scent too strong to be held in
restraint
by any whipper-in.
They expect to find Injins, said the interpreter, in a
sort of despair, and there's no holdin' 'em back. There
can be no enemies of their'n down here-a-way, and the agent
will be awfully angry if blood is drawn; though I shouldn't
mind it a bit if the party was some of them scoundrels, the
Sauks and Foxes, whom it 's often a marcy to kill. It 's
different down here, however, and I must say I wish this
hadn't happened.
My uncle and myself just waited long enough to hear
this, when we rushed forward, along the highway, and
entered
the wood, joined by Prairiefire, who, fancying by our
movement that all was right, now raised such a whoop
himself
as to demonstrate it was not for want of `knowing how'
that he had hitherto been silent. The road made a curve
at the very point where it penetrated the forest, and being
fringed with the bushes already mentioned, the two
circumstances
shut out the view of what was passing behind the
scenes, until we reached the turn, where a common halt of
the wagons had been made, when the whole view burst
upon us at once in all its magnificence.
A rout of a `grand army' could scarcely have been more
picturesque! The road was lined with vehicles, in full
retreat, to use a military term, or, to speak in the more
common parlance, scampering off. Every whip was in
active use, every horse was on the run, whilst half the
faces were turned behind their owners, the women sending
back screams to the whoops of the savages. As for the
Injins, they had instinctively abandoned the woods, and
poured down into the highway, speed like theirs demanding
open ground for its finest display. Some had leaped into
wagons, piling themselves up among those virtuous wives
and daughters of that portion of the honest yeomanry who
had collected to devise the means of cheating me out of my
property. But, why dwell on this scene, since the exploits
of these Injins, for the last six years, have amply proved
that the only thing in which they excel, is in running away.
They are heroes when a dozen can get round a single man
to tar and feather him; valiant as a hundred against five or
six, and occasionally murderers, when each victim can be
destroyed by five or six bullets, to make sure of him. The
very cowardice of the scoundrels should render them
loathsome
to the whole community; the dog that has spirit only
to hunt in packs being cur at the bottom.
I must add one other object to the view, however. Holmes
and Shabbakuk brought up the rear, and both were flogging
their devoted beast as if his employersI dare not call them
masters,' as I might be accused of aristocracy for using so
offensive a term in this age of common-sense liberty, while
`employers' is a very significant expression for the
particular
occasionas if his `employers,' then, had left
something
behind them, at `Little Neest,' and were hurrying
back to obtain it before it fell into other hands. Old Holmes
kept looking behind, as if chased by the covenants of forty
leases, while the Spirit of the Institutions, headed by two
governors, and the honourable gentleman from Albany,
was in full pursuit. If the Spirit of the Institutions was
really there, it was quite alone; for I looked in vain for the
exhibition of any other spirit. In much less time than it has
taken me to write this account, the road was cleared, leaving
my uncle, myself, and Prairiefire, in quiet possession; the
latter uttering a very significant hugh! as the last wagon
went out of sight in a cloud of dust.
It was but a moment, however, before our own tribe, or
tribes
would be more accurate, came down upon us,
collecting
in the road at the very spot where we stood. The
victory
had been bloodless, but it was complete. Not only had
the savage Indians completely routed the virtuous and
much-oppressed-by-aristocracy
Injins, but they had captured two
specimens of virtue and depression in the persons of as
many of the band. So very significant and expressive was
the manner of the captives, that Flintyheart, into whose
hands they had fallen, not only seemed to hold their scalps
in contempt, but actually had disdained to disarm them.
There they stood, bundles of calico, resembling children in
swaddling-clothes, with nothing partaking of that natural
freedom of which their party love to boast, but their legs,
which were left at perfect liberty, by way of a
dernier
resort
.
My uncle now assumed a little authority, and
commanded
these fellows to take off their disguises. He might
as well have ordered one of the oaks, or maples, to lay down
its leaves before the season came round; for neither would
obey.
The interpreter, however, whose name was Manytongues,
rendered into English from the Indian dialects, was a man
of surprisingly few words, considering his calling, on an
occasion like this. Walking up to one of the prisoners, he
first disarmed him, and then removed his calico hood,
exposing
the discomfited countenance of Brigham, Tom
Miller's
envious labourer. The hughs! that escaped the
Indians were very expressive, on finding that not only did
a pale-face countenance appear from beneath the covering,
but one that might be said to be somewhat paler than
common
.
Manytongues had a good deal of frontier waggery
about him, and, by this time he began to comprehend how
the land lay. Passing his hand over Josh's head, he coolly
remarked
That scalp would be thought more of, in Iowa, than it's
ra-ally worth, I'm thinking, if truth was said. But let us
see who we have here.
Suiting the action to the words, as it is termed, the
interpreter
laid hold of the hood of the other captive, but did not
succeed in removing it without a sharp struggle. He effected
his purpose, assisted by two of the younger chiefs, who
stepped forward to aid him. I anticipated the result, for I
had early recognised the goar; but great was the surprise
of my uncle when he saw Seneca Newcome's well-known
face developed by the change!
Senecaor, it might be better now to use his own
favourite
orthoepy, and call him Sene
ky
, at once, for he had a
particularly sneaking look as the emerged from under the
calico, and this would be suiting the sound to appearances
Seneky, then, was in a mingled tumult, as it is called,
of rage and shame. The first predominated, however, and,
as is only too common in cases of military disasters, instead
of attributing his capture to circumstances, the prowess of
his enemies, or any fault of his own, he sought to mitigate his
own disgrace by heaping disgrace on his comrade. Indeed,
4 *
the manner in which these men went at each other, as
soon as unsacked, reminded me of two game cocks that are
let out of their bags within three feet of each other, with this
exception  neither crowed.
This is all your fault, you cowardly dog, said Seneky,
almost fiercely, for shame had filled his face with blood.
Had you kept on your feet, and not run me down, in your
haste to get off, I might have retreated, and got clear with
the rest of them.
This assault was too much for Joshua, who gained spirit
to answer by its rudeness and violence, not to say
injustice
;
for, as we afterwards ascertained, Newcome had
actually
fallen in his eagerness to retreat; and Brigham, so far
from being the cause of his coming down, had only
prevented
his getting up, by falling on top of him. In this
prostrate condition they had further fallen into the hands of
their enemies.
I want nothin' from you, 'Squire Newcome, answered
Joshua, quite decidedly as to tone and manner;
your
cha
racter is well known, all up and down the country.
What of my character?  What have
you
got to say
ag'in' me or my character? demanded the attorney at law,
in a tone of high defiance. I want to see the man who
can say anything ag'in' my character.
This was pretty well, considering that the fellow had
actually
been detected in the commission of a felony; though
I suppose that difficulty would have been gotten over, in a
moral sense, by the claim of being taken while struggling
in defence of human rights, and the spirit of the
institutions
.
The defiance was too much for Brigham's patience,
and being fully assured, by this time, that he was not in
much danger of being scalped, he turned upon Seneca, and
cried, with something more than spirit, with downright
rancour
You're a pretty fri'nd of the poor man, and of the
people, if truth must be said, an't you? Everybody in the
county that's in want of money knows what
you
be, you
dd shaver.
As the last words came out, Seneky's fist went in upon
Brigham's nose, causing the blood to flow freely. My uncle
Ro now thought it time to interfere, and he rebuked the
irritated lawyer with dignity.
Why did he call me a dd shaver, then? retorted
Seneky, still angry and red. I'll stand
that
from no
man.
Why, what harm can there be in such a charge, Mr.
Newcome? You are a member of the bar, and ought to
understand the laws of your country, and cannot stand in
need of being told that it has been decided by the highest
tribunal of your State that it is no reproach to be called a
shaver! Some of the honourable members of that learned
body, indeed, seem to think, on the contrary, that it is matter
of commendation and congratulation. I am ashamed of
you, Mr. NewcomeI'm quite ashamed of you.
Seneky muttered something, in which I fancied I
understood
the words the Court of Errors be dd, or the
Court of Errors might go to some very bad place, which
I will not name; but I will not take on myself that any
man of decency could really use such irreverent language
about a body so tru y eminent, though a person in a passion
is sometimes disposed to forget propriety. My uncle now
thought it time to put an end to this scene; and, without
deigning to enter into any explanations, he signified to
Manytongues
his readiness to lead his chiefs to the point where
they desired to go.
As to these two Injins, he added, their capture will
do us no honour; and now we know who they are, they can
be taken at any time by the deputy sheriffs or constables.
It is hardly worth while to encumber your march with such
fellows.
The chiefs assented to this proposal, too, and we quitted
the woods in a body, leaving Seneky and Joshua on the
ground. As we subsequently learned, our backs were no
sooner turned, than the last pitched into the first, and
pounded him not only until he owned he was a shaver,
but that he was a dd shaver in the bargain. Such
was the man, and such the class, that the deluded
anti-renters
of New York wish to substitute, in a social sense,
for the ancient landlords of the country! A pretty
top-sheaf
they would make to the stack of the community, and
admirably would the grain be kept that was protected by
their covering! One would like to see fellows of this moral
calibre interpreting
their
covenants; and it would be a
useful
,
though a painful lesson, to see the change effected for a
twelvemonth, in order to ascertain, after things had got back
into the old natural channel, how many would
then
wish to
return, like the dog to his vomit, or the sow to her
wallowing
in the mire.
After giving some directions to Manytongues, my uncle
and I got into our wagon and drove up the road, leaving the
Indians to follow. The rendezvous was at the Nest, whither
we had now determined to proceed at once, and assume our
proper characters. In passing the rectory we found time
to stop and run in, to inquire after the welfare of Mr. and
Miss Warren. Great was my joy at learning they had
gone on to the Nest, where they were all to dine. This
intelligence did not tend to lessen the speed of Miller's horse,
or my horse it would be better to say, for I am the real
owner of everything on the Nest Farm, and shall probably
so remain, unless the spirit of the Institutions gets at my
property there, as well as in other places. In the course
of half an hour we drove on the lawn, and stopped at the
door. It will be recollected that the Indians had our wigs,
which had been left by my uncle and myself in their hands,
as things of no further use to us. Notwithstanding our
dresses, the instant we presented ourselves without these
instruments of disguise we were recognized, and the cry
went through the house and grounds that Mr. Hugh had
come home! I confess I was touched with some signs of
interest and feeling that escaped the domestics, as well as
those who belonged out of doors, when they saw me again
standing before them in health, if not in good looks. My
uncle, too, was welcome; and there were a few minutes
during which I forgot all my grounds for vexation, and
was truly happy.
Although my grandmother, and sister, and Mary
Warren
,
all knew what the cry of Mr. Hugh has got home
meant, it brought everybody out upon the piazza. Mr.
Warren had related the events of the day, as far as he was
acquainted with them; but even those who were in the
secret
,
were surprised at our thus returning unwigged, and in
our proper characters. As for myself, I could not but note
the manner in which the four girls came out to meet me.
Martha flew into my embrace, cast her arms around my
neck, kissing me six or eight times without stopping. Then
Miss Colebrooke came next, with Ann Marston leaning on
her arm, both smiling, though greatly surprised, and both
bright, and pretty, and lady-like. They were glad to see
me, and met my salutations frankly and like old friends;
though I could see they did not fancy my dress in the least,
Mary Warren was behind them all, smiling, blushing, and
shy; but it did not require two looks from me to make
certain
that
her
welcome was as sincere as that of my older
friends. Mr. Warren was glad to have it in his power to
greet us openly, and to form an acquaintance with those, to
whose return he had now been looking with anxiety and
hope, for three or four years.
A few minutes sufficed for the necessary explanations, a
part of which, indeed, had already been made by those who
were previously in the secret; when my dear grandmother
and Patt insisted on our going up to our old room, and of
dressing ourselves in attire more suitable to our stations.
A plenty of summer clothes had been left behind us, and
our wardrobes had been examined that morning in
anticipation
of our soon having need of them; so that no great time
was necessary to make the change. I was a little fuller
than when I left home, but the clothes being loose, there
was no difficulty in equipping myself. I found a handsome
blue dress coat, that did very well, and vests and pantaloons,
ad libitum
. Clothing is so much cheaper in Europe than
at home, that Americans who are well supplied, do not often
carry much with them when they go abroad; and this had
been a rule with my uncle all his life. Each of us,
moreover
,
habitually kept a supply of country attire at the Nest,
which we did not think of removing. In consequence of
these little domestic circumstances, as has been said, there
was no want of the means of putting my uncle and myself
on a level with others of our class, as respects outward
appearance
,
in that retired part of the country, at least.
The apartments of my uncle and myself were quite near
each other, in the north wing of the house; as that which
looked in the direction of a part of the meadows under the
cliff, the wooded ravine, and the wigwam, or cabin, of the
Upright Onondago. The last was very plainly in view,
from the window of my dressing-room; and I was standing
at the latter, contemplating the figures of the two old fellows,
as they sat basking in the sun, as was their practice of an
afternoon, when a tap at the door proved to be the
announcement
of the entrance of John.
Well, John, my good fellow, I said, laughingly; I
find a wig makes a great difference with your means of
recognizing
an old friend. I must thank you, nevertheless,
for the good treatment you gave me in my character of a
music-grinder.
I am sure, Mr. Hugh, you are heartily welcome to my
services, come as you may to ask them. It was a most
surprisingest deception, sir, as I shall ever hadmit; but I
thought the whole time you wasn't exactly what you seemed
to be, as I told Kitty as soon as I went down stairs: `Kitty,'
says I, `them two pedlars is just the two genteelest pedlars
as hever I see in this country, and I shouldn't wonder if
they had known better days.' But, now you have been to
see the hanti-renters with your own eyes, Mr. Hugh, what
do you think of them, if I may be so bold as to ask the
question?
Very much as I thought, before I had been to see them.
They are a set of fellows who are canting about liberty, at
the very moment when they are doing all they can to
discredit
its laws, and who mistake selfishness for patriotism;
just as their backers in the State government are doing, by
using the same cant, when their object is nothing but votes.
If no tenant had a vote, this question would never have
been raised, or dreamt ofbut I see those two old fellows,
Jaaf and Sus, seem to enjoy themselves still.
Indeed they do, sir, in the most surprisingest manner!
They was both antiquities, as we says in Hengland, when
I came to this country, sir  and that was before you was
born, Mr. Hugh  an age agone. But there they sits, sir,
day in and day out, looking like monumentals of past
times. The nigger  John had been long enough in the
country to catch the vernacularThe nigger grows uglier
and uglier every year, and that is most of a change I can
see in
him;
while I do think, sir, that the Indian grows
'andsomer and 'andsomer. He 's the 'andsomest old
gentleman
,
sir, as I knows of, far and near!
Old
gentleman!
What an expressive term that was,
in this case! No human being would ever think of calling
Jaaf an old gentleman, even in these aristocratic days,
when gentlemen are plentier than blackberries; while
any one might feel disposed thus to describe Susquesus.
The Onondago
was
a gentleman, in the best meaning of the
word; though he may, and certainly did, want a great
deal in the way of mere conventional usages. As for John,
he never would have used the word to me, except in a case
in which he felt the party had a claim to the appellation.
Susquesus is a magnificent sight, with his grey or
white head, fiery eyes, composed features, and impressive
air, I answered; and Jaaf is no beauty. How do the
old men get on together?
Why, sir, they quarrel a good dealthat is, the nigger
quarrels; though the Indian is too much above him to mind
what he says. Nor will I say that Yop actually quarrels,
sir, for he has the greatest possible regard for his friend;
but he aggravates in the most surprisingest manner  just
like a nigger, howsever, I do suppose.
They have wanted for nothing, I trust, during my
absence
.
Their table and other comforts have been seen to
carefully, I hope?
No fear of that, sir, so long as Mrs. Littlepage lives!
She has the affection of a child for the old men, and has
everything provided for them that they can possibly want.
Betty Smith, siryou remember Betty, the widow of the old
coachman, that died when you was at college, sir  well,
Betty has done nothing, these four years, but look after
them two old men. She keeps everything tidy in their
hut, and washes it out twice a week, and washes their
clothes for them, and darns, and sews, and cooks, and
looks after all their comforts. She lives hard by, in the
other cottage, sir, and has everything handy.
I am glad of that. Does either of the old men ever
stray over as far as the Nest House now, John? Before
I went abroad, we had a visit from each, daily.
That custom has fallen away a little, sir; though the
nigger comes much the oftenest. He is sure to be here
once or twice a week, in good weather. Then he walks
into the kitchen, where he will sit sometimes for a whole
morning, telling the hardest stories, sir  ha, ha, ha!  yes,
sir, just the hardest stories one ever heard!
Why what can he have to say of that nature, that it
seems to amuse you so?
According to his notion, sir, everything in the country
is falling away, and is inferior like to what it may have
been in his young days. The turkeys arn't so large, sir;
and the fowls is poorer, sir; and the mutton isn't so fat,
sir; and sich sort of enormities.
Here John laughed very heartily, though it was plain
enough he did not much fancy the comparisons.
And Susquesus, I said, he does not share in his
friend's criticisms?
Sus never enters the kitchen, sir, at all. He knows that
all the quality and upper class come to the great door of the
house, and is too much of a gentleman to come in at any
other entrance. No, sir, I never saw Sus in the kitchen or
hoffices, at all; nor does Mrs. Littlepage 'ave his table set
anywhere but in the hupper rooms, or on the piazza, when
she wishes to treat him to anything nice. The old
gentleman
has what he calls his traditions, sir, and can tell a great
many stories of old times; but they ar'n't about turkeys, and
'orses, and garden-stuff, and such things as Yop dwells on
so much, and so uncomfortably.
I now dismissed John, after again thanking him for his
civilities to one of my late appearance, and joined my uncle.
When we entered the little drawing-room, where the whole
party was waiting to meet us, previously to going to the
table, a common exclamation of pleasure escaped them all.
Martha again kissed me, declaring I was now Hugh; that
I looked as she had expected to see Hugh; that she would
now know me for Hugh, and many other similar things;
while my dear grandmother stood and parted my hair, and
gazed into my face with tears in her eyes, for I reminded
her of her first-born, who had died so young! As for the
other ladies, the two heiress-wards of Uncle Ro seemed
smiling and friendly, and willing to renew our ancient
amicable
relations; but Mary Warren still kept herself in the
back-ground, though I thought by her modest and
half-averted
eye, and flushed cheeks, that she sympathized as
deeply in her friend Patt's present happiness as any of the
others; possibly more deeply.
Before we went to the table I sent a servant to the top of
the house, with orders to look down the road, in order to
ascertain when my red friends might be expected. This
man reported that they were advancing along the highway,
and would probably reach the door in the course of half an
hour. They had stopped; and he thought that he could
perceive, by means of his glass, that they were painting their
faces, and otherwise arranging their toilets, in preparation
for the anticipated interview. On receiving this information
we took our seats at table, expecting to be ready to receive
the chiefs, as soon as they should arrive.
Ours was a happy dinner. For the moment, the
condition
of the country and the schemes of my tenants were
forgotten
,
and we chatted of those nearer interests and feelings
that naturally presented themselves to our minds at such a
time. At length dear grandmother pleasantly remarked
You must have an instinct for the discovery of
discretion
,
Hugh, for no one could have made a better choice of
a confidant than you did, while going to the village, this
morning.
Mary blushed like an Italian sky at eventide, and looked
down, to conceal her confusion.
I do not know whether it was discretion or vanity,
grandmother, was my answer, for I am conscious of
feeling an unconquerable reluctance to passing for a
common
music-grinder in Miss Warren's eyes.
Nay, Hugh, put in the saucy Patt, I had told you
before that you passed for a very
un
common music-grinder
in her eyes. As for the grinding, she said but little; for it
was of the flute, and of the manner in which it was played,
that Miss Warren spoke the most eloquently.
The Martha! of Mary Warren, lowly, but
half-reproachfully
uttered, showed that the charming girl was
beginning
to be really distressed, and my observant parent
changed the discourse by a gentle and adroit expedient;
such as a woman alone knows thoroughly how to put in
Vol. II.5
practice. It was simply handing Mr. Warren a plate of
greengages; but the act was so performed as to change the
discourse.
During the whole of that meal I felt certain there was a
secret, mysterious communication between me and Mary
Warren, which, while it probably did escape the notice of
others, was perfectly evident to ourselves. This fact I
felt
to be true; while there was a consciousness betrayed in
Mary's blushes, and even in her averted eyes, that I found
extremely eloquent on the same subject.
CHAPTER IV.
With look, like patient Job's, eschewing evil;
With motions graceful as a bird's in air;
Thou art, in sober truth, the veriest devil
That e'er clinched fingers in a captive's hair.
Red Jacket
.
Although
an immense progress has been made in
liberating
this country from the domination of England, in the
way of opinion and usages, a good deal remains to be done
yet. Still, he who can look back forty years, must see the
great changes that have occurred in very many things; and
it is to be hoped that he who lives forty years hence, will
find very few remaining that have no better reasons for their
existence among ourselves than the example of a people so
remote, with a different climate, different social organization,
and different wants. I am for no more condemning a usage,
however, simply because it is English, than I am for
approving
it, simply because it is English. I wish everything
to stand on its own merits, and feel certain that no nation
ever can become great, in the higher signification of the
term, until it ceases to imitate, because it is imitation of a
certain fixed model. One of the very greatest evils of this
imitative spirit is even now developing itself in what is called
the progress of the country, which is assailing principles
that are as old as the existence of man, and which may
almost be said to be oternal as social truths, at the very
moment that notions derived from our ancestors are
submitted
to in the highest places, the Senate of the United
States for example, that are founded in facts which not only
have no existence among ourselves, but which are positively
antagonist to such as have. So much easier is it to join in
the hurrah! of a progress, than to ascertain whether it
is making in the right direction, or whether it be progress
at all. But, to return from things of moment to those of
less concern.
Among other customs to be condemned that we have
derived from England, is the practice of the men sitting at
table after the women have left it. Much as I may wish to
see this every-way offensive custom done away with, and the
more polished and humanizing usage of all the rest of
christendom adopted in its stead, I should feel ashamed at
finding, as I make no doubt I should find it, that our custom
would be abandoned within a twelvemonth after it might be
understood it was abandoned in England. My uncle had
long endeavoured to introduce into our own immediate circle
the practice of retaining the ladies at table for a reasonable
time, and of then quitting it with them at the expiration of
that time; but it is hard to `kick against the pricks.' Men
who fancy it `society' to meet at each other's houses to
drink wine, and taste wine, and talk about wine, and to
outdo each other in giving their guests the most costly
wines, are not to be diverted easily from their objects. The
hard-drinking days are past, but the hard `talking days' are
in their vigour. If it could be understood, generally, that
even in England it is deemed vulgar to descant on the
liquor that is put upon the table, perhaps we might get rid
of the practice too. Vulgar in England! It is even
deemed vulgar here, by the right sort, as I am ready to
maintain, and indeed know of my own observation. That
one or two friends who are participating in the benefits of
some particularly benevolent bottle, should say a word in
commendation of its merits, is natural enough, and well
enough; no one can reasonably find any fault with such a
sign of grateful feeling; but I know of nothing more
revolting
than to see twenty grave faces arrayed round a table,
employed as so many tasters at a Rhenish wine sale, while
the cheeks of their host look like those of Boreas, owing to
the process of sucking syphons.
When my dear grandmother rose, imitated by the four
bright-faced girls, who did as she set the example, and
said, as was customary with the old school, Well,
gentlemen
,
I leave you to your wine; but you will recollect
that you will be most welcome guests in the
drawing-room
,
my uncle caught her hand, and insisted she
should not quit us. There was something exceedingly
touching, to my eyes, in the sort of intercourse, and in the
affection which existed between my uncle Ro and his mother.
A bachelor himself, while she was a widow, they were
particularly
fond of each other; and many is the time that I
have seen him go up to her, when we were alone, and pat
her cheeks, and then kiss them, as one might do so to a
much-beloved sister. My grandmother always received
these little liberties with perfect good-humour, and with
evident
affection. In her turn, I have frequently known her to
approach `Roger,' as she always called him, and kiss his
bald head, in a way that denoted she vividly remembered
the time when he was an infant in her arms. On this
occasion
she yielded to his request, and resumed her seat, the
girls imitating her, nothing loth, as they had done in rising.
The conversation then, naturally enough, reverted to the
state of the country.
It has much surprised me, that the men in authority
among us have confined all their remarks and statements to
the facts of the Rensselaer and Livingston estates, observed
my grandmother, when there are difficulties existing in
so many others.
The explanation is very simple, my good mother,
answered uncle Ro. The Rensselaer estates have the
quarter-sales, and chickens, and days' works; and there is
much of the
ad captandum
argument about such things, that
does very well to work up for political effect; whereas, on
the other estates, these great auxiliaries must be laid aside.
It is just as certain, as it is that the sun has risen this day,
that an extensive and concerted plan exists to transfer the
freehold rights of the landlords, on nearly every property
in the State, to the tenants; and that, too, on conditions
unjustly favourable to the last; but you will find nothing
of the sort in the messages of governors, or speeches of
legislators, who seem to think all is said, when they have
dwelt on the expediency of appeasing the complaints of the
tenants, as a high political duty, without stopping to inquire
whether those complaints are founded in right or not. The
injury that will be done to the republic, by showing men
how much can be effected by clamour, is of itself
incalculable
.
It would take a generation to do away the evil
consequences
of the example, were the anti-rent combination
to be utterly defeated to-morrow.
I find that the general argument against the landlords
is a want of title, in those cases in which nothing better can
be found, observed Mr. Warren. The lecturer, to-day,
seemed to condemn any title that was derived from the
king, as defeated by the conquest over that monarch, by the
war of the revolution.
A most charming consummation that would have been
for the heroic deeds of the Littlepages! There were my
father, grandfather, and great-grandfather, all in arms, in
that war; the two first as general officers, and the last as
a major; and the result of all their hardships and dangers
is to be to rob themselves of their own property! I am
aware that this silly pretence has been urged, even in a
court of justice; but folly, and wrong, and madness, are
not yet quite ripe enough among us, to carry such a
doctrine
down. As `coming events cast their shadows before,'
it is possible we are to take this very movement, however,
as the dawn of the approaching day of American reason,
and not as a twilight left by the departed rays of a sun of
a period of mental darkness.
You surely do not apprehend, uncle Ro, that these
people can really get Hugh's lands away from him!
exclaimed
Patt, reddening with anxiety and anger.
No one can say, my dear; for, certainly, no one is
safe when opinions and acts, like those which have been
circulated and attempted among us of late years, can be
acted on without awakening very general indignation. Look
to the moneyed classes at this very moment; agonized and
excited on the subject of a war about Oregona thing very
5 *
little likely to occur, though certainly possible; while they
manifest the utmost indifference to this anti-rentism, though
the positive existence of everything connected with just
social organization is directly involved in its fate. One is
a bare possibility, but it convulses the class I have named;
while the other is connected with the existence of civilized
society itself; yet it has ceased to attract attention, and is
nearly forgotten! Every man in the community, whose
means raise him at all above the common level, has a direct
interest in facing this danger, and in endeavouring to put it
down; but scarcely any one appears to be conscious of the
importance of the crisis. We have only one or two more
steps to make, in order to become like Turkey; a country
in which the wealthy are obliged to conceal their means,
in order to protect it from the grasp of the government;
but no one seems to care at all about it!
Some recent travellers among us have said that we have
nearly reached that pass already, as our rich affect great
simplicity and plainness in public, while they fill their houses
in private with all the usual evidences of wealth and luxury.
I think de Tocqueville, among others, makes that remark.
Ay, that is merely one of the ordinarily sagacious
remarks
of the European, who, by not understanding the
American
history, confounds causes and makes mistakes. The
plainness of things in public is no more than an ancient
habit of the country, while the elegance and luxury in
private
are a very simple and natural consequence of the tastes
of women who live in a state of society in which they are
limited to the very minimum of refined habits and intellectual
pleasures. The writer who made this mistake is a very clever
man, and has exceeding merit, considering his means of
ascertaining
truth; but he has made very many similar blunders.
Nevertheless, Mr. Littlepage, resumed the rector, who
was a gentleman, in all the senses of the word, and knew
the world, and the best part of it, too, even while he had
preserved an admirable simplicity of character, changes
have
certainly taken place among us, of the nature alluded
to by M. de Tocqueville.
That is quite true, sir; but they have also taken place
elsewhere. When I was a boy, I can well remember to
have seen coaches-and-six in this country, and almost every
man of fortune drove his coach-and-four; whereas, now,
such a thing is of the rarest occurrence possible. But the
same is true all over christendom; for when I first went to
Europe, coaches-and-six, with outriders, and all that sort of
state, was an every-day thing; whereas it is now never, or
at least very seldom, seen. Improved roads, steam-boats,
and railroads, can produce such changes, without having
recourse to the oppression of the masses.
I am sure, put in Patt, laughing, if publicity be what
Mons. de Tocqueville requires, there is publicity enough in
New York! All the new-fashioned houses are so
constructed
,
with their low balconies and lower windows, that
anybody
can see in at their windows. If what I have read and
heard of a Paris house be true, standing between
cour et
jurdin
, there is infinitely more of privacy there than here;
and one might just as well say that the Parisians bury
themselves
behind
porte cochres
, and among trees, to escape the
attacks of the Faubourg St. Antoine, as to say we retreat
into our houses to be fine, lest the mobocracy would not
tolerate us.
The girl has profited by your letters, I see, Hugh, said
my uncle, nodding his head in approbation; and what is
more, she makes a suitable application of her tuition, or,
rather, of yours. No, no, all that is a mistake; and, as
Martha says, no houses are so much in the street as those
of the new style in our own towns. It would be far more
just to say that, instead of retiring within doors to be fine,
as Patt calls it, unseen by envious neighbours, the
Manhattanese
,
in particular, turn their dwellings wrong side out,
lest their neighbours should take offence at not being
permitted
to see all that is going on within. But, neither is
true. The house is the more showy because it is most under
woman's control; and it would be just as near the truth to
say that the reason why the American men appear abroad
in plain blue, and black, and brown clothes, while their
wives and daughters are at home in silks and satins  ay,
even in modern brocadesis an apprehension of the masses,
as to ascribe the plainness of street life, compared to that
within doors, to the same cause. There is a good deal of
difference between a
salon
in the Faubourg, or the Chausse
d'Autin, and even on the Boulevard des Italiens. But, John
is craning with his neck, out there on the piazza, as if our
red brethren were at hand.
So it was, in point of fact, and everybody now rose from
table, without ceremony, and went forth to meet our guests.
We had barely time to reach the lawn, the ladies having
run for their hats in the meantime, before Prairiefire,
Flintyheart
,
Manytongues, and all the rest of them, came up, on
the sort of half trot that distinguishes an Indian's march.
Notwithstanding the change in our dresses, my uncle and
myself were instantly recognised, and courteously saluted
by the principal chiefs. Then our wigs were gravely
offered
to us, by two of the younger men; but we declined
receiving them, begging the gentlemen who had them in
keeping, to do us the honour to accept them, as tokens of
our particular regard. This was done with great good will,
and with a pleasure that was much too obvious to be
concealed
.
Half an hour later, I observed that each of the
young forest dandies had a wig on his otherwise naked head,
with a peacock's feather stuck quite knowingly in the lank
hair. The effect was somewhat ludicrous; particularly on
the young ladies; but I saw that each of the warriors
himself
looked round, as if to ask for the admiration that he
felt his appearance ought to awaken!
No sooner were the salutations exchanged, than the
red-men
began to examine the housethe cliff on which it stood
the meadows beneath, and the surrounding ground. At
first, we supposed, that they were struck with the extent and
solidity of the buildings, together with a certain air of finish
and neatness, that is not everywhere seen in America, even
in the vicinity of its better-class houses; but Manytongues
soon undeceived us. My uncle asked him, why all the
red-men
had broken off, and scattered themselves around the
buildings, some looking here, others pointing there, and all
manifestly earnest and much engaged with something;
though it was not easy to understand what that something
was; intimating his supposition that they might be struck
with the buildings.
Lord bless ye, no sir, answered the interpreter; they
don't care a straw about the house, or any house. There's
Flintyheart, in particular; he's a chief that you can no more
move with riches, and large housen, and sich like matters,
than you can make the Mississippi run up stream. When
we went to Uncle Sam's house, at Washington, he scarce
condescended to look at it; and the Capitol had no more
effect
on any on 'em, than if it had been a better sort of
wigwam
;
not so much, for that matter, as Injins be curious in
wigwams. What's put 'em up, on a trail like, just now, is
the knowledge that this is the spot where a battle was fit,
something like ninety seasons ago, in which the Upright
Onondago was consarned, as well as some of their own
people
on t'other sidethat's what's put 'em in commotion.
And why does Flintyheart talk to those around him
with so much energy; and point to the flats, and the cliff,
and the ravine yonder, that lies beyond the wigwam of
Susquesus?
Ah! Is that, then, the wigwam of the Upright
Onondago
!
exclaimed the interpreter, betraying some such
interest
as one might manifest on unexpectedly being told that
he saw Mount Vernon or Monticello, for the first time in his
life. Well, it's something to have seen
that;
though it
will be more to see the man himself; for all the tribes on the
upper prairies, are full of his story and his behaviour. No
Injin, since the time of Tamenund himself, has made as
much talk, of late years, as Susquesus, the Upright
Onondago
,
unless it might be Tecumthe, perhaps. But, what
occupies
Flintyheart, just at this moment, is an account of the
battle, in which his father's grandfather lost his life, though
he did not lose his scalp. That disgrace he is now telling
on 'em, he escaped, and glad enough is his descendant, that
it was so. It's no great matter to an Injin to be killed; but
he'd rather escape losing his scalp, or being struck at all by
the inimy, if it can possibly be made to turn out so. Now
he's talking of some young pale-face that was killed, whom
he calls Lover of Funand, now he's got on some nigger,
who he says fit like a devil.
All these persons are known to us, by
our
traditions,
also! exclaimed my uncle, with more interest than I had
known him manifest for many a day. But I 'm amazed to
find that the Indians retain so accurate an account of such
small matters, for so long a time.
It isn't a small matter to them. Their battles is seldom
on a very great scale, and they make great account of any
skrimmage in which noted warriors have fallen. Here
Manytongues paused for a minute, and listened attentively
to the discourse of the chiefs; after which he resumed his
explanations. They have met with a great difficulty in
the house, he continued, while everything else is right.
They understand the cliff of rocks, the position of the
buildings
themselves, that ravine thereaway, and all the rest of
the things hereabouts, except the house.
What may be the difficulty with the house? Does it
not stand in the place it ought to occupy?
That 's just their difficulty. It
does
stand where it ought
to stand, but it isn't the right sort of house, though they say
the shape agrees well enough  one side out to the fields,
like; two sides running back to the cliff, and the cliff itself
for the other. But their traditions say that their warriors
indivour'd to burn out your forefathers, and that they built
a fire again' the side of the buildin', which they never would
have done had it been built of stone, as this house is built.
That 's
what partic'larly puzzles them.
Then their traditions are surprisingly minute and
accurate
!
The house which then stood on, or near this spot,
and which did resemble the present building in the ground
plan,
was
of squared logs, and might have been set on fire,
and an attempt was actually made to do so, but was
successfully
resisted. Your chiefs have had a true account;
but changes have been made here. The house of logs stood
near fifty years, when it was replaced by this dwelling,
which was originally erected about sixty years ago, and
has been added to since, on the old design. No, no  the
traditions are surprisingly accurate.
This gave the Indians great satisfaction, as soon as the
fact was communicated to them; and from that instant all
their doubts and uncertainty were ended. Their own
knowledge
of the progress of things in a settlement, gave them
the means of comprehending any other changes; though the
shape of this building having so nearly corresponded with
that of which their traditions spoke, they had become
embarrassed
by the difference in the material. While they
were still continuing their examinations, and ascertaining
localities to their own satisfaction, my uncle and myself
continued the discourse with Manytongues.
I am curious to know, said my uncle, what may be
the history of Susquesus, that a party of chiefs like these
should travel so far out of their way, to pay him the
homage
of a visit. Is his great age the cause?
That is one reason, sartainly; though there is another,
that is of more account, but which is known only to
themselves
.
I have often tried to get the history out of them,
but never could succeed. As long as I can remember, the
Onondagoes, and Tuscaroras, and the Injins of the old New
York tribes, that have found their way up to the prairies,
have talked of the Upright Onondago, who must have been
an old man when I was born. Of late years, they have
talked more and more of him; and so good an opportunity
offering to come and see him, there would have been great
disappointment out West, had it been neglected. His age
is, no doubt, one principal cause; but there is another, though
I have never been able to discover what it is.
This Indian has been in communication, and connected
with my immediate family, now near, if not quite ninety
years. He was with my grandfather, Cornelius Littlepage,
in the attack on Ty, that was made by Abercrombie, in
1758; and here we are within twelve or thirteen years of a
century from that event. I believe my great-grandfather,
Herman Mordaunt, had even some previous knowledge of
him. As long as I can remember, he has been a
grey-headed
old man; and we suppose both he and the negro
who lives with him, to have seen fully a hundred and twenty
years, if not more.
Something of importance happened to Susquesus, or the
Trackless, as he was then called, about ninety-three winters
ago; that much I've gathered from what has fallen from
the chiefs at different times; but, what that something was,
it has exceeded my means to discover. At any rate, it has
quite as much to do with this visit as the Withered Hemlock's
great age. Injins respect years; and they respect wisdom
highly; but they respect courage and justice most of all.
The tarm `Upright' has its meaning, depend on't.
We were greatly interested by all this, as indeed were my
grandmother and her sweet companions. Mary Warren, in
particular, manifested a lively interest in Susquesus' history,
as was betrayed in a brief dialogue I now had with her,
walking to and fro in front of the piazza, while the rest of
the party were curiously watching the movements of the
still excited savages.
My father and I have often visited the two old men,
and have been deeply interested in them, observed this
intelligent, yet simple-minded girl,  with the Indian, in
particular, we have felt a strong sympathy, for nothing is
plainer than the keenness with which he still feels on the
subject of his own people. We have been told that he is
often visited by red-menor, at least, as often as any come
near him; and they are said ever to exhibit a great
reverence
for his years, and respect for his character.
This I know to be true, for I have frequently seen those
who have come to pay him visits. But they have usually
been merely your basket-making, half-and-half sort of
savages
,
who have possessed the characteristics of neither
race, entirely. This is the first instance in which I have
heard of so marked a demonstration of respecthow is that,
dear grandmother? can you recall any other instance of
Susquesus's receiving such a decided mark of homage from
his own people as this?
This is the third within my recollection, Hugh. Shortly
after my marriage, which was not long after the revolution,
as you may know, there was a party here on a visit to
Susquesus
.
It remained ten days. The chiefs it contained
were said to be Onondagoes altogether, or warriors of his
own particular people; and something like a
misunderstanding
was reported to have been made up; though what it was,
I confess I was too thoughtless then to inquire. Both my
father-in-law, and my uncle Chainbearer, it was always
believed, knew the whole of the Trackless' story, though
neither ever related it to me. I do not believe your
grandfather
knew it, added the venerable speaker, with a sort of
tender regret, or I think I should have heard it. But that
first visit was soon after Susquesus and Jaaf took possession
of their house, and it was reported, at the time, that the
strangers remained so long, in the hope of inducing Sus to
rejoin his tribe. If such was their wish, however, it failed;
for there he is now, and there he has ever been since he
first went to the hut.
And the second visit, grandmother  you mentioned
that there were three.
Oh! tell us of them all, Mrs. Littlepage, added Mary
earnestly, blushing up to the eyes the moment after at her
own eagerness. My dear grandmother smiled
benevolently
on both, and I though she looked a little archly at
us, as old ladies sometimes will, when the images of their
own youth recur to their minds.
You appear to have a common sympathy in these
red-men
,
my children, she answered, Mary fairly blushing
scarlet at hearing herself thus coupled with me in the term
`children,'and I have great pleasure in gratifying your
curiosity. The second great visit that Susquesus received
from Indians occurred the very year you were born, Hugh,
and then we really felt afraid we might lose the old man;
so earnest were his own people in their entreaties that he
would go away with them. But he would not. Here he
has remained ever since, and a few weeks ago he told me
that here he should die. If these Indians hope to prevail
any better, I am sure they will be disappointed.
So he told my father, also, added Mary Warren, who
has often spoken to him of death, and has hoped to open
his eyes to the truths of the gospel.
With what success, Miss Warren? That is a
consummation
which would terminate the old man's career most
worthily.
With little, I fear, answered the charming girl, in a
low, melancholy tone. At least, I know that my father
has been disappointed. Sus listens to him attentively, but
he manifests no feeling beyond respect for the speaker.
Attempts
have been made to induce him to enter the church
before, but
You were about to add something, Miss Warren, which
still remains to be said.
I can add it for her, resumed my grandmother, for
certain I am that Mary Warren will never add it herself.
The fact is, as you must know, Hugh, from your own
observation
,
that Mr. Warren's predecessor was an unfaithful and
selfish servant of the churchone who did little good to
any, not even himself. In this country it takes a good deal,
Vol. II.  6
in a clergyman, to wear out the patience of a people; but it
can be done; and when they once get to look at him
through the same medium as that with which other men are
viewed, a reaction follows, under which he is certain to
suffer
.
We could all wish to throw a veil over the conduct of
the late incumbent of St. Andrew's, but it requires one so
much thicker and larger than common, that the task is not
easy. Mary has merely meant that better instruction, and
a closer attention to duty, might have done more for
Trackless
twenty years ago, than they can do to-day.
How much injury, after all, faithless ministers can do
to the church of God! One such bad example unsettles
more minds than twenty good examples keep steady.
I do not know that, Hugh; but of one thing I am
certain
that
more evil is done by pretending to struggle for
the honour of the church, by attempting to sustain its
unworthy
ministers, than could be done by at once admitting
their offences, in cases that are clear. We all know that
the ministers of the altar are but men, and as such are to
be expected to fallcertain to do so without Divine aidbut
if we cannot make its ministers pure, we ought to do all we
can to keep the altar itself from contamination.
Yes, yes, grandmother  but the day has gone by for
ex
officio
religion in the American branch of the churchhere
Mary Warren joined the other girlsat least. And it is
so best. Suspicions may be base and unworthy, but a blind
credulity is contemptible. If I see a chestnut forming on
yonder branch, it would be an act of exceeding folly in me
to suppose that the tree was a walnut, though all the
nursery-men
in the country were ready to swear to it.
My grandmother smiled, but she also walked away, when
I joined my uncle again.
The interpreter tells me, Hugh, said the last, that
the chiefs wish to pay their first visit to the hut this evening.
Luckily, the old farm-house is empty just now, since Miller
has taken possession of the new one; and I have directed
Mr. Manytongues to establish himself there, while he and
his party remain here. There is a kitchen, all ready for
their use, and it is only to send over a few cooking utensils,
that is to say, a pot or two, and fifty bundles of straw, to
set them up in housekeeping. For all this I have just given
orders, not wishing to disturb you, or possibly unwilling to
lay down a guardian's authority; and there is the straw
already loading up in yonder barn-yard. In half an hour
they may rank themselves among the pot-wollopers of
Ravensnest
.
Shall we go with them to the house before, or after they
have paid their visit to Susquesus?
Before, certainly. John has volunteered to go over and
let the Onondago know the honour that is intended him, and
to assist him in making his toilet; for the red man would
not like to be taken in undress any more than another.
While this is doing, we can instal our guests in their new
abode, and see the preparations commenced for their supper.
As for the `
Injins
,' there is little to apprehend from them, I
fancy, so long as we have a strong party of the real Simon
Pures within call.
After this, we invited the interpreter to lead his chiefs
towards the dwelling they were to occupy, preceding the
party ourselves, and leaving the ladies on the lawn. At that
season, the days were at the longest, and it would be
pleasanter
to pay the visit to the hut in the cool of the evening
than to go at an earlier hour. My grandmother ordered
her covered wagon before we left her, intending to be
present
at an interview which everybody felt must be most
interesting
.
The empty building which was thus appropriated to the
use of the Indians was quite a century old, having been
erected by my ancestor, Herman Mordaunt, as the original
farm-house on his own particular farm. For a long time it
had been used in its original character; and when it was
found convenient to erect another, in a more eligible spot,
and of more convenient form, this old structure had been
preserved as a relic, and from year to year its removal had
been talked of, but not effected. It remained, therefore, for
me to decide on its fate, unless, indeed, the `spirit of the
Institutions' should happen to get hold of it, and take its
control out of my hands, along with that of the rest of
my property, by way of demonstrating to manking how
thoroughly the great State of New York is imbued with a
love of rational liberty!
As we walked towards the old farm-house, Miller came
from the other building to meet us. He had learned that
his friends, the pedlars, were hiswhat shall I call myself?
`Master' would be the
legal
term, and it would be good
English; but it would give the honourable gentleman
and his friends mortal offence, and I am not now to learn
that there are those among us who deny facts that are as
plain as the noses on their faces, and who fly right into the
face of the law whenever it is convenient. I shall not,
however, call myself a boss to please even these eminent
statesmen, and therefore must be content with using a term
that, if the moving spirits of the day can prevail, will soon
be sufficiently close in its signification, and call myself Tom
Miller'snothing.
It was enough to see that Miller was a good deal
embarrassed
with the dilemma in which he was placed. For a
great many years he and his family had been in the
employment
of me and mine, receiving ample pay, as all such men
ever dowhen they are so unfortunate as to serve a
malignant
aristocratmuch higher pay than they would get in
the service of your Newcomes, and Holmeses, and Tubbses,
besides far better treatment in all essentials; and now he had
only to carry out the principles of the anti-renters to claim
the farm he and they had so long worked, as of right. Yes,
the same principles would just as soon give this hireling my
home and farm as it would give any tenant on my estate
that which he worked. It is true, one party received wages,
while the other paid rent; but these facts do not affect the
principle at all; since he who received the wages got no
other benefit from his toil, while he who paid the rent was
master of all the cropsI beg pardon, the
boss
of all the
crops. The common title of bothif any title at all exist
is the circumstance that each had expended his labour on a
particular farm, and consequently had a right to own it for
all future time.
Miller made some awkward apologies for not recognising
me, and endeavoured to explain away one or two little things
that he must have felt put him in rather an awkward
position
,
but to which neither my uncle nor myself attached any
moment. We knew that poor Tom was human, and that
the easiest of all transgressions for a man to fall into were
those connected with his self-love; and that the temptation
to a man who has the consciousness of not being anywhere
near the summit of the social ladder, is a strong inducement
to err when he thinks there is a chance of getting up a
round or two; failing of success in which, it requires higher
feelings, and perhaps a higher station, than that of Tom
Miller's, not to leave him open to a certain demoniacal
gratification which so many experience at the prospect of
beholding others dragged down to their own level. We
heard Tom's excuses kindly, but did not commit ourselves
by promises or declarations of any sort.
CHAPTER V.
Two hundred years! two hundred years!
How much of human power and pride,
What glorious hopes, what gloomy fears,
Have sunk beneath their noiseless tide!
Pierpont
.
It
wanted about an hour to sunset,or sun-
down
, to use
our common Americanismwhen we all left the new
quarters
of our red brethren, in order to visit the huts. As the
moment approached, it was easy to trace in the Indians the
evidence of strong interest; mingled, as we fancied, with a
little awe. Several of the chiefs had improved the
intervening
time, to retouch the wild conceits that they had
previously
painted on their visages, rendering their countenances
still more appalling. Flintyheart, in particular, was
conspicuous
in his grim embellishments; though Prairiefire had
not laid any veil between the eye and his natural hue.
As the course of my narrative will now render it
necessary
to relate conversations that occurred in languages and
dialects of which I know literally nothing, it may be well to
say here, once for all, that I got as close a translation of
everything
that passed, as it was possible to obtain, from
Manytongues
;
and wrote it all down, either on the spot, or
immediately
after returning to the Nest. This explanation may be
necessary
6 *
in order to prevent some of those who may read
this manuscript, from fancying that I am inventing.
The carriage of my grandmother had left the door, filled
with its smiling freight, several minutes before we took up
our line of march. This last, however, was not done
without
a little ceremony, and some attention to order. As
Indians
rarely march except in what is called Indian file,
or singly, each man following in the footsteps of his leader,
such was the mode of advancing adopted on the present
occasion
.
The Prairiefire led the line, as the oldest chief, and
the one most distinguished in council. Flintyheart was
second, while the others were arranged by some rule of
precedency that was known to themselves. As soon as the
line had formed, it commenced its march; my uncle, the
interpreter, and myself walking at the side of Prairiefire,
while Miller, followed by half-a-dozen of the curious from
the Nest House and the farm, followed in the rear.
It will be remembered that John had been sent to the hut
to announce the intended visit. His stay had been much
longer than was anticipated; but when the procession had
gone about half the distance it was to march, it was met by
this faithful domestic, on his return. The worthy fellow
wheeled into line, on my flank, and communicated what he
had to say while keeping up with the column.
To own the truth, Mr. Hugh, he said, the old man
was more moved by hearing that about fifty Indians had
come a long distance to see him
Seventeenyou should have said seventeen, John; that
being the exact number.
Is it, sir? Well, I declare that I thought there might
be fiftyI once thought of calling 'em forty, sir, but it then
occurred to me that it might not be enough. All this time
John was looking over his shoulder to count the
grave-looking
warriors who followed in a line; and satisfied of his
mistake, one of the commonest in the world for men of his
class, that of exaggeration, he resumed his report. Well,
sir, I
do
believe you are right, and I have been a little hout.
But old Sus was quite moved, sir, when I told him of the
intended visit, and so I stayed to help the old gentleman to
dress and paint; for that nigger, Yop, is of no more use
now, you know, sir, than if he had never lived in a
gentleman's
family at all. It must have been hawful times, sir,
when the gentry of York had nothing but niggers to serve
'em, sir.
We did pretty well, John, notwithstanding, unswered
my uncle, who had a strong attachment to the old black
race, that once so generally filled all the menial stations of
the country, as is apt to be the case with all gentlemen
of fifty; we did pretty well, notwithstanding. Jaaf,
however
,
never acted strictly as a body-servant, though he was
my grandfather's own man.
Well, sir, if there had been nobody but Yop at the hut,
Sus would never have been decently dressed and painted for
this occasion. As it is, I hope that you will be satisfied,
sir, for the old gentleman looks remarkably well;Indian
fashion, you know, sir.
Did the Onondago ask any questions?
Why, you know how it is with him in that particular,
Mr. Hugh. He's a very silent person, is Susquesus; most
remarkable so when he 'as any one has can entertain him
with conversation.
I
talked most of the time myself, sir,
has I commonly does when I pays him a wisit. Indians is
remarkably silent, in general, I believe, sir.
And whose idea was it to paint and dressyours, or
the Onondago's?.
Why, sir, I supposes the hidear to be Indian, by origin,
though in this case it was my surgestion. Yes, sir, I
surgested the thought; though I will not take it on myself
to say Sus had not some hinclination that way, even before
I 'inted my hopinion.
Did you think of the paint? put in uncle Ro. I do
not remember to have seen the Trackless in his paint these
thirty years. I once asked him to paint and dress on a
Fourth of July; it was about the time you were born,
Hughand I remember the old fellow's answer as well as
if it were given yesterday. `When the tree ceases to bear
fruit,' was the substance of his reply, `blossoms only remind
the observer of its uselessness.'
I have heard that Susquesus was once considered very
eloquent, even for an Indian.
I remember him to have had some such reputation,
though I will not answer for its justice. Occasionally, I
have heard strong expressions in his brief, clipping manner
of speaking English,but, in common, he has been
content
to be simple and taciturn. I remember to have heard
my father say that when be first made the acquaintance of
Susquesus, and that must have been quite sixty years since,
the old man had great apprehension of being reduced to
the mortifying necessity of making baskets and brooms;
but, his dread on that subject once removed, he had ever
after seemed satisfied and without care.
Without care is the condition of those who have least,
I believe, sir. It would not be an easy matter for the
government of New York to devise ways and means to
deprive Sus of
his
farms, either by instituting suits for title,
destroying quarter-sales, laying taxes, or resorting to any
other of the ingenious expedients known to the Albany
politics.
My uncle did not answer for quite a minute; when he
did, it was thoughtfully and with great deliberation of
manner.
Your term of `Albany Politics' has recalled to my
mind, he said, a consideration that has often forced itself
upon my reflections. There is doubtless an advantage
nay, there may be a necessity for cutting up the local affairs
of this country, by entrusting their management to so many
local governments; but there is, out of all question, one
great evil consequent on it. When legislators have the
great affairs of state on their hands, the making of war and
peace, the maintaining of armies, and the control of all those
interests which connect one country with another, the mind
gets to be enlarged, and with it the character and
disposition
of the man. But, bring men together, who
must
act,
or appear incapable of acting, and set them at work upon
the smaller concerns of legislation, and it's ten to one but
they betray the narrowness of their education by the
narrowness
of their views. This is the reason of the vast
difference
that every intelligent man knows to exist between
Albany and Washington.
Do you then think our legislators so much inferior to
those of Europe?
Only, as they are provincial; which nine in ten
necessarily
are, since nine Americans in ten, even among the
educated classes, are decidedly provincial. This term `
provincial'
covers quite one-half of the distinctive sins of the
country, though many laugh at a deficiency, of which, in
the nature of things, they can have no notion, as purely
a matter of the imagination. The active communications
of the Americans certainly render them surprisingly little
obnoxious to such a charge, for their age and geographical
position. These last disadvantages produce effects,
nevertheless
,
that are perhaps unavoidable. When you have had
an opportunity of seeing something of the society of the
towns, for instance, after your intercourse with the world of
Europe, you will understand what I mean, for it is a
difference
much more readily
felt
than
described
.
Provincialism
,
however, may be defined as a general tendency to
the narrow views which mark a contracted association, and
an ignorance of the great worldnot in the sense of
station
solely, but in the sense of liberality, intelligence, and a
knowledge of all the varied interests of life. But, here we
are, at the hut.
There we were, sure enough. The evening was
delightful
.
Susquesus had seated himself on a stool, on the green
sward that extended for some distance around the door of
his habitation, and where he was a little in shade, protected
from the strong rays of a setting, but June, sun. A tree
cast its shadow over his person. Jaaf was posted on one
side, as no doubt, he himself thought best became his colour
and character. It is another trait of human nature, that
while the negro affects a great contempt and aversion for the
red-man, the Indian feels his own mental superiority to the
domestic slave. I had never seen Susquesus in so grand
costume, as that in which he appeared this evening.
Habitually
he wore his Indian vestments; the leggings,
mocasin
,
breech-piece, blanket or calico shirt, according to the
season; but I had never before seen him in his ornaments
and paint. The first consisted of two medals which bore
the images, the one of George III, the other of his
grandfather
of
two more, bestowed by the agents of the republic;
of large rings in his ears, that dropped nearly to his
shoulders
,
and of bracelets formed of the teeth of some animal,
that, at first, I was afraid was a man. A tomahawk that
was kept as bright as friction could make it, and a sheathed
knife, were in his girdle, while his well-tried rifle stood
leaning
against a tree; weapons that were now exhibited as
emblems of the past, since their owner could scarcely
render
either very effective. The old man had used the paint
with unusual judgment for an Indian, merely tinging his
cheeks with a colour that served to give brightness to eyes
that had once been keen as intense expression could render
them, but which were now somewhat dimmed by age. In
other respects, nothing was changed in the customary neat
simplicity that reigned in and around the cabin, though Jaaf
had brought out, as if to sun, an old livery coat of his own,
that he had formerly worn, and a cocked hat, in which I
have been told he was wont actually to exhibit himself of
Sundays, and holidays; reminders of the superiority of a
nigger over an Injin.
Three or four rude benches, which belonged to the
establishment
of the hut, were placed at a short distance in front
of Susquesus, in a sort of semicircle, for the reception of
his guests. Towards these benches, then, Prairiefire led the
way, followed by all the chiefs. Although they soon ranged
themselves in the circle, not one took his seat for fully a
minute. That time they all stood gazing intently, but
reverently
,
towards the aged man before them, who returned
their look, as steadily and intently as it was given. Then,
at a signal from their leader, who on this occasion was
Prairiefire
,
every man seated himself. This change of position,
however, did not cause the silence to be broken; but there
they all sat, for quite ten minutes, gazing at the Upright
Onondago, who, in his turn, kept his look steadily fastened
on his visiters. It was during this interval of silence that
the carriage of my grandmother drove up, and stopped just
without the circle of grave, attentive Indians, not one of
whom even turned his head to ascertain who or what caused
the interruption. No one spoke; my dear grandmother
being a profoundly attentive observer of the scene, while all
the bright faces around her, were so many eloquent pictures
of curiosity, blended with some gentler and better feelings,
exhibited in the most pleasing form of which humanity is
susceptible.
At length Susquesus himself arose, which he did with
great dignity of manner, and without any visible bodily
effort, and spoke. His voice was a little tremulous, I
thought, though more through feeling than age; but, on the
whole, he was calm, and surprisingly connected and clear
considering his great age. Of course, I was indebted to
Manytongues for the interpretation of all that passed.
Brethren, commenced Susquesus, you are welcome.
You have travelled on a long, and crooked, and thorny path,
to find an old chief, whose tribe ought ninety summers ago
to have looked upon him as among the departed. I am
sorry no better sight will meet your eyes at the end of so
long a journey. I would make the path back toward the
setting sun broader and straighter if I knew how. But I
do not know how. I am old. The pine in the woods is
scarce older; the villages of the pale-faces, through so
many of which you have journeyed, are not half so old;
I was born when the white race were like the moose on the
hills; here and there one; now they are like the pigeons
after they have hatched their young. When I was a boy,
my young legs could never run out of the woods into a
clearing; now, my old legs cannot carry me into the woods,
they are so far off. Everything is changed in the land,
but the red-man's heart.
That
is like the rock which never
alters. My children, you are welcome.
That speech, pronounced in the deep husky tones of
extreme
old age, yet relieved by the fire of a spirit that was
smothered rather than extinct, produced a profound
impression
.
A low murmur of admiration passed among the
guests, though neither rose to answer, until a sufficient time
had seemed to pass, in which the wisdom that they had just
been listeners to might make its proper impression. When
this pause was thought to be sufficiently long to have
produced
its effect, Prairiefire, a chief more celebrated in
council
even than in the field, arose to answer. His speech,
freely translated, was in the following words.
Father;your words are always wisethey are
always
true. The path between your wigwam and our
villages
is
a long oneit is a crooked path, and many thorns
and stones have been found on it. But all difficulties may
be overcome. Two moons ago, we were at one end of it;
now we are at the other end. We have come with two
notches on our sticks. One notch told us to go to the Great
Council House of the Pale-face, to see our great pale-face
Fatherthe other notch told us to come here, to see our
great Red Father. We have been to the great Council
House of the Pale-faces; we have seen Uncle Sam. His
arm is very long; it reaches from the salt lake, the water
of which we tried to drink, but it is too salt, to our own
lakes, near the setting sun, of which the water is sweet. We
never tasted water that was salt before, and we do not find
it pleasant. We shall never taste it again; it is not worth
while to come so far to drink water that is salt.
Uncle Sam is a wise chief. He has many counsellors.
The council at his council-fire must be a great councilit
has much to say. Its words ought to have some good in
them, they are so many. We thought of our Red Father,
while listening to them, and wanted to come here. We
have
come here. We are glad to find our Red Father still
alive and well. The Great Spirit loves a just Indian, and
takes care of him. A hundred winters, in his eyes, are like
a single winter. We are thankful to him for having led us
by the crooked and long path, at the end of which we have
found the Tracklessthe Upright of the Onondagoes. I
have spoken.
A gleam of happiness shot into the swarthy lineaments
of Susquesus, as he heard, in his own language, a
well-merited
appellation that had not greeted his ears for a period
as long as the ordinary life of man. It was a title, a
cognomen
that told the story of his connection with his tribe;
and neither years, nor distance, nor new scenes, nor new
ties, nor wars, nor strifes had caused him to forget the
smallest incident connected with that tale. I gazed at the
old man with awe, as his countenance became illuminated
by the flood of recollections that was rushing into it, through
the channel of his memory, and the expressive glance my
uncle threw at me, said how much he was impressed, also.
One of the faculties of Manytongues was to be able to
interpret
,
pari passu
with the speaker; and, standing between
us and the carriage, he kept up, sentence by sentence, a low
accompaniment of each speech, so that none of us lost a
syllable of what was said.
As soon as Prairiefire resumed his seat, another silence
succeeded. It lasted several minutes, during which the only
audible sounds were various discontented grunts,
accompanied
by suppressed mutterings on the part of old Jaaf, who
never could tolerate any Indian but his companion. That
the negro was dissatisfied with this extraordinary visit was
sufficiently apparent to us, but not one of all the red men
took heed of his deportment. Sus, who was nearest to him,
must have heard his low grumbling, but it did not induce
him to change his look from the countenances of those in
his front for a single moment. On the other hand, the
visiters
themselves seemed totally unconscious of the negro's
presence, though in fact they were not, as subsequently
appeared
.
In a word, the Upright Onondago was the centre
of attraction for them, all other things being apparently
forgotten
for the time.
At length there was a slight movement among the
red-skins
,
and another arose. This man was positively the
least well-looking of the whole party. His stature was lower
than that of the rest of the Indians; his form was meagre
and ungracefulthe last, at least, while his mind was in a
state of rest; and his appearance, generally, was wanting
in that nobleness of exterior which so singularly marked
that of every one of his companions. As I afterwards
learned, the name of this Indian was Eaglesflight, being so
called from the soaring character of the eloquence in which
he had been known to indulge. On the present occasion,
though his manner was serious and his countenance
interested
,
the spirit within was not heaving with any of its
extraordinary
throes. Still, such a man could not rise to
speak, and avoid creating some slight sensation among his
expectant auditors. Guarded as are the red-men in
general
on the subject of betraying their emotions, we could
detect something like a suppressed movement among his
friends when Eaglesflight stood erect. The orator
commenced
in a low but solemn manner, his tones changing
from the deep, impressive guttural, to the gentle and
pathetic
,
in a way to constitute eloquence of itself. As I
listened, I fancied that never before did the human voice
seem to possess so much winning power. The utterance
was slow and impressive, as is usually the case with true
orators.
The Great Spirit makes men differently, commenced
Vol. II.  7
Eaglesflight. Some are like willows, that bend with the
breeze and are broken in the storm. Some are pines, with
slender trunks, few branches, and a soft wood. Now and
then there is an oak among them, which grows on the
prairie
,
stretching its branches a great way, and making a
pleasant
shade. This wood is hard; it lasts a long time. Why
has the Great Spirit made this difference in trees?  why
does the Great Spirit make this difference in men? There
is a reason for it.
He
knows it, though we may not. What
he does is always right?
I have heard orators at our Council Fires complain that
things should be as they are. They say that the land, and
the lakes, and the rivers, and the hunting-grounds, belong
to the red-man only, and that no other colour ought ever to
be seen there. The Great Spirit has thought otherwise, and
what he thinks happens. Men are of many colours. Some
are red, which is the colour of my father. Some are pale,
which is the colour of my friends. Some are black, which
is the colour of my father's friend. He is black, though old
age is changing his skin. All this is right; it comes from
the Great Spirit, and we must not complain.
My father says he is very old  that the pine in the
woods is scarce older. We know it. That is one reason
why we have come so far to see him, though there is
another
reason. My father knows what that other reason is;
so do we. For a hundred winters and summers, that reason
has not gone out of our minds. The old men have told it
to the young men; and the young men, when they have
grown older, have told it to their sons. In this way it has
reached our ears. How many bad Indians have lived in
that time, have died, and are forgotten! It is the good
Indian
that lives longest in our memories. We wish to forget
that the wicked ever were in our tribes. We never forget
the good.
I have seen many changes. I am but a child,
compared
with my father; but I feel the cold of sixty winters
in my bones. During all that time, the red-men have been
travelling towards the setting sun. I sometimes think I
shall live to reach it! It must be a great way off, but the
man who never stops goes far. Let us go there, pale-faces
will follow. Why all this is, I do not know. My father is
wiser than his son, and he may be able to tell us. I sit
down to hear his answer.
Although Eaglesflight had spoken so quietly, and
concluded
in a manner so different from what I had expected,
there was a deep interest in what was now going on. The
particular reason why these red-men had come so far out
of their way to visit Susquesus had not yet been revealed,
as we all hoped would be the case; but the profound
reverence
that these strangers, from the wilds of the far west,
manifested for our aged friend, gave every assurance that
when we did learn it, there would be no reason for
disappointment
.
As usual, a pause succeeded the brief address
of the last speaker; after which, Susquesus once more
arose, and spoke.
My children, he said, I am very old. Fifty autumns
ago, when the leaves fell, I thought it was time for me to
pass on to the Happy Hunting-Grounds of my people, and
be a redskin again. But my name was not called. I have
been left alone here, in the midst of the pale-face fields,
and houses, and villages, without a single being of my own
colour and race to speak to. My head was almost grown
white. Still, as years came on my head, the spirit turned
more towards my youth. I began to forget the battles, and
hunts, and journeys of middle life, and to think of the
things seen when a young chief among the Onondagoes.
My day is now a dream, in which I dream of the past.
Why is the eye of Susquesus so far-seeing, after a hundred
winters and more? Can any one tell? I think not. We
do not understand the Great Spirit, and we do not
understand
his doings. Here I am, where I have been for half
my days. That big wigwam is the wigwam of my best
friends. Though their faces are pale, and mine is red, our
hearts have the same colour. I never forget
them
no,
not one of them. I see them all, from the oldest to the
youngest. They seem to be of my blood. This comes
from friendship, and many kindnesses. These are all the
pale-faces I now see. Red-men stand before my eyes in
all other places. My mind is with them.
My children, you are young. Seventy winters are a
great many for one of you. It is not so with me. Why
I have been left standing alone here, near the
hunting-grounds
of our fathers, is more than I can say. So it is,
and it is right. A withered hemlock is sometimes seen,
standing by itself, in the fields of the pale-faces. I am
such a tree. It is not cut down, because the wood is of no
use, and even the squaws do not like it to cook by. When
the winds blow, they seem to blow around it. It is tired of
standing there alone, but it cannot fall. That tree wishes
for the axe, but no man puts the axe to its root. Its time
has not come. So it is with me  my time has not come.
Children, my days now are dreams of my tribe. I see
the wigwam of my father. It was the best in the village.
He was a chief, and venison was never scarce in his lodge.
I see him come off the war-path with many scalps on his
pole. He had plenty of wampum, and wore many medals.
The scalps on his pole were sometimes from red-men,
sometimes
from pale-faces. He took them all himself. I see my
mother, too. She loved me as the she-bear loves her cubs.
I had brothers and sisters, and I see them, too. They
laugh and play, and seem happy. There is the spring
where we dipped up water in our gourds, and here is the
hill where we lay waiting for the warriors to come in from
the war-paths and the hunt. Everything looks pleasant to
me. That was a village of the Onondagoes, my own people,
and I loved them a hundred and twenty winters ago. I love
them now, as if the time were but one winter and one
summer
.
The mind does not feel time. For fifty seasons I
thought but little of my own people. My thoughts were on
the hunt and the war-path, and on the quarrels of the
pale-faces
,
with whom I lived. Now, I say again, I think most
of the past, and of my young days. It is a great mystery
why we can see things that are so far off so plainly, and
cannot see things that are so near by. Still, it is so.
Children, you ask why the red-men keep moving
to-wards
the setting sun, and why the pale-faces follow? You
ask if the place where the sun sets will be ever reached, and
if pale-men will go there to plough and to build, and to cut
down the trees. He that has seen what
has
happened,
ought to know what
will
happen again. I am very old, but
I see nothing new. One day is like another. The same
fruits come each summer, and the winters are alike. The
bird builds in the same tree many times.
My children, I have lived long among the pale-faces.
Still, my heart is of the same colour as my face. I have
never forgotten that I am a red-man; never forgotten the
Onondagoes. When I was young, beautiful woods covered
these fields. Far and near the buck and the moose leaped
among the trees. Nothing but the hunter stopped them. It
is all changed! The plough has frightened away the deer.
The moose will not stay near the sound of the church-bell.
He does not know what it means. The deer goes first.
The red-man keeps on his trail, and the pale-face is never
far behind. So it has been since the big canoes of the
stranger first came into our waters; so it will be until
another salt lake is reached beneath the setting sun. When
that other lake is seen, the red-man must stop, and die in
the open fields, where rum, and tobacco, and bread are
plenty, or march on into the great salt lake of the west and
be drowned.
Why
this is so I cannot tell. That it has been
so, I know; that it
will
be so, I believe. There is a
reason
for it; none can tell what that reason is but the Great
Spirit.
Susquesus had spoken calmly and clearly, and
Manytongues
translated as he proceeded, sentence by sentence.
So profound was the attention of the savage listeners that I
heard their suppressed breathings. We white men are so
occupied with ourselves, and our own passing concerns, look
on all other races of human beings as so much our inferiors,
that it is seldom we have time or inclination to reflect on the
consequences of our own acts. Like the wheel that rolls
along the highway, however, many is the inferior creature
that we heedlessly crush in our path. Thus has it been with
the red-man, and, as the Trackless had said, thus will it
continue to be. He will be driven to the salt lake of the far
west, where he must plunge in and be drowned, or turn and
die in the midst of abundance.
My uncle Ro knew more of the Indians, and of their
habits
,
than any one else of our party, unless it might be my
grandmother. She, indeed, had seen a good deal of them
in early life; and when quite a young girl, dwelling with
that uncle of her own who went by the
sobriquet
of the
Chainbearer, she had even dwelt in the woods, near the
tribe of Susquesus, and had often heard him named there
7 *
as an Indian in high repute, although he was even at that
distant day an exile from his people. When our old friend
resumed his seat, she beckoned her son and myself to the
side of the carriage, and spoke to us on the subject of what
had just been uttered, the translation of Manytongues
having
been loud enough to let the whole party hear what he
said.
This is not a visit of business, but one of ceremony
only, she said. To-morrow, probably, the real object of
the strangers will be made known. All that has passed, as
yet, has been complimentary, mixed with a little desire to
hear the wisdom of the sage. The red-man is never in a
hurry, impatience being a failing that he is apt to impute to
us women. Well, though we are females, we can wait. In
the mean time, some of us can weep, as you see is
particularly
the case with Miss Mary Warren.
This was true enough; the fine eyes of all four of the
girls glistening with tears, while the cheeks of the person
named were quite wet with those that had streamed down
them. At this allusion to such an excess of sympathy, the
young lady dried her eyes, and the colour heightened so
much in her face, that I thought it best to avert my looks.
While this by play was going on, Prairiefire arose again,
and concluded the proceedings of that preliminary visit, by
making another short speech:
Father, he said, we thank you. What we have heard
will not be forgotten. All red-men are afraid of that Great
Salt Lake, under the setting sun, and in which some say it
dips every night. What you have told us, will make us
think more of it. We have come a great distance, and are
tired. We will now go to our wigwam, and eat, and sleep.
To-morrow, when the sun is up here, pointing to a part
of the heavens that would indicate something like nine
o'clock, we will come again, and open our ears. The
Great Spirit who has spared you so long, will spare you
until then, and we shall not forget to come. It is too
pleasant
to us to be near you, for us to forget. Farewell.
The Indians now rose in a body, and stood regarding
Susquesus fully a minute, in profound silence, when they
filed off at a quick pace, and followed their leader towards
their quarters for the night. As the train noiselessly wound
its way from before him, a shade passed athwart the dark
countenance of the Trackless, and he smiled no more that
day.
All this time the negro, the contemporary of the Indian,
kept muttering his discontent at seeing so many redskins in
his presence, unheeded and indeed unheard by his friend.
What you do wid dem Injin, he growled, as the party
disappeared. No good ebber come of sich as dem. How
many time dey work debbletry in a wood, and you and I
not werry far off, Sus. How ole you got, redskin; and
forgetful! Nobody can hold out wid colour' man. Gosh!
I do b'lieve I lib for ebber, sometime! It won'erful to think
of, how long I stay on dis werry 'arth!
Such exclamations were not uncommon with the aged
Jaaf, and no one noted them. He did not seem to expect
any answer himself, nor did any one appear to deem it at
all necessary to make one. As for the Trackless, he arose
with a saddened countenance, and moved into his hut like
one who wished to be left alone with his thoughts. My
grandmother ordered the carriage to move on, and the rest
of us returned to the house on foot.
CHAPTER VI.
With all thy rural echoes come,
Sweet comrade of the rosy day,
Wafting the wild bee's gentle hum,
Or cuckoo's plaintive roundelay.
Campbell
.
That
night was passed under my own roof, in the family
circle. Although my presence on the estate was now
generally
known, to all who were interested in it. I cannot say
that I thought much of the anti-renters, or of any risks
incurred
by the discovery. The craven spirit manifested by
the `Injins' in presence of the Indians, the assumed before
the real, had not a tendency to awaken much respect for the
disaffected, and quite likely disposed me to be more
indifferent
to their proceedings, than I might otherwise have been.
At all events, I was happy with Patt, and Mary, and my
uncle's wards, and did not give the disorganizers a thought,
until quite at the close of the evening. The manner in which
John went about to barricade the doors and windows, after
the ladies had retired, struck me unpleasantly, however, and
it did not fail to produce the same effect on my uncle. This
seemingly important duty was done, when my faithful
maitre-d'hotel
,
for such, in a measure, was the Englishman's
station, came to me, and my uncle, who were waiting for
his appearance in the library, armed like Robinson Crusoe.
He brought us each a revolving pistol, and a rifle, with a
proper allowance of ammunition.
Missus, so John persevered in calling my grandmother,
though it was very unlike an English servant to do so, after
he had been in the country three monthsMissus as
hordered
harms to be laid in, in quantities, Mr. Hugh, and
hall of us has our rifles and pistols, just like these. She
keeps some for herself and Miss Martha, in her own room
still, but as she supposes you can make better use of these
than the maids, I had her orders to bring them down out of
the maids' room, and hoffer them to yourselves, gentlemen.
They are hall loaded, and smart weapons be they.
Surely there has been no occasion as yet, for using
such things as these! exclaimed my uncle.
One doesn't know, Mr. Roger, when the hinimy may
come. We have had only three alarms since the ladies
arrived
,
and most luckily no blood was shed; though we fired
at the hinimy, and the hinimy fired at us. When I says
no blood was spilt, I should add, on our side; for there was
no way to know how much the anti's suffered, and they
hadn't good stone walls to cover them, as we 'ad on our side.
Gracious Providence! I had no notion of this! Hugh,
the country is in a worse state than I had supposed, and
we ought not to leave the ladies here an hour after
to-morrow
!
As the ladies who came within my uncle's category, did
not include Mary Warren, I did not take exactly the same
view of the subject as he did himself. Nothing further was
said on the subject, however; and shortly after each
shouldered
his rifle, and retired to his own room.
It was past midnight when I reached my apartment, but
I felt no inclination for sleep. That had been an important
day to me, one full of excitement, and I was still too much
under the influence of its circumstances to think of my bed.
There was soon a profound silence in the house, the closing
of doors and the sound of footsteps having ceased, and I went
to a window, to gaze on the scene without. There was a
three-quarters' moon, which gave light enough to render all
the nearer objects of the landscape distinctly visible. The
view had nothing remarkable in it, but it was always rural
and pretty. The little river, and the broad meadows, were
not to be seen from my side of the house, which commanded
the carriage road that wound through the lawnthe
farm-house
the
distant churchthe neat and pretty rectory
the dwelling of Mary, and a long reach of farms, that lay
along the valley, and on the broad breast of the rising
ground to the westward.
Everything, far and near, seemed buried in the quiet of
deep night. Even the cattle in the fields had lain down to
sleep; for, like man, they love to follow the law of nature,
and divide the hours by light and darkness. John had placed
the candles in my dressing-room, and closed the inner
shutters
;
but I had taken a seat by a window of the bed-room,
and sat in no other light but that which came from the moon,
which was now near setting. I might have been ruminating
on the events of the day half an hour or more, when I
fancied
some object was in motion on a path that led towards
the village, but which was quite distinct from the ordinary
highway. This path was private, indeed, running fully a
mile through my own farm and grounds, bounded for a
considerable
distance by high fences on each side of it, and
running
among the copses and thickets of the lawn, as soon as
it emerged from the fields. It had been made in order to
enable my grandfather to ride to his fields, uninterrupted by
gates or bars; and issuing into the bit of forest already
described
,
it passed through that by a short cut, and enabled
us to reach the hamlet by a road that saved nearly a mile
in the whole distance. This path was often used by those
who left the Nest, or who came to it, in the saddle, but
rarely by any but those who belonged to the family. Though
old as the place itself, it was little known by others not
suiting
the general taste for publicity, there not being a solitary
dwelling on it between the Nest House itself and the point
where it emerged into the highway, beyond the wood, which
was quite near to the village.
I could see the whole line of this private path, with the
exception, here and there, of intervals that were hid by trees
and thickets, from the point where it terminated until it
entered
the wood. There could be no mistake. Late as was
the hour, some one mounted was galloping along that path,
winding his or
her
way among the rails of the fences; now
plainly visible, then lost to view. I had caught a glimpse
of this phantom, (for at that unusual hour, and by that
delusive
light, it required no great effort of the imagination thus
to fancy the equestrian,) just as it emerged from the wood,
and could not well be mistaken as to the accuracy of my
discovery. The path led through a pretty wooded ravine
in the lawn, and no sooner did I lose sight of this strange
object than I turned my eyes eagerly to the spot where it
ought to reappear, on emerging from its cover.
The path lay in shadow for twenty rods on quitting the
ravine, after which it wound across the lawn to the door,
for about twice that distance, in full moonlight. At the
termination
of the shadow there was a noble oak, which stood
alone, and beneath its wide branches was a seat much
frequented
by the ladies in the heats of summer. My eye kept
moving from this point, where the light became strong, to
that where the path issued from the ravine. At the latter
it was just possible to distinguish a moving object, and, sure
enough, there I got my next view of the person I was
watching
.
The horse came up the ascent on a gallop  a pace
that was continued until its rider drew the rein beneath the
oak. Here, to my surprise, a female sprang from the
saddle
with great alacrity, and secured her steed within the
shadow of the tree. This was no sooner done than she
moved on towards the house, in much apparent haste.
Fearful
of disturbing the family, I now left my room on tiptoe,
and without a candle, the light of the moon penetrating the
passages in sufficient quantity to serve my purpose,
descending
as fast as possible to the lower floor. Swift and prompt
as had been my own movement, it had been anticipated by
another. To my great surprise, on reaching the little
side-door
to which the path led, and where the ladies had long
been accustomed to get into the saddle, when they used it,
I found a female figure, with her hand on the massive lock,
as if ready to turn its key at some expected summons. To
my great astonishment, on drawing nearer, I recognised, by
the faint light that penetrated through a little window over
the door, the person of Mary Warren!
I certainly started at this unexpected discovery, but, if she
who caused that start in me submitted to any similar
emotion
,
I did not discover it. She may have heard my step,
however, descending the stairs, and have been prepared for
the meeting.
You have seen her, too, have you, Mr. Littlepage!
exclaimed Mary, though she used the precaution to speak in
a suppressed tone. What
can
have brought her here at
this late hour?
You know who it is, then, Miss Warren? I answered,
feeling an indescribable pleasure succeed my surprise, as I
remembered the dear girl, who was fully dressed, just as
she had left the drawing-room an hour before, must have
been gazing out upon the moonlight view as well as myself;
a species of romance that proved something like a similarity
of tastes, if not a secret sympathy between us.
Certainly, returned Mary, steadily. I cannot well
be mistaken in the person, I think. It is Opportunity
Newcome
.
My hand was on the key, and I turned it in the lock.
A bar remained, and this I also removed, when we opened
the door. Sure enough, there came the person just named,
within ten feet of the steps, which she doubtless intended to
ascend. She manifested surprise on ascertaining who were
her porters, but hastened into the house, looking anxiously
behind her, as if distrustful of pursuit or observation. I led
the way to the library, lighted its lamp, and then turned to
my two silent companions, looking a request for
explanation
.
Opportunity was a young woman, in her twenty-sixth
year, and was not without considerable personal charms.
The exercise and excitement through which she had just
gone had heightened the colour in her cheeks, and rendered
her appearance unusually pleasing. Nevertheless,
Opportunity
was not a woman to awaken anything like the
passion
of love in me, though I had long been aware such was
her purpose. I suspected that her present business was
connected with this scheme, I will own, and was prepared
to listen to her communication with distrust. As for
Opportunity
herself, she hesitated about making her disclosures,
and the very first words she uttered were anything but
delicate
or feminine.
Well, I declare! exclaimed Opportunity, I did not
expect to find you two alone at this time of night!
I could have given her tongue a twitch to cure it of its
propensity to speak evil, but concern for Mary Warren,
induced
me to turn anxiously towards her. Never did the
steady self-possession of perfect innocence better assert itself
than in the dear girl at this rude assault; the innocence
which can leave no latent intention, or wish, to alarm the
feelings.
We had all retired, answered the pure-minded girl,
and everybody on my side of the house is in bed and
asleep, I believe; but I did not feel any drowsiness, and was
sitting at a window, looking out upon the view by this lovely
moonlight, when I saw you ride out of the woods, and follow
the lane. As you came up to the oak I knew who it was,
Opportunity, and ran down to admit you; for I was certain
something extraordinary must bring you here at this late
hour.
Oh! nothing extraordinary, at all! cried Miss
Opportunity
,
in a careless way. I love moonlight as well as
yourself, Mary, and am a desperate horsewoman, as you
know. I thought it would be romantic to gallop over to the
Nest, and go back between one and two in the morning.
Nothing more, I can assure you.
The coolness with which this was said amazed me not a
little, though I was not so silly as to believe a syllable of it.
Opportunity had a great deal of vulgar sentimentalism
about her, it is true  such as some girls are apt to mistake
for refinement; but she was not quite so bad as to travel
that lane, at midnight, and alone, without some special
object. It occurred to me that this object might be
connected
with her brother, and that she would naturally wish
to make her communications privately. We had all taken
seats at a table which occupied the centre of the room, Mary
and myself quite near each other, and Opportunity at a
distant
angle. I wrote on a slip of paper a short request for
Mary to leave me alone with our visiter, and laid it under
her eyes, without exciting Opportunity's suspicion; talking
to her, the whole time, about the night, and the weather,
and her ride. While we were thus engaged, Miss Warren
rose, and quietly glided out of the room. So silently was
this done, that I do not believe my remaining companion
was conscious of it at the moment.
You have driven Mary Warren away, Miss
Opportunity
,
I remarked, by the hint about our being alone
to-gether
.
Lord! there's no great harm in that! I am used to
being alone with gentlemen, and think nothing of it. But,
are we really alone, Mr. Hugh, and quite by ourselves?
Quite, as you see. Our two selves and Mary Warren
I believe to be the only persons in the house, out of our
beds. She has left us, a little hurt, perhaps, and we are
quite alone.
Oh! As for Mary Warren's feelings, I don't mind
them much, Mr. Hugh. She's a good critter  yes, this
elegant young lady actually used that extraordinary word
and as forgiving as religion. Besides, she 's only the
episcopal clergyman's daughter; and, take your family
away, that 's a denomination that would not stand long at
Ravensnest, I can tell you.
I am very glad, then, my family is not away, for it is
a denomination I both honour and love. So long as the
grasping and innovating spirit of the times leaves the
Littlepages
anything, a fair portion of their means shall be
given to support that congregation. As for Miss Warren,
I am pleased to hear that her temperament is so forgiving.
I know that well, and did not speak in the hope of
making any change in your views, Mr. Hugh. Mary
Warren
,
however, will not think much of my remark to-morrow;
I do not believe she thought half as much about it to-night
as I should have done, had it been made to
me
.
I fancy this was quite true; Mary Warren having
listened
to the insinuation as the guileless and innocent hear
innuendos that bring no consciousness with them, while
Opportunity's
Vol. II.  8
spirit would have been very apt to buckle on the
armour which practice had rendered well-fitting.
You have not taken this long ride merely to admire the
moon, Miss Opportunity, I now carelessly remarked,
willing
to bring things to a head. If you would favour me
with its real object, I should be pleased to learn it.
What if Mary should be standing at the keyhole,
listening
?
said this elegant `critter,' with the suspicion of a
vulgar mind. I wouldn't have her hear what I 've got to
tell you, for a mint of money.
I do not think there is much danger of that, I
answered
,
rising notwithstanding, and throwing open the door.
You perceive there is no one here, and we can converse
in safety.
Opportunity was not so easily satisfied. Of a gossiping,
craving disposition herself, in all things that pertain to
curiosity
,
it was not easy for her to imagine another could be
less guided by that feeling than herself. Rising, therefore,
she went on tiptoe to the passage, and examined it for
herself. Satisfied, at length, that we were not watched,
she returned to the room, closed the door softly, motioned
for me to be seated, placed herself quite near me, and then
appeared disposed to proceed to business.
This has been a dreadful day, Mr. Hugh, the young
woman now commenced, actually looking sorrowful, as I
make little doubt she really felt. Who could have thought
that the street-musician was you, and that old German
pedlar
of watches, Mr. Roger! I declare, the world seems to
be getting upside-down, and folks don't know when they 're
in their right places?
It was a foolish adventure, perhaps; but it has let us
into some most important secrets.
That 's just the difficulty. I defend you all I can,
and tell my brothers that you 've not done anything they
would n't do in a minute, if only half a farm depended on it,
while, in your case, it may be more than a hundred.
Your brothers then complain of my having appeared
among the anti-renters, in disguise?
They do, desperately, Mr. Hugh, and seem quite put
out about it. They say it was ungenerous to come in that
way into your own country, and steal their secrets from
them! I say all I can in your favour, but words wont pass
for much with men in such a taking. You know, Mr.
Hugh, I 've always been your friend, even from our childish
days, having got myself into more than one scrape to get
you out of them.
As Opportunity made this declaration, one a little loose
as to facts, by the way, she sighed gently, dropped her eyes,
and looked as conscious and confused as I believe it was at
all in her nature to appear. It was not my cue to betray
undue
bashfulness at such a moment, and as for any scruples
on the subject of misleading a confiding heart, I should as
soon have thought of feeding an anaconda or a boa
constrictor
with angle-worms. I look the young lady's hand,
therefore, squeezed it with as sentimental a pressure as I
knew how to use, and looked green enough about the eyes,
I dare say.
You are only too good, Opportunity, I answered.
Yes, I have ever relied on you as a friend, and have never
doubted you would defend me, when I was not present to
defend myself.
Here I released the hand, a little apprehensive I might
have the young lady sobbing on my shoulder, unless some
little moderation were observed. Opportunity manifested a
reluctance to let go her hold, but what could a young woman
do, when the gentleman himself exhibited so much
discretion
?
Yes, Seneky, in particular, is in a dreadful taking, she
resumed, and to pacify him, I consented to ride over
myself
,
at this time of night, to let you know what is
threatened
.
That is most kind of you, Opportunity; and, as it is so
late, had you not better tell your story at once, and then go
to a room and rest yourself, after so sharp a ride?
Tell my tale I will, for it 's high time you heard it; but,
as for rest, I must jump on my horse and gallop back the
moment the moon sets; sleep I must in my own bed this
night. Of course you and Mary Warren will both be silent
as to my visit, since it has been made for your good.
I promised for myself and Mary, and then pressed my
companion to delay no longer in imparting the information
she had ridden so far to bring. The story was soon told,
and proved to be sufficiently alarming. One portion of the
facts I got directly from Opportunity herself, while another
has been subsequently gleaned from various sources, all
being certain. The particular circumstances were these:
When Seneca followed the band of Injins and his
coanti-renters
,
in their precipitate retreat on the hamlet, his
revelations produced a general consternation. It then
became
known that the young Paris spendthrift was on his
own estate, that he had actually been among the disaffected
that day, had learned many of their secrets, and had
probably
made black marks against certain of the tenants, whose
leases were nearly expired. Bad as this was, of itself, it
was not the worst of the matter. Nothing was more certain
than the fact that this young landlord knew a few of those
who had committed felony, and might have sundry highly
probable suspicions as to others. The guilty lay at his
mercy, as a matter of course; and there was a sufficiency
of common sense left among these conspirators, to
understand
that a man, who must feel that attempts were making
to rob him of his estate, would be very likely to turn the
tables on his assailants, did an occasion offer. When men
embark in an undertaking as innately nefarious as that of
anti-rentism certainly is, when it is stripped of its pretensions
and stands in its naked deformity, they are not apt to stop
at trifles. To this desperate character of its mischief, the
country owes the general depression of truth that has
accompanied
its career, its false and dangerous principles, its
confusion between right and wrong, and finally its murders.
It has been the miserable prerogative of demagogues alone,
to defend its career and its demoralization. Thus has it
happened
,
that the country has seen the same quasi legislators
legislators, by the vote of a party and the courtesy of the
country, if by no other tenuresupporting, with an air of
high pretension, the very doubtful policy of attempting to
make men moral by statute law, on the one side, while
they go the full length of these property-depredators, on the
other! In such a state of society, it is not surprising that
any expedient should be adopted to intimidate and bully me
into silence. It was consequently determined, in a conclave
of the chiefs, that a complaint should be made against my
uncle and myself, before an anti-rent justice of the peace,
for felony under the recent statute, in appearing diguised
and armed, as a means of preventing our complaints
against the real offenders. It is true, we were not in masks;
but our disguises, nevertheless, were so effectual as possibly
to meet the contingency contemplated by the law, had we
been armed. As to weapons, however, we had been totally
and intentionally without anything of the sort; but oaths
cost villains, like those engaged in this plot, very little.
Those oaths had been taken, and warrants were actually
signed by the magistrate, of which the service was suspended
at Seneca's solicitation, merely to enable the last to effect
a compromise. It was not thought sufficient, however, to
menace my uncle and myself with a prosecution of this
nature; intimidation of another sort was to be put in
requisition
,
to enforce the dread of the legal proceedings; a
measure
which should let us see that our assailants were in
downright earnest. Opportunity had ascertained that
something
serious was to be attempted, and she believed that very
night, though what it was precisely was more than she knew;
or, knowing, was willing to communicate.
The object of this late visit, then, was to make terms for
her brother, or brothers; to apprize me of some unknown
but pressing danger, and to obtain all that influence in my
breast that might fairly be anticipated from services so
material
.
Beyond a question, I was fortunate in having such
a friend in the enemy's camp, though past experience had
taught me to be wary how I trusted my miserable and
sensitive
heart within the meshes of a net that had been so often
cast.
I am very sensible of the importance of your services,
Miss Opportunity, I said, when the voluble young lady had
told her tale, and shall not fail to bear it in mind. As for
making any direct arrangement with your brother Seneca,
that is out of the question, since it would be compromising
felony, and subject me to punishment; but I can be passive,
if I see fit, and your wishes will have great weight with me.
The attempt to arrest my uncle and myself, should it ever
be made, will only subject its instigators to action for
malicious
prosecutions, and gives me no concern. It is very
doubtful how far we were disguised, in the sense of the
statute, and it is certain we were not armed, in any
8 *
sense. Without perjury, therefore, such a prosecution must
fail
Folks take desperate oaths in anti-rent times!
interrupted
Opportunity, with a significant look.
I am quite aware of that. Human testimony, at the
best, is very frail, and often to be distrusted; but in seasons
of excitement, and passion, and cupidity, it is common to
find it corrupt. The most material thing, at present, is to
know precisely the nature of the evil they meditate against
us.
Opportunity's eye did not turn away, as mine was
fastened
on her while she answered this question, but retained
all the steadiness of sincerity.
I wish I could tell you, Mr. Hugh, she said; but I
can say no more than I have. Some injury will be attempted
this night, I feel certain; but what that injury will be, is
more than I know myself. I must now go home; for the
moon will be nearly down, and it would never do for me to
be seen by any of the antis. The little I
have
said in favour
of the Littlepages has made me enemies, as it is; but I never
should be forgiven, was this ride to be known.
Opportunity now rose, and smiling on me, as any other
rover might be supposed to fire a parting broadside, in order
to render the recollection of her presence as memorable as
possible, she hurried away. I accompanied her to the oak,
as a matter of course, and assisted her into her saddle.
Sundry
little passages of country coquetry occurred during these
movements, and the young lady manifested a reluctance to
depart, even when all was ready, though she was in so great a
hurry. Her game was certainly as desperate as that of the
anti-renters themselves, but it was a game she was
determined
to play out. The moon was not yet quite down, and
that circumstance served as a pretence for delay, while I
fancied that she might still have something in reserve to
communicate.
This has been so kind in you, dear Opportunity, I
said, laying my hand gently on the one of hers which held
the bridleso like old timesso like yourself, indeed
that I scarce know how to thank you. But we shall live to
have old-fashioned times again, when the former
communications
can be opened among us. Those were happy days,
when we all went galloping over the hills together; mere
boys and girls, it is true, but delighted boys and girls I hope
you will allow.
That they was  Opportunity's education and graces
did not extend to good grammar, in her ordinary discourse,
which many persons among us seem to fancy is
anti-republican
That
they was! And I should like to live 'em over
again. Never mind, Hugh; you 'll live to put down these
people, and then you 'll settle and marry. You mean to
marry, of course?
This was a pretty plain demonstration; but I was used to
it, as what young man of fortune is not?  and a danger
known is a danger avoided. I pressed the hand I held
gently
,
relinquished it, and then observed, in a somewhat
disappointed
tone
Well, I ought not to ask again, what is the particular
injury I am to expect to-night. A brother is nearer than a
friend, I know; and I can appreciate your difficulties.
Opportunity had actually given the spirited beast she
rode the rein, and was on the point of galloping off, when
these last words touched her heart. Leaning forward, and
bending her head down, so as to bring our faces within a
foot of each other, she said, in a low voice
Fire
is a good servant, but a hard master. A tea-kettle
of water thrown on it, at first, would have put out the last
great conflagration in York.
These words were no sooner uttered than the bold young
woman struck her horse a smart blow, and away she went,
galloping over the turf with an almost noiseless hoof. I
watched her for a moment, and saw her descend into the
ravine; when, left quite alone, there was abundant
opportunity
for reflection, though no longer any Opportunity to
look at.
Fire!That
was
an ominous word. It is the
instrument
of the low villain, and is an injury against which it is
difficult, indeed, to guard. It had been used in these anti-rent
troubles, though less, perhaps, than would have been the
case in almost any other country; the institutions of this,
even if they have introduced so many false and exaggerated
notions of liberty, having had a most beneficial effect in
lessening some of the other evils of humanity. Still, fire
had
been resorted to, and the term of `barn-burner' had got
to be common among us; far more common, I rejoice to
say, than the practice which gave it birth. Nevertheless,
it was clearly of the last importance to certain persons at
Ravensnest to frighten me from complaining, since their
crimes could only lead them to the State's prison, were
justice
done. I determined, therefore, not to lay my head on
a pillow that night, until assured that the danger was past.
The moon had now set, but the stars shed their twinkling
rays on the dusky landscape. I was not sorry for the
change, as it enabled me to move about with less risk of
being seen. The first thing was to seek some auxiliaries to
aid me in watching, and I at once decided to look for them
among my guests, the Indians. If fire will fight fire,
`Indian' ought to be a match for `Injin' any day. There
is just the difference between these two classes of men, that
their names would imply. The one is natural, dignified,
polished in his waynay, gentleman-like; while the other
is a sneaking scoundrel, and as vulgar as his own
appellation
.
No one would think of calling these last
masquerading
rogues Indians; by common consent, even the most
particular purist in language terms them Injins.
Il y a
chapeau et chapeau
, and there are Indian and Injin.
Without returning to the house, I took my way at once
towards the quarters of my red guests. Familiar with every
object around me, I kept so much within the shadows, and
moved across the lawn and fields by a route so hidden, that
there was not much risk of my being seen, even had there
been enemies on the look-out. The distance was not great,
and I soon stood at the foot of the little knoll on which the
old farm-house stood, sheltered in a manner by a dark row
of aged currants, which lined the bottom of an old and
half-deserted
garden. Here I paused to look about me, and to
reflect a moment, before I proceeded any further.
There stood the good, old, substantial residence of my
fathers, in shadowy outline, looming large and massive in its
form and aspect. It might be fired, certainly, but not with
much facility, on its exterior. With the exception of its
roof, its piazza, and its outside-doors, little wood was exposed
to an incendiary without; and a slight degree of
watchfulness
might suffice against such a danger. Then the law
punished arson of an inhabited dwelling with death, as it
should do, and your sneaking scoundrels seldom brave such
a penalty in this country. Much is said about the
impotency
of the punishment of the gallows, but no man can tell
how many thousand times it has stayed the hand and caused
the heart to quail. Until some one can appear among us,
who is able to reveal this important secret, it is idle to talk
about the few cases in which it is known that the risk of
death has been insufficient to prevent crime. One thing we
all know; other punishments exist, and crime is perpetrated
directly in
their
face, daily and hourly; and I cannot see
why such a circumstance should not be just as much of an
argument against the punishment of the penitentiary, as
against punishment by the gallows. For one, I am clearly
for keeping in existence the knowledge that there is a power
in the country, potent to sweep away the offender, when
cases of sufficient gravity occur to render the warning
wholesome.
CHAPTER VII.
O, time and death! with certain pace,
Though still unequal, hurrying on,
O'erturning, in your awful race,
The cot, the palace, and the throne!
Not always in the storm of war,
Not by the pestilence that sweeps
From the plague-smitten realms afar,
Beyond the old and solemn deeps.
Sands
.
Besides
the house with its walls of stone, however, there
were numerous out-buildings. The carriage-house, stables,
and home-barn, were all of stone also: but a brand thrown
into a hay-mow would easily produce a conflagration.
The barns, hay-ricks, &c., on the flats, and near the
dwelling
of Miller, were all of wood, according to the custom of
the country, and it was not death to set fire to a barn. The
`disguised and armed' who should commit this last offence,
would incur no other risk than that which had already been
incurred in carrying out his desperate plans. I thought of
these things for a moment, when I opened a passage through
the currant-bushes, intending to pass by a breach in the
decayed
fence into the garden, and thus by a private way to
the house. To my astonishment, and in a slight degree to
my alarm, a man stood before me the instant I emerged
from the thicket.
Who bewhere gowhat want? demanded one of the
real red-skins, significantly; this being a sentinel of the
party whose vigilance even my guarded approach had not
eluded.
I told him who I was, and that I came to seek the
interpreter
,
Manytongues. No sooner was I recognised, than my
red friend offered me his hand to shake, American fashion,
and seemed satisfied. He asked no question, manifested no
curiosity at this visit at an hour so unusual, and took it all
as one in ordinary life would receive a call in a morning
between the permitted hours of twelve and three.
Something
had brought me there, he must have known; but, what that
something was appeared to give him no concern. This man
accompanied me to the house, and pointed to the spot where
I should find the person I sought, snoring on his well-shaken
bundles of straw.
At the first touch of my finger, Manytongues awoke, and
stood erect. He recognised me in an instant, dark as was
the room, and touching my arm as a signal to follow, led
the way into the open air. After moving out of ear-shot, he
stopped and proceeded to business himself, like one
accustomed
to such interruptions.
Anything stirring to-night? demanded this
frontierman
,
with the coolness of one who was ever ready. Am
I to call my red-skins; or is it only a notice that is to be
given?
Of that you shall judge for yourself. You doubtless
know the condition of this part of the country, and the
troubles
that exist on the subject of the rents paid for the use of
the farms. What you saw to-day is a specimen of the
scenes that are now constantly acted among us.
Colonel, I can't say I do rightly understand the state of
things down here-a-way, drawled out the interpreter, after
yawning like a hound, and giving me the most favourite title
of the frontiers. It seems to be neither one thing nor
t'other; nuther tomahawk nor law. I can understand both
of
them
, but this half-and-half sort of thing bothers me, and
puts me out. You ought to have law, or you hadn't ought;
but what you have should be stuck to.
You mean that you do not find this part of the country
either civilized or savage. Not submitting to the laws, nor
yet permitting the natural appeal to force?
Something of that sort. The agent told me, when I
came on with this party of red-skins, that I was comin' down
into a quarter of the country where there was justices of the
peace, and that no man, red or pale, could or should right
himself. So we've all on us indivour'd to go by that rule;
and I can qualify that not a critter has been shot or scalped
since we crossed the Mississippi. Some sich law was
necessary
among us, as we came from different and hostile tribes,
and nothing would be easier than to breed a quarrel among
ourselves, if a body was so disposed. But, I must say, that
I'm not only disapp'inted myself, but most of my chiefs be
dreadfully disapp'inted likewise.
In what particular have you been most disappointed?
In many matters. The first thing that set me
a-thinkin'
was to hear folks read them newspapers. The way men
talk of each other, in them things, is wonderful, and to me
it's a surprise any's left, at the end of the year, to begin the
same game the next. Why, Colonel Littlepage
I am no colonelnot even an ensignyou must be
confounding me with some other of my family.
You
ought
to be, sir, and I shall not do you the
injustice
to call you by any lower title. I've known gentlemen
of not one-quarter your pretensions tarmed gin'rals, out
West. I've hunted on the prer-ies these twenty-five years,
and have now crossed the Upper Lakes six times, and know
what is due to a gentleman as well as any man. And so,
as I was sayin', Colonel Littlepage, was men to
talk
of each
other out on the prer-ies as they
print
of each other down
here among the meetin-'uses, scalps would be so plenty as
to fall considerable in valie. I'm not at all spiteful, but my
feelin's has been r'iled at only just
hearin
' 'em things
read;
for, as for reading myself, that's a thing I never
condescended
to. This somewhat prepared me for findin' things
different as I got deeper into the settlements, and I've not
been disapp'inted so far as them expectations wentit's the
old idee that's been crossed.
I am not astonished to hear this, and agree with you
entirely in thinking that the nations which can withstand a
press of which the general character is as degraded as that
of this country, must be composed of beings of a higher
order than man. But, to come to business; you must have
some notions of these mock savages, and of the people called
anti-renters?
Sort o', and sort o' not. I can't understand when a
man has agreed to pay rent, why he should not pay it. A
bargain is a bargain, and the word of a gentleman is as
good as his bond.
These opinions would surprise some among us, a few
legislators included.
They
appear to think that the moral
test of every engagement is whether the parties like it or
not.
One word, if you please, Colonel. Do they give in as
much to complaints of the owners of the sile as to the
complaints
of them that hire the land in order to work it?
Not at all. The complaints of the landlords would not
find a single sympathetic chord in the breast of the softest
hearted politician in America, let them be ever so
well-founded
.
Surely,
you
, who are a rover on the prairies, can
have no great respect for land titles?
The prer-ie is the prer-ie, Colonel, and men live and
act by prer-ie law on prer-ie ground. But right is right, too,
Colonel, as well as prer-ie is prer-ie; and I like to see it
pervail. I do not think you will find a red-skin among all
the chiefs who are asleep under that roof who will not give
his voice ag'in flying from the tarms of a solemn bargain.
A man must be well steeped in the ways of the law, I
should judge, to bring his mind to such an act.
Do these red-men, then, know anything of the nature
of the difficulties that exist here?
They have heard on 'em, and have talked a good deal
together on the subject. It's oppos
y
te to the very natur' of
an Indian, like, to agree to one thing, and to do another.
But, here is a Chippewa, who is on the look-out. I will ask
him a question, and you shall hear his answer.
Manytongues now spoke to the sentinel, who was
sauntering
near. After a brief exchange of questions and answers
in the tongue of the latter, the interpreter communicated what
had passed.
This Chippewa has heard somewhere, he said, that
there are folks in this part of the world who get into
wigwams
,
by agreeing to pay rent for them, and, when once in
possession, they want to fly from their agreements, and
make the man they got it from prove his right to it. Is that
true, Colonel?
It is true, out of all question, and not only do the tenants
wish to enact this treachery, but they have found others,
that call themselves legislators, who are willing to sustain
them in the fraud. It is much as if you should borrow, or
hire a rifle for a day's sporting, and when the man who let
you have it, came to claim it at night, you should tell him
to prove he was the right owner.
What's that to me? I got the rifle of him; have no right
but such as he had; and am bound to stand by my bargain.
No. no. Colonel; not a redskin on the prer-ies but would
revolutionize at that! But, what may have brought you
here, at this time o' night? Them that sleep in beds, don't
like to quit them 'till mornin' comes to tell 'em to rise.
I then gave Manytongues an account of the visit I had
received, without mentioning the name of Opportunity,
however
,
and related the nature of the warning I had heard.
The interpreter was, in no wise, disturbed at this prospect
of a collision with the Injins, against whom he had a grudge,
not only on account of the little affair of the preceding day,
but mainly in consequence of their having brought real
savages into discredit, by the craven and clumsy manner in
which they had carried out their imitation.
Nothin' better is to be expected from such critturs, he
observed, after we had discussed the matter together, at
some little length, though fire is held to be lawful warfare,
even on the prer-ies. For my part, I'm not at all sorry
there is something to do; nor will my chiefs be melancholy
on this account, for it is dull work to be doing nothing, for
months and months at a time, but smoking at councils,
Vol. II.  9
making speeches to folks who live by talking, and eating
and drinking. Activity is the natur' of a prer-ie man, and
he's always glad to pick his flint, after a spell of
considerable
quiet. I'll tell the Chippewa to step in, and bring out
the redskins, a'ter which you can give your orders.
I could wish watchfulness rather than violence. The
men can lie in watch, near the principal buildings, and it
might be well to have some water ready, to extinguish any
flames that may be lighted, before they get too far ahead.
Just as you say, Colonel, for you are my
Captain-General
.
But, I can tell you how I did once, out on the prer-ies,
when I caught a rascal of a Sioux blowing a fire he had
kindled
at one of my own lodges. I just laid him on the flames,
and let him put them out himself by bleeding on them.
We must have no violence, unless it become
indispensable
to save the buildings. The law will not justify us, in
using our arms, except in the last extremity. Prisoners I
wish you to take; for they may serve as hostages, besides
furnishing examples to intimidate other offenders. I rely
on you to give due warning to our red friends, on this
subject.
The interpreter gave a sort of grunt, but he said nothing.
The conversation went no farther, however, just then; for,
by this time, the Indians came stealing out of the house,
every man of them armed, looking dusky, prepared and full
of wariness. Manytongues did not keep them long, but
soon told his story. After this, his authority appeared, in a
great measure, to cease. Flintyheart was now the most
prominent of the party, though Prairiefire, and another
warrior
,
were also connected with the orders given to the rest.
I observed that Eaglesflight had no part in these
arrangements
,
which were peculiarly military, though he appeared,
armed and ready, and went forth on the sudden call, like
the rest. In five minutes the Indians were all off,
principally
in pairs, leaving the interpreter and myself still
standing
together, in front of the deserted house.
It was, by this time, past one o'clock, and I thought it
probable my enemies would soon appear, if they came
that night. Accompanied by the interpreter, I took the
way towards the Nest House, it occurring to me that arms
might be wanted, in the course of the morning. On
quitting
my room, the rifle and pistol provided by John had
been left there, and I thought of stealing into the house
again, obtaining those weapons, extinguish my lights, and
rejoin my present companion, without giving alarm to any
of the sleepers.
This plan was successfully executed, so far as ascending
to my room and descending to the door were concerned,
but there it met with an interruption. While in the very
act of closing the little postern, as we used to call it, by
way of pleasantry, I felt a small soft hand laid on the one
of my own which was drawing to the door after me. In
an instant I had turned, and was at the side of Mary
Warren
.
I expressed my surprise at finding her still up, and
concern lest she might suffer in health, in consequence of
so much unusual watchfulness.
I could not sleep after what has passed to-night, she
answered, without knowing the meaning of all these
movements. I have been looking from my window, and
saw you assist Opportunity to get on her horse, and
afterward
walk towards the old farm-house, where the Indians
are lodged. Tell me frankly, Mr. Littlepage, is there any
danger to be apprehended?
I shall be frank with you, Mary  how easy and
pleasant it was to me to use this gentle familiarity, which
might now be assumed without appearing to be
presumptuous
,
under all the circumstances of our intercourse; I
shall be frank with you, Mary; for I know that your
prudence
and self-command will prevent any unnecessary
alarm, while your watchfulness may be of use. There is
some reason to fear the brand.
The brand!
So Opportunity has given me reason to suppose; and I
do not think she would have ridden the distance she did, at
such an hour, unless her business were serious. The brand
is the proper instrument of the anti-renter, and renders his
disguise convenient. I have got all the red-men on the
look-out, however; and I do not think that mischief can be
done to-night, without its being detected. To-morrow, we
can appeal to the authorities for protection.
I will not sleep this night! exclaimed Mary, drawing
the light shawl she wore, as a protection against the air of
that summer-night, more closely around her person, as a
sterner being might be supposed to gird on his armour in a
moment of peril. I care not for rest. They ought not,
they
shall
not, Mr. Littlepage, do you this wrong. Have
you apprehensions for this house?
One never knows. This house is not easily set fire to
from without, and I scarcely think there can be any enemy
within. The domestics are old and tried, and I do not believe
that either of them could be bought. I feel little
apprehension
,
therefore, from any within, while I confess to a good
deal from those without. Fire is such a dreadful foe, and
one is usually so helpless against its ravages in the
country
!
I will not ask you to retire, for I know you will not
nay, cannot sleep; but, by passing from window to
window
,
for the next hour, or until I rejoin you, your mind
will be occupied, and possibly some injury might be
prevented
.
An unseen observer from a window might detect
an attempt that would escape those on the watch without.
I will do so, said Mary, eagerly; and should I
discover
anything, I will open a leaf of the shutter of my own
room. You can then see the light of the candle within,
and by coming at once to this door, you will find me here,
ready to let you know my discovery.
With this understanding we parted, but not until I had
shaken hands affectionately with this gentle-looking, but
really resolute and clear-headed girl. I rejoined
Manytongues
,
who stood in the shadows of the piazza, where
there was no possibility of his being seen, except by one
quite near his person. After a brief explanation, we parted,
one taking the north side of the buildings, and the other the
south, in order to make certain no incendiary was at work
on either of the wings.
The Nest House was much less exposed to attempts like
those we apprehended, than most American dwellings. The
structure being of stone, left but little inflammable material
accessible; and the doors, on the exterior, were only two
those already mentioned. There was a great gate, it is
true; one large enough to admit a cart into the inner court,
on the southern face of the wing, beneath the arch of which
an incendiary might, indeed, make his attempt, though a
practised rogue would at once see the difficulties. Little
wood was even there, beyond that of the massive gate itself,
which, once burnt, would leave no further fuel for flames.
I examined the place, notwithstanding; and finding all safe
on my side of the building, I went to rejoin the interpreter,
who was to meet me at the foot of a fine beech, which spread
its broad arms over the lawn, at the distance of about a
hundred yards from the house, and so nearly in its front, as
to afford us, in all respects, the most eligible position for
sentinels on duty like ours, far or near.
At the foot of that beech I found Manytongues, and the
deep obscurity in which his form was embedded, was, of
itself, a high recommendation of the position. I did not see
him until almost near enough to touch him. He was seated
on a bench, and seemed entirely at his ease, like one
accustomed
to ambushes, vigilance, and midnight assaults. We
exchanged reports, ascertained all was well, and then I took
my seat at the interpreter's side, willing to beguile the time
by such discourse as occurred to my mind.
That was a most interesting scene, last evening, I
remarked
;
the interview between Old Trackless and your
red companions! I own a lively curiosity to know what
particular claim our aged friend has on those distant tribes,
that chiefs of note have come so far to see him?
They have not come all the way from the prer-ies, to
this spot, on any such ar'n'd, though I do not question their
readiness to do so. In the first place, old age, when
accompanied
by wisdom, and sobriety, and a good character, goes
a great way with savages, in gin'ral. But, there is
something
partic'lar about the acts of Susquesus that I do not
know, which raises him higher than common in redskin
eyes. I intend to l'arn what it is before we quit this country.
A pause succeeded; then I spoke of the prer-ies, as
almost all western men pronounce the word. I drew such
an outline of the life as I supposed my companion passed
there, thinking it might be agreeable to hear his own habits
and enjoyments extolled.
I 'll tell you how it is, Colonel, returned the
interpreter
,
with a little show of feeling; much more than he had
previously manifested on any occasion during our short
acquaintance
;
yes, I 'll jist tell you how it is. Prer-ie life
is
delightsome to them that loves freedom and justice.
9 *
Freedom I can understand, said I, interrupting him, in
my surprisebut as for justice, I should think that laws
are absolutely necessary.
Ay, that 's a settlement idee, I know, but it 's not as
true as some supposes. There is no court and jury like
this
, Colonel, slapping the breech of his rifle with energy;
and eastern powder conspired with Galena lead, makes
the best of attorneys. I 've tried both, and speak on
sartainty
.
Law druv' me out upon the prer-ies, and love for
them keeps me there. Down this-a-way, you 're neither one
thing nor tutherlaw nor rifle; for, if you
had
law, as law
ought
to be, you and I wouldn't be sitting here, at this time
of night, to prevent your mock Injins from setting fire to
your houses and barns.
There was only too much truth in this last position of
the straightforward interpreter to be gainsaid. After making
some proper allowances for the difficulties of the case, and
the unexpected circumstances, no impartial man could deny
that the laws had been trifled with, or things never would
have reached the pass they had: as Manytongues affirmed,
we had neither the protection of the law, nor the use of the
rifle. It ought to be written in letters of brass in all the
highways and places of resort in the country, that A STATE
OF SOCIETY WHICH PRETENDS TO THE PROTECTION THAT
BELONGS TO CIVILIZATION, AND FAILS TO GIVE IT, ONLY
MAKES THE CONDITION OF THE HONEST PORTION OF THE
COMMUNITY SO MUCH THE WORSE, BY DEPRIVING IT OF THE
PROTECTION CONFERRED BY NATURE, WITHOUT SUPPLYING
THE SUBSTITUTE.
I dare say the interpreter and I sat an hour under that
tree, conversing in low voices, on such matters and things
as came uppermost in our minds. There was a good deal
of true prer-ie philosophy in the opinions of my companion,
which is much as if one should say his notions were a
mixture
of clear natural justice and strong local prejudices.
The last sentiment he uttered was so very characteristic as
to merit particular notice.
I'll tell you how it is, Colonel, he said, right is
right, and nonsense is nonsense. If so be, we should
happen
to catch one of these mocking rascals firing your
house or barn, it would be a smart chance at justice to settle
things on the spot. If I had
my
way, I should just tie the
fellow, hands and feet, and toss him into the flames to help
him along with his own work. A rascal makes the best of
kindling-wood!
Just at that instant I saw an upper leaf of the inside shutter
of Mary Warren's room open, for my eye was resting on the
window at that very moment. The light had been brought
so near the opening as plainly to show the change, leaving no
doubt that my fair sentinel within had made some important
discovery. At such a summons I could not hesitate; but,
telling
Manytongues to continue his watchfulness, I went across
the lawn with the steps of youth and haste. In two minutes
my hand was on the latch of the little door; and, in two
seconds
more, it was open, and I found myself standing in front
of Mary Warren. A gesture from her hand induced me to be
cautious, and closing the door silently, I asked an explanation.
Speak not too loud, whispered the anxious girl,
preserving
a wonderful self-command, nevertheless, for the
extraordinary circumstances in which she was placed. I
have discovered them; they are here!
Here!not in the house, surely?
In the house itself!in the kitchen, where they are
kindling a fire on the floor at this instant. Come quickly;
there is not a moment to lose.
It may be well to explain here the arrangement of the
kitchens and offices, in order to render what is to follow the
more intelligible. The gateway mentioned cut the southern
wing of the house into two equal parts, the chambers,
however
,
extending the whole length, and of course passing
over it. On the western side of this gateway were certain
offices connected with the eating-rooms, and those
eating-rooms
themselves. On the eastern side were the kitchen,
servants' hall, scullery, &c., and a flight of narrow stairs
that led to the chambers occupied by the domestics. The
outside door to this latter portion of the building was
beneath
the arch of the gateway, one corresponding to it
opening on its opposite side, and by means of which the
service was ordinarily made. There was a court, environed
on three of its sides by the main edifice, and by the two
long, low wings that have been so often mentioned, while it
was open on the fourth to the cliff. This cliff was low,
and, while it was nearly perpendicular, it was possible for
an active man to ascend, or even to descend it, by clinging
to the rocks, which were sufficiently ragged to admit of
such an adventure. When a boy I had done both fifty
times, and it was a somewhat common experiment among
the male domestics and hirelings of the household. It
occurred to me at once that the incendiaries had most
probably
entered the house by ascending the cliff, the kitchen
of itself furnishing all the materials to light a conflagration.
The reader will be assured that, after receiving the
startling
communication of Mary Warren, I did not stop to
discuss
all these matters with her. My first impulse was to
desire her to run to the beech, and bid Manytongues join
me, but she refused to quit my side.
Nonono. You must not go to the kitchen alone,
she said, hurriedly. There are
two
of them, and desperate
looking wretches are they, with their faces blackened, and
they have muskets. Nonono. Come,
I
will
accompany
you.
I hesitated no longer, but moved forward, Mary keeping
close at my side. Fortunately, I had brought the rifle with
me, and the revolving pistol was in my pocket. We went
by the eating-rooms and offices, the course taken by Mary
herself on her watch; and who, in looking through a small
window of one of the last, that opened beneath the gateway,
had discovered what was going on, by means of a similar
window in the kitchen. As we went, the noble girl told me
that she had kept moving through the lower rooms of the
whole house during the time I had been on watch out of
doors, and, attracted by the light that gleamed through these
windows, she had distinctly seen two men, with
blackened
faces, kindling a fire in a corner of the kitchen, where
the flames must soon communicate with the stairs, by means
of which they would speedily reach the attics and the wood
work of the roof. Fortunately, the floors of all that part of
the house were made of bricks; that of the servants' hall
excepted, which was a room beyond the narrow passage
that contained the stairs. As soon as apprised of the danger,
Mary Warren had flown to the window of her own room, to
make the signal to me, and then to the door to meet me.
But three or four minutes had elapsed between the time
when she became apprised of the danger and that when we
were walking hurriedly to the window beneath the gateway.
A bright light, which shone through the opposite window.
announced the progress made by the incendiaries.
Requesting
Mary to remain where she was, I passed through the
door, and descended to the pavement of the gateway. The
little window beneath the arch was too high for my
purposes
,
when on that level, but there was a row of low
windows
that opened on the court. To one of these I moved
swiftly, and got a clear view of all that was passing within.
There they are! exclaimed Mary, who, neglectful of
my request, still kept close at my side. Two men with
blackened faces, and the wood of which they have made
their fire is blazing brightly.
The fire, now I saw it, did not confirm the dread I felt
when I had it before me only in imagination. The
stairway
had an open plaze beneath it, and on the brick floor
below had the incendiaries built their pile. It was
constructed
,
at the bottom, of some of the common wood that
was found there, in readiness for the wants of the cook in
the morning, lighted by coals taken from the fire-place. A
considerable pile had been made with the wood, which was
now burning pretty freely, and the two rascals were busy
piling on the chairs when I first saw them. They had made
a good beginning, and in ten or fifteen minutes longer there
is no doubt that all that portion of the house would have been
in flames.
You said they had muskets, I whispered to Mary. Do
you see them now?
No: when I saw them, each held his musket in one
hand, and worked with the other.
I could have shot the villains without difficulty or risk to
myself, but felt deeply averse to taking human life. Still,
there was the prospect of a serious struggle before me, and
I saw the necessity of obtaining assistance.
Will you go to my uncle's room, Mary, and tell him to
rise immediately. Then to the front door of the house, and
call out, Manytongues, come here as fast as possible.' It
will take but two minutes to do both, and I will watch these
rascals in the mean time.
I dread leaving you here alone with the wretches, Mr.
Littlepage, whispered Mary, gently.
An earnest entreaty on my part, however, induced her
to comply; and, no sooner did the dear girl set about the
accomplishment of the task, than she flew rather than ran.
It did not seem to me a minute ere I heard her call to the
interpreter
.
The night was so still, that, sweet as were those
tones, and busy as were the incendiaries, they heard them
too; or fancied they heard something which alarmed them.
They spoke to each other, looked intently at their infernal
work for a single instant, sought their arms, which were
standing in the corner of the kitchen, and were evidently
preparing to depart.
The crisis was near. There was not time to receive
assistance
before the two fellows would be out, and I must
either meet them in conflict, or suffer them to escape. My
first impression was to shoot down the leading man, and
grapple with the other ere he had time to prepare his arms.
But a timely thought prevented this hazardous step. The
incendiaries were retiring, and I had a doubt of the legality
of killing a retreating felon. I believed that
my
chances
before a jury would be far less than those of an ordinary
pick-pocket or highway robber, and had heard and read
enough to be certain there were thousands around me who
would fancy it a sufficient moral provocation for all which
had passed, that I held the fee of farms that other men
desired
to possess.
A majority of my countrymen will scout this idea as forced
and improbable. But, majorities are far from being
infallible
in their judgments. Let any discreet and observant man
take a near view of that which is daily going on around him.
If he do not find in men this disposition to distort principles,
to pervert justice, and to attain their ends regardless of the
means, then will I admit I do not understand human nature,
as human nature exhibits its deformity in this blessed
republic
of ours.
There was no time to lose, however; and the course I
actually decided to take will be soonest told by relating
things as they occurred. I heard the door open, and was
ready for action. Whether the incendiaries intended to
retreat by the cliff, or to open the gate, which was barred
within, I could not tell; but I was ready for either
alternative
.
No sooner did I hear a step on the pavement of the
gateway
than I discharged my rifle in the air. This was done
as an alarm-signal. Clubbing the piece, I sprang forward,
and felled the foremost of the two, with a sharp blow on his
hat. The fellow came down on the pavement like an ox
under the axe of the slaughter-house. Dropping the rifle, I
bounded over his body, and grappled with his companion.
All this was done so rapidly as to take the rascals
completely
by surprise. So sudden, indeed, was my assault on
the fellow who stood erect, that he was under the necessity
of dropping his rifle, and at it we went, clenched like bears
in the death-hug. I was young and active, but my
antagonist
was the stronger man of the two. He had also the
advantage of being practised in wrestling, and I soon went
down, my enemy falling on top of me. Luckily, I fell on
the body of the other incendiary, who was just beginning to
discover signs of consciousness after the crushing blow he
had received. My chance would now have been small but
for assistance. The incendiary had caught my
neck-handkerchief
,
and was twisting it to choke me, when I felt a
sudden relief. The light of the fire shone through the
kitchen doors, rendering everything distinct beneath the arch.
Mary came flying back just in time to rescue me. With a
resolution that did her honour, she caught up the rifle I had
dropped, and passed its small end between the bent arms of
my antagonist and his own back, raising it at the same time
like a lever. In the brief interval of breathing this ready
expedient gave me, I rallied my force, caught my enemy by
the throat, made a desperate effort, threw him off, and over
on his side, and was on my feet in an instant. Drawing the
pistol, I ordered the rascal to yield, or to take the
consequences
.
The sight of this weapon secured the victory, the
black-faced villain shrinking back into a corner, begging
piteously not to be shot. At the next moment, the
interpreter
appeared under the arch, followed by a stream of
red-skins
,
which had been turned in this direction by the alarm
given by my rifle.
CHAPTER VIII.
Ye say they all have passed away,
That noble race and brave;
That their light canoes have vanish'd
From off the crested wave;
That 'mid the forests where they roam'd
There rings no hunter's shout;
But their name is on your waters,
Ye may not wash it out.
Mrs. Sigourney
.
Directing
Manytongues to secure the two incendiaries,
I sprang into the kitchen to extinguish the flames. It was
high time, though Mary Warren had already anticipated me
here, too. She had actually thrown several dippers of water
upon the fire, which was beginning to crackle through the
pile of chairs, and had already succeeded in lessening the
flames. I knew that a hydrant stood in the kitchen itself,
which gave a full stream of water. Filling a pail, I threw
the contents on the flames; and repeating the application,
in half a minute the room was filled with vapour, and to the
bright light succeeded a darkness that was so deep as to
suggest
the necessity of finding lamps and candles.
The tumult produced by the scene just described soon
brought all in the house to the spot. The domestics, male
and female, came tumbling down the stairs, under which the
fire had been lighted, and presently candles were seen
glancing
about the house, in all directions.
I declare, Mr. Hugh, cried John, the moment he had
taken a survey of the state of the kitchen, this is worse
than Hireland, sir! The Hamericans affect to laugh at the
poor Hirish, and calls their country savage, and hunfit to
be in'abited, but nothing worse passes in it than is beginning
to pass 'ere. Them stairs would have been all in flames in
a few minutes, and them stairs once on fire, not one of hus,
up in the hattics, could 'ave escaped death! Don't talk of
Hireland, after this!
Poor John! his prejudices are those of an Englishman of
his class, and that is saying as much in favour of their
strength as
can
be well said of any prejudices. But, how
much truth was there in his remark! The quiet manner in
which we assume superiority, in morals, order, justice and
virtue, over all other nations, really contains an instructive
lesson, if one will only regard things as they really are. I
have no wish to exaggerate the faults of my own country,
but certainly I shall not remorselessly conceal them, when
the most dangerous consequences are connected with such
a mistake. As a whole, the disorders, disturbances, and
convulsions of America have certainly been much fewer
than those of most, perhaps of all other Christian nations,
comparing numbers, and including the time since the great
experiment commenced. But, such
ought
to have been the
result of our facts, quite independently of national character.
The institutions leave nothing for the masses to struggle for,
and famine is unknown among us. But what does the other
side of the picture exhibit? Can any man point to a country
in Europe in which a great political movement has
commenced
on a principle as barefacedly knavish as that of
transferring property from one class of men to another?
That such a project does exist here, is beyond all just
contradiction
;
and it is equally certain that it has carried its
devices into legislation, and is fast corrupting the
government
in its most efficient agents. John was right in saying
we ought not to turn up our noses at the ebullitions of abused
and trodden-on Hireland, while our own skirts are to be
cleared of such sins against the plainest dictates of right.
The fire was extinguished, and the house was safe. The
kitchen was soon cleared of the steam and smoke, and in
their places appeared a cloud of redskins. Prairiefire,
Eaglesflight
,
and Flintyheart, were all there, examining the
effects of the fire, with stern and interested countenances. I
looked round for Mary Warren; but that gentle and
singularly
feminine girl, after manifesting a presence of mind and
decision that would have done honour to a young man of
her own age, had shrunk back with sensitive consciousness,
and now concealed herself among the others of her sex.
Her duty, so eminently useful and protective, had been
performed
,
and she was only anxious to have it all forgotten.
This I discovered only next day, however.
Vol. II.  10
Manytongues had secured the incendiaries, and they
were now in the kitchen, also, with their hands tied
together
,
and arms bound behind their backs, at the elbows. As
their faces remained black, it was out of my power to
recognise
either. The rascal who had been felled by the blow
of the rifle was yet confused in manner, and I ordered the
domestics to wash him, in the double expectation of bringing
him more completely to his senses, and of ascertaining who
he might be.
The work was soon done, and both objects were attained.
The cook used a dishcloth with so much dexterity, that the
black-a-moor came out a white man, at the first application,
and he was soon as clean as a child that is about to be sent
to school, fresh from the hands of its nurse. The
removal
of the disguise brought out the abashed and
frightened
physiognomy of Joshua Brigham, Miller's hired man
or
my
hired man, in effect, as I paid him his wages.
Yes! such was one of the effects of the pernicious
opinions
that had been so widely circulated in the land, during
the profound moral mania that was working its ravages
among us, with a fatality and danger that greatly exceed
those which accompanied the cholera. A fellow, who was
almost an inmate of my family, had not only conspired
with others to rob me of my property, on a large scale, but
he had actually carried his plot so far as to resort to the
brand and the rifle, as two of the agents to be employed in
carrying out his virtuous objects. Nor was this the result
of the vulgar disposition to steal; it was purely a
consesequence
of a widely-extended system, that is fast becoming
incorporated with the politics of the land, and which men,
relying on the efficacy of majorities, are bold enough to
stand up, in legislative halls, to defend.
[2]
[2]
In order that the reader who is not familiar with what is passing
in New York may not suppose that exaggerated terms are here used,
the writer will state a single expedient of the anti-renters in the
legislature
to obtain their ends. It is generally known that the
Constitution
of the United States prevents the separate States from passing
laws impairing the obligations of contracts. But for this provision of
the Federal Constitution, it is probable, numbers would have
succeeded
,
long ago, in obtaining the property of the few on their own terms,
amid shouts in honour of liberty! This provision, however, has proved
a stubborn obstacle, until the world, near the middle of the nineteenth
century, has been favoured with the following notable scheme to
effect the ends of those who `want farms and must have them.'
The State
can
regulate, by statute, the law of descents. It has,
accordingly
,
been solemnly proposed in the legislature of New York, that the
statute of descents should be so far altered, that when a landlord,
holding
lands subject to certain leasehold tenures, dies, or a descent is cast,
that it shall be lawful for the tenants, on application to the chancellor,
to convert these leasehold tenures into mortgages, and to obtain the
fee-simple of the estates in payment of the debt! In other words, A
leases a farm to B for ever, reserving a ground-rent, with covenants of
re-entry, &c. &c. B wishes a deed, but will not pay A's price. The
United States says the contract shall not be impaired, and the
Legislature
of New York is illustrated by the expedient we have named, to
get over the provision of the Constitution!
Since writing the foregoing, this law has actually passed the
Assembly
,
though it has not been adopted by the Senate. The provision
included all leased property, when the leases were for more than
twenty-one years, or were on lives.
Editor
.
I confess that the discovery of the person of Joshua
Brigham rendered me a little curious to ascertain that of
his companion. Hester, the cook, was directed to take the
other child in hand, as soon as she had well wiped the
countenance of the one first unmasked. Nothing loth, the
good housewife set about her task, and the first dab of water
she applied revealed the astounding fact that I had again
captured Seneca Newcome! It will be remembered, that
the last time I saw these two men together, I left them
fighting in the highway.
I admit that this discovery shocked me. There never had
been a being of the Newcome tribe, from the grandfather,
who was its root at Ravensnest, down to Opportunity, who
had ever been esteemed, or respected among us. Trick
tricktricklow cunning, and overreaching management,
had been the family trait, from the day Jason, of that name,
had rented the mill lot, down to the present hour. This I
had heard from my grandfather, my grandmother, my own
father, my uncle, my aunts and all, older than myself, who
belonged to me. Still,
there
they had been, and habit had
created a sort of feeling for them. There had, also, been a
species of pretension about the family, which brought them
more before us, than most of the families of the tenantry.
The grandfather had received a sort of an education, and
this practice had been continued, after a manner, down to
the unfortunate wretch who now stood a prisoner taken
flagrante delictu
, and for a capital crime. Seneca could
never have made a gentleman, as the term is understood
among gentlemen; but he belonged to a profession which
ought to raise a man materially above the level of the vulgar.
Opportunity, too, had received her
quasi
education, a far
more pretending one than that of my own Patt, but nothing
had been well taught to her; not even reading, inasmuch as
she had a decided provincial pronunciation, which
sometimes
grated on my nerves. But, Opportunity had feelings,
and could not have anticipated her own brother's intentions,
when she communicated the important information she had.
Opportunity, moreover, had more refinement than Seneca,
in consequence of having a more limited association, and she
might fall into despair, at this unexpected result of her
own acts!
I was still reflecting on these things, when summoned to
my grandmother. She was in her own dressing-room,
surrounded
by the four girls; just so many pictures of alarm,
interest, and female loveliness. Mary Warren, alone, was in
regular
toilette;
but the others, with instinctive coquetry, had
contrived to wrap themselves up, in a way to render them
handsomer than ever. As for my dear grandmother
herself
,
she had been told that the house was safe, but felt that
vague desire to see me, that was perhaps natural to the
circumstances
.
The state of the country is frightful, she said, when I
had answered a few of her questions, and had told her who
the prisoners really were; and we can hardly remain here,
in safety. Think of one of the Newcomesand of Seneca,
in particular, with his profession and education, being
engaged
in such a crime!
Nay, grandmother, put in Patt, a little archly, I never
yet heard you speak well of the Newcomes: you barely
tolerated Opportunity, in the hope of improving her.
It is true, that the race is a bad one, and the
circumstances
show what injury a set of fasle notions, transmitted
from father to son, for generations, may do in a family.
We cannot think of keeping these dear girls, here, one
hour after to-morrow, Hugh. To-morrow, or to-day, for it
is now past two o'clock, I see;to-day is Sunday, and we
can go to church; to-night we will be watchful, and
Monday
morning, your uncle shall start for Satanstoe, with all
three of the girls.
I shall not leave my dear grandmother, rejoined Patt
nor do I think it would be very kind to leave Mary
Warren
behind us, in a place like this.
I cannot quit my father, said Mary, herself, quietly,
but very firmly. It is his duty to remain with his
parishioners
,
and more so, now, that so many of them are
misguided
,
than at any other time; and it is always my duty,
and my pleasure, to remain with
him
.
Was that acting? Was that Pharisaical? Or was it
genuine nature; pure filial affection and filial piety?
Beyond
all question, it was the last; and had not the simple
tone, the earnest manner, and the almost alarmed eagerness,
with which the dear girl spoke, proclaimed as much, no one
could have looked in at that serene and guileless eye and
doubted. My grandmother smiled on the lovely earnest
speaker, in her kindest manner, took her hand, and
charmingly
observed
Mary and I will remain together. Her father is in no
danger, for even anti-renters will respect a minister of the
gospel, and can be made to understand it is his duty to
rebuke
even their sins. As for the other girls, I think it is
our duty to insist that your uncle's wards, at least, should
no longer be exposed to dangers like those we have gone
through to-night.
The two young ladies, however, protested in the prettiest
manner possible, their determination not to quit
grandmamma
,
as they affectionately termed their guardian's
mother; and while they were thus employed, my uncle Ro
entered the room, having just paid a visit to the kitchen.
Here 's a charming affair! exclaimed the old bachelor,
as soon as in our midst. Arson, anti-rentism, attempts at
murder, and all sorts of enormities, going hand in hand, in
the very heart of the wisest and best community that earth
ever knew; and the laws as profoundly asleep the whole
time, as if such gentle acts were considered meritorious.
This out-does repudiation twenty-fold, Hugh.
10 *
Ay, my dear sir, but it will not make a tithe of the talk.
Look at the newspapers that will be put into your hands
to-morrow
morning, fresh from Wall and Pine and Anne
streets. They will be in convulsions, if some unfortunate
wight of a Senator speak of adding an extra corporal to a
regiment of foot, as an alarming war-demonstration, or quote
the fall of a fancy stock that has not one cent of intrinsic
value, as if it betokened the downfall of a nation; while
they doze over this volcano, which is raging and gathering
strength beneath the whole community, menacing
destruction
to the nation itself, which is the father of stocks.
The intense selfishness that is uppermost is a bad
symptom
,
certainly; and no one can say to what it will lead.
One thing is sure; it causes men to limit all their
calculations
to the present moment; and to abate a nuisance that
presses on our existing interests, they will jeopard
everything
that belongs to the future. But what are we to do
with Seneca Newcome, and his co-rascal, the other
incendiary
?
I had thought of referring that to your discretion, sir.
They have been guilty of arson, I suppose, and must take
their chances, like every-day criminals.
Their chances will be very good ones, Hugh. Had
you
been caught in Seneca Newcome's kitchen, setting fire to
his house, condign and merciless punishment would have
been
your
lot, beyond all controversy; but
their
cases will
be very different. I 'll bet you a hundred that they 'll not
be convicted; and a thousand that they are pardoned, if
convicted.
Acquitted, sir, will be out of the questionMiss
Warren
and I saw them both, in the very act of building their
fire; and there is plenty of testimony, as to their identity.
This indiscreet speech drew every eye on my late
companion
;
all the ladies, old and young, repeating the name
of Mary! in the pretty manner in which the sex expresses
surprise. As for Mary, herself, the poor blushing girl shrunk
back abashed, ashamed of she knew not what, unless it
might be in connection with some secret consciousness, at
finding herself so strangely associated with me.
Miss Warren is, indeed, in her evening dress, said my
grandmother, a little gravely, and cannot have been in bed
this night. How has this happened, my dear?
Thus called on, Mary Warren was of too guileless and
pure a mind, to hesitate in telling her tale. Every incident,
with which she had been connected, was simply and clearly
related, though she suppressed the name of our midnight
visiter, out of tenderness to Opportunity. All present were
too discreet to ask the name, and, I may add, all present
heard the narrative with a marked and approving interest.
When Mary had done, my grandmother kissed her, and
Patt, the generous creature, encircled her waist, with the
tenderness and affection of a sister, who felt for all the trials
the other had endured.
It seems, then, we owe our safety to Mary, after all!
exclaimed my good grandmother; without her care and
watchfulness, Hugh might, most probably
would
, have
remained
on the lawn, until it was too late to save the house,
or us.
That is not all, added uncle Ro. Any one could
have cried `fire,' or given a
senseless
alarm, but it is
evident
from Miss Warren's account, unpremeditated and
artless
as it is, that, but for the cool and discreet manner in
which she played her part, not one-half of that which has
been done, would have been effected, and that the house
might have been lost. Nay, had these fellows surprised
Hugh, instead of Hugh's surprising them, we might have
been called on to deplore his loss.
I saw a common shudder in Patt and Mary, as they stood
encircling each other with their arms; but the last was
evidently
so pained, that I interfered for her relief.
I do not see any possibility of escape for these
incendiaries
,
I said, turning to my uncle, under the testimony
that can be offered, and am surprised to hear you suggest a
doubt of the result of the trial.
You feel and reason like a very young man, Hugh;
one, who fancies things are much nearer what they ought
to be than facts will sustain. Justice is blind, now-a-days,
not as a proof of impartiality, but as a proof that she too
often sees only one side of a question. How will they
escape
?
Perhaps the jury may fancy setting fire to a pile of
wood, and certain chairs, is not setting fire to a house, let
the
animus
be as plain as the noses on their faces. Mark
me, Hugh Littlepage; one month will not go by, before the
events of this very night will he tortured into an argument
in favour of anti-rentism.
A common exclamation, in which even my grandmother
joined, expressed the general dissent from this opinion.
It is all very well, ladies, answered my uncle Ro,
coollyall well enough, Master Hugh; but let the issue
tell its own story. I have heard already
other
abuses of
the anti-renters urged as a reason why the laws should be
changed, in order that men may not be tempted beyond their
strength; and why not use the same reasoning in favour of
this crime, when it has been used already, in cases of
murder
?
`The leasehold tenures make men commit murder,'
it is said, `and they ought to be destroyed,' themselves.
`The leasehold tenures make men commit arson,' it will now
be said, `and who desires to retain laws that induce men to
commit arson?
On the same principle it might be pretended there should
be no such thing as personals, as they tempt men, beyond
what they can bear, to commit petty larceny.
No doubt it could, and no doubt it
would
, if political
supremacy were to be the reward. There is nothingno
fallacy, no moral sophism, that would not be used to attain
such an end. But, it is late, and we ought to bethink us of
disposing of the prisoners for the nightwhat means this
light? The house is not on fire, after all!
Sure enough, notwithstanding the closed shutters, and
drawn curtains of my grandmother's dressing-room, an
unusual light had penetrated to the place, filling us with
sudden and intense alarm. I opened the door, and found
the passages illuminated, though all within appeared tranquil
and safe. There was a clamour in the court, however, and
presently the fearful war-whoop of the savages rose on the
night air. The cries came from without, as I fancied, and
rushing to the little door, I was on the lawn in a moment,
when the mystery was solved. An extensive hay-barn, one
well filled with the remainder of the last year's crops, was
on fire, sending its forked and waving tongues of flame at
least a hundred feet into the air. It was merely a new
argument
against the leasehold tenures, and in favour of the
spirit of the institutions, a little vividly pressed on the
human senses. Next year, it may figure in the message of
a governor, or the philanthropical efforts of some Albany
orator, if the same spirit prevail in the institutions, as
would seem to prevail this! Is a contract to be tolerated
which induces freemen to set barns on fire?
The barn that had been set on fire stood on the flats,
below
the cliff, and fully half a mile from the Next. The
conflagration
made a most brilliant blaze, and, as a matter of
course, produced an intense light. The loss to myself did
not exceed a few hundred dollars; and, while this
particular
argument in favour of anti-rentism was not entirely
agreeable, it was not so grave as it might have been, had it
been urged on other buildings, and in the same mode. In
other words, I was not so much distressed with my loss as
not to be able to see the beauty of the scene; particularly
as my uncle Ro whispered that Dunning had caused an
insurance
to be effected in the Saratoga Mutual Assurance,
which would probably place a considerable portion of the
tenants in the unlooked-for category of those who were to
pay for their own frolic.
As it was too late to think of saving the barn and ricks,
and Miller, with his people, had already descended to the
spot to look after the fences, and any other object that might
be endangered by the flying embers, there was nothing for
us to do but to remain passive spectators. Truly, the scene
was one worthy of being viewed, and is not altogether unfit
for description.
The light of that burning barn extended for a great
distance
,
shining like what it was, an
evil
deed in a naughty
world; for, notwithstanding the high authority of
Shakspeare
,
it is your evil deeds, after all, that produce the
brightest blazes, and which throw their beams the farthest,
in this state of probation in which we live.
The most remarkable objects in that remarkable scene
were the true and the false redskinsthe Indians and the
Injinsboth of whom were in motion on the meadows,
and both of whom were distinctly visible to us where we
stood, on the cliffs (the ladies being at their chamber
windows
),
though I dare say they were not quite so obvious to
each other.
The Indians had formed themselves into a very open
order, and were advancing towards the other party in a
stealthy manner, by creeping on all-fours, or crouching like
catamounts to the earth, and availing themselves of
everything
like a cover that offered. The burning barn was
between
the two parties, and was a principal reason that the
Injins were not sooner aware of the risk they ran. The
last were a whooping, shouting, dancing, leaping band, of
some forty or fifty of the disguised and armed, who were
quite near enough to the conflagration to enjoy it, without
being so near as to be necessarily connected with it. We
understood their presence and antics to be intended as so
many intimations of the secret agency they had had in the
depredations of the night, and as so many warnings how I
withstood the spirit of the Institutions.
Manytongues, who had certain vague notions of the
necessity
of his keeping on the windy side of the law, did not
accompany his red brethren, but came through the gateway
and joined my uncle and myself, as we stood beneath the
cover of a noble chestnut, on the verge of the cliff, watching
the course of things on the meadow. I expressed my
surprise
at seeing him there, and inquired if his presence might
not be needed by Flintyheart or Prairiefire.
Not at all, not at all, Colonel, he answered with
perfect
coolness. The savages have no great need of an
intarpreter in the business they are on; and if harm comes
of the meetin', it's perhaps best that the two parties should
not understand each other, in which case it might all be
looked on as an accident. I hope they'll not be particular
about scalps,for I told Flintyheart, as he was leaving us,
the people of this part of the world did not like to be
scalped.
This was the only encouragement we received from the
interpreter, who appeared to think that matters were now
in the right train, and that every difficulty would soon be
disposed of,
secundum artem
. The Injins, however, viewed
the affair differently, having no wish for a serious brush
with any one; much less with enemies of the known
character
of red-skins. How they ascertained the presence of
their foe I cannot say, though it is probable some one saw
them stealing along the meadows, in spite of all their care,
and gave the alarm. Alarm it was, sure enough; the party
of the previous day scarce retreating through the woods
with greater haste than the disguised and armed now
vanished.
Such has been the fact, as respects these men, in every
instance in which they have been brought in contact with
armed bodies, though much inferior to their own in numbers.
Fierce enough, and even brutal, on a variety of occasions
in which individuals have become subject to their power, in
all cases in which armed parties, however small, have been
sent against them, they have betrayed timidity and a dread
of making that very appeal to force, which, by their own
previous acts, they had insolently invited. Is it then true,
that these soi-disant Injins have not the ordinary courage
of their race, and that they are less than Americans, with
arms in their hands, and below the level of all around them
in spirit? Such is not the case. The consciousness of guilt
has made them cowards; they have found that the king's
name is a tower of strength, and have shrunk from
conflicts
,
in which the secret warnings that come from on high
have told them that they were embodied in a wicked cause,
and contending for the attainment of wrong ends by
unjustifiable
means. Their conduct proves how easy it would
have been to suppress their depredations at the earliest day,
by a judicious application of the power of the State, and how
much
they
have to answer for who have neglected their duty
in this particular.
As soon as Flintyheart and his followers ascertained that
the disguised and armed were actually off again, and that
they were not to pass the morning in a skirmish, as no doubt
each man among them had hoped would to be the case, they
set up such whoops and cries as had not been heard on
those meadows during the last eighty years. The period
went beyond the memory of man since Indian warfare had
existed at Ravensnest, a few false alarms in the revolution
excepted. The effect of these yells was to hasten the
retreat
,
as was quite apparent to us on the cliffs; but the
sagacious
warriors of the Prairies knew too much to expose their
persons by approaching nearer to the blazing barn than
might be prudent. On the contrary, seemingly satisfied
that nothing was to be done, and disdaining a parade of
service where no service was to be effected, they slowly
retired
from the meadows, regaining the cliffs by means
known to themselves.
This military demonstration, on the part of our red
brethren, was not without its useful consequences. It gave
the Injins an intimation of watchfulness, and of a
readiness
to meet them that prevented any new alarm that night,
and satisfied everybody at the Nest that our immediate
danger
had come to an end. Not only was this the feeling of
my uncle and myself, but it was also the feeling of the
females
,
as we found on returning to the house, who had
witnessed
all that passed from the upper windows. After a
short interview with my grandmother, she consented to
retire, and preparations were made for setting a look-out,
and dismissing everybody to their beds again.
Manytongues
took charge of the watch, though he laughed at the
probability of there being any further disturbance that
night.
As for the redskins, he said, they would as soon
sleep out under the trees, at this season of the year, as sleep
under a roof; and as for wakingcats a'nt their equals.
NonoColonel; leave it all to me, and I'll carry you
through the night as quietly as if we were on the prer-ies,
and living under good wholesome prer-ie law.
As quietly, as if we were on the prairies! We had
then reached that pass in New York, that after one burning,
a citizen might really hope to pass the remainder of his
night as quietly as if he were on the prairies! And there
was that frothy, lumbering, useless machine, called a
government
,
at Albany, within fifty miles of us, as placid, as
self-satisfied, as much convinced that this was the greatest
people on earth, and itself their illustrious representatives,
as if the disturbed counties were so many gardens of Eden,
before sin and transgression had become known to it! If
it was doing anything in the premises, it was probably
calculating the minimum the tenant should pay for the
landlord's land, when the latter might be sufficiently
worried
to part with his estate. Perhaps, it was illustrating its
notions of liberty, by naming the precise sum that one
citizen
ought to accept, in order that the covetous longings of
another should be satisfied!
I was about to retire to my bed, for the first time that
night, when my uncle Ro remarked it might be well to see
one of our prisoners at least. Orders had been given to
unbind the wretched men, and to keep them in an empty
store-room, which had no available outlet but the door.
Thither we then repaired, and of course were admitted by
the sentinels, without a question. Seneca Newcome was
startled at my appearance, and I confess I was myself
embarrassed
how to address him, from a wish to say nothing
that might appear like exultation on one side, or concession
on the other. My uncle, however, had no such scruples,
probably from better knowing his man; accordingly, he
came to the point at once.
The evil spirit must have got great ascendency in the
country, Seneca Newcome, when men of your knowledge,
dip so deeply into his designs, said Mr. Littlepage, sternly.
What has my nephew ever done to incite
you
to come into
his house, as an incendiary, like a thief in the night?
Ask me no questions, Mr. Littlepage, surlily replied
the attorney, for I shall answer none.
And this miserable misguided creature who has been
your companion. The last we saw of these two men, Hugh,
they were quarrelling in the highway, like cat and dog, and
there are signs about their faces that the interview became
still more hostile than it had been, after we left them.
And here we find them together, companions in an
enterprise
of life and death!
It is ever thus with rogues. They will push their
quarrels
to extremities, and make them up in an hour, when the
demon of rapine points to an object for common plunder.
You see the same spirit in politics, ay, and even in religion.
Men that have lived in hostility, for half their lives,
contending
for selfish objects, will suddenly combine their
powers
to attain a common end, and work together like the
most true-hearted friends, so long as they see a chance of
effecting their wishes. If honesty were only one-half as
active as roguery, it would fare better than it does. But the
honest man has his scruples; his self-respect; his
consistency
,
and most of all his principles, to mark out his course,
Vol. II.11
and he cannot turn aside at each new impulse, like your
pure knave to convert enemies into friends, and friends into
enemies. And you, turning to Josh Brigham, who was
looking surlily onwho have actually been eating Hugh
Littlepage's bread, what has he done, that you should come
at midnight, to burn him up like a caterpillar in the
spring?
He has had his farm long enoughmuttered the
fellow
it's
time that poor folks had some chance.
My uncle shrugged his shoulders; then, as if he suddenly
recollected himself, he lifted his hat, bowed like a
thoroughbred
gentleman as he was, when he chose to be, wished
Seneca good night, and walked away. As we retired, he
expressed his conviction of the uselessness of remonstrance,
in this case, and of the necessity of suffering the law to take
its own course. It might be unpleasant to see a Newcome
actually hanged, but nothing short of that operation, he felt
persuaded would ever fetch up the breed in its evil courses.
Wearied with all that had passed, I now went to bed, and
slept soundly for the succeeding seven hours. As the house
was kept quiet by orders, everybody repaired the lost time,
the Nest being as quiet as in those days in which the law
ruled in the republic.
CHAPTER IX.
Well may we sing her beauties,
This pleasant land of ours,
Her sunny smiles, her golden fruits,
And all her world of flowers.
And well would they persuade us now.
In moments all too dear,
That, sinful though our hearts may be,
We have our Eden here.
Simms
.
The
following day was Sunday. I did not rise until
nine, and when I withdrew the curtains and opened the
shutters
of my window, and looked out upon the lawn, and the
fields beyond it, and the blue void that canopied all, I thought
a lovelier day, or one more in harmony with the tranquil
character of the whole scene, never shone from the heavens.
I threw up the sash, and breathed the morning air which
filled my dressing-room, pregnant with the balms and odours
of the hundred sweet-smelling flowers and plants that
embellished
the shrubberies. The repose of the Sabbath seemed
to rest on man and beast; the bees and humming-birds that
buzzed about the flowers, even at their usual pursuits seemed
as if conscious of the sanctity of the day. I think no one
can be insensible to the difference there is between a Sabbath
in the country and any other day of the week. Most of
this, doubtless, is the simple consequence of abstaining from
labour; but, connected with the history of the festival, its
usual observances, and the holy calm that appears to reign
around, it is so very obvious and impressive, that a Sunday,
in a mild day in June, is to me ever a delicious resting-place,
as a mere poetical pause in the bustling and turmoil of this
world's time. Such a day was that which succeeded the
night through which we had just passed, and it came most
opportunely to soothe the spirits, tranquillize the
apprehensions
,
and afford a moment for sober reflection.
There lay the smouldering ruins of the barn, it is true;
a blackened monument of a wicked deed; but the mood
which had produced this waste and wrong appeared to have
passed away; and, in all other respects, far and near, the
farms of Ravensnest had never spread themselves before the
eye in colours more in consonance with the general
benevolence
of a bountiful nature. For a moment, as I gazed
on the broad view, I felt all my earlier interests in it revive,
and am not ashamed to own that a profound feeling of
gratitude
to God came over me when I recollected it was by his
Providence I was born the heir to such a scene, instead of
having my lot cast among the serfs and dependants of other
regions.
After standing at the window a minute, in contemplation
of that pleasing view, I drew back, suddenly and painfully
conscious of the character and extent of the combination that
existed to rob me of my rights in it. America no longer
seemed America to my eyes; but, in place of its ancient
submission to the law, its quick distinction between right
and wrong, its sober and discriminating liberty, which
equally avoided submission to the injustice of power, and the
excesses of popular delusion, there had been substituted the
rapacity of the plunderer, rendered formidable by the
insidious
manner in which it was interwoven with political
machinery
,
and the truckling of the wretches entrusted with
authority; men who were playing into the hands of
demagogues
,
solely in order to secure majorities to perpetuate
their own influence. Was, then, the State really so corrupt
as to lend itself to projects as base as those openly
maintained
by the anti-renters? Far from it: four men out of
five, if not a larger proportion, must be, and indeed are,
sensible
of the ills that their success would entail on the
community
,
and would lift up heart and hand to-morrow to put
them down totally and without pity; but they have made
themselves slaves of the lamp; have enlisted in the ranks
of
party
, and
dare
not oppose their leaders, who wield them
as Napoleon wielded his masses, to further private views,
apostrophizing and affecting an homage to liberty all the
while! Such is the history of man!
When the family met in the breakfast-room, a singular
tranquillity prevailed among us. As for my grandmother, I
knew her spirit and early experience, and was not so much
surprised to find her calm and reasonable; but these
qualities
seemed imparted to her four young companions also.
Patt could laugh, and yield to her buoyant spirits, just the
same as if nothing had occurred, while my uncle's other
wards maintained a lady-like quiet, that denoted anything
but apprehension. Mary Warren, however, surprised me
by her air and deportment. There she sat, in her place at
the table, looking, if possible, the most feminine, gentle, and
timid of the four. I could scarcely believe that the blushing,
retiring, modest pretty daughter of the rector could be the
prompt, decided, and clear-headed young girl who had been
of so much service to me the past night, and to whose
coolness
and discretion, indeed, we were all indebted for the roof
that was over our heads, and some of us, most probably, for
our lives.
Notwithstanding this air of tranquillity, the breakfast was
a silent and thoughtful meal. Most of the conversation was
between my uncle and grandmother, and a portion of it
related
to the disposal of the prisoners. There was no
magistrate
within several miles of the Nest, but those who were
tainted with anti-rentism; and to carry Seneca and his
companion
before a justice of the peace of this character, would
be, in effect, to let them go at large. Nominal bail would
be taken, and it is more than probable the constable
employed
would have suffered a rescue, did they even deem it
necessary to go through this parade of performing their
duties
.
My uncle, consequently, adopted the following plan.
He had caused the two incendiaries to be transferred to the
old farm-house, which happened to contain a perfectly dry
and empty cellar, and which had much of the security of a
dungeon, without the usual defects of obscurity and
dampness
.
The red-men had assumed the office of sentinels, one
having his station at the door, while anothe watched near
a window which admitted the light, while it was scarcely
large enough to permit the human body to squeeze through
it. The interpreter had received instructions from the agent
to respect the Christian Sabbath; and no movement being
contemplated for the day, this little duty just suited their
lounging, idle habits, when in a state of rest. Food and
water, of course, had not been forgotten; and there my
uncle Ro had left that portion of the business, intending to
have the delinquents carried to a distant magistrate, one of
11 *
the Judges of the County, early on Monday morning. As
for the disturbers of the past night, no signs of them were
any longer visible; and there being little extensive cover
near the Nest, no apprehension was felt of any surprise.
We were still at breakfast, when the tone of St. Andrew's
bell came floating, plaintively, through the air, as a
summons
to prepare ourselves for the services of the day. It
was little more than a mile to the church, and the younger
ladies expressed a desire to walk. My grandmother,
attended
by her son, therefore, alone used the carriage, while
we young people went off in a body, on foot, half an hour
before the ringing of the second bell. Considering the state
of the country, and the history of the past night, I was
astonished at my own indifference on this occasion, no less
than at that of my charming companions; nor was it long
before I gave utterance to the feeling.
This America of ours is a queer place, it must be
admitted
,
I cried, as we crossed the lawn to take a foot-path
that would lead us, by pleasant pastures, quite to the
churchdoor
without entering the high-way, except to cross it once;
here we have the whole neighbourhood as tranquil as if
crime never disturbed it, though it is not yet a dozen hours
since riot, arson, and perhaps murder, were in the
contemplation
of hundreds of those who live on every side of us.
The change is wonderful!
But, you will remember it is Sunday, Hugh, put in
Patt. All summer, when Sunday has come, we have had
a respite from disturbances and fears. In this part of the
country, the people are too religious to think of desecrating
the Sabbath by violence and armed bands. The anti-renters
would lose more than they would gain by pursuing a
different
course.
I had little or no difficulty in believing this, it being no
unusual thing, among us, to find observances of this nature
clinging to the habits of thousands, long after the devout
feeling which had first instilled it into the race has become
extinct. Something very like it prevails in other countries,
and among even higher and more intellectual classes, where it
is no unusual thing to find the most profound outward respect
manifested towards the altar and its rites, by men who live
in the hourly neglect of the first and plainest commands of
the decalogue. We are not alone, therefore, in this
pharisaical
spirit, which exists, in some mode or other, wherever
man himself is to be found.
But, this equivocal piety was certainly manifested to a
striking degree, that day, at Ravensnest. The very men
who were almost desperate in their covetous longings
appeared
at church, and went through the service with as
much seeming devotion as if conscious of no evil; and a
general truce appeared to prevail in the country,
notwithstanding
there must have been much bitterness of feeling
among the discomfited. Nevertheless, I could detect in the
countenances of many of the old tenants of the family, an
altered expression, and a coldness of the eye, which bespoke
anything but the ancient friendly feeling which had so long
existed between us. The solution was very simple;
demagogues
had stirred up the spiritnot of the Institutions, but
of covetousness, in their breasts; and so long as that evil
tendency predominated, there was little room for better
feelings.
Now, I shall have another look at the canopied pew,
I cried, as we entered the last field, on our way to the
church. That offensive, but unoffending, object had
almost gone out of my mind's eye, until my uncle
recollected
it, by intimating that Jack Dunning, as he calls his
friend and council, had written him it
must
come down.
I agree with Mr. Dunning altogether, answered
Martha
,
quickly. I wish with all my heart, Hugh, you would
order that hideous-looking thing to be taken away this very
week.
Why this earnestness, my dear Patt? There has the
hideous thing been ever since the church was built, which
is now these three-score years, and no harm has come of
it, as I know.
It is harm to be so ugly. It disfigures the church;
and then I do not think distinctions of that sort are proper
for the house of God. I know this ever has been my
grandmother's opinion; but finding her father-in-law and
husband desirous of such an
ornament
, she consented in
silence, during their lives.
What do
you
say to all this, Miss Warren, I asked,
turning to my companion, for by some secret influence I
was walking at her side. Are you `up canopy' or `down
canopy'?
`Down canopy,' answered Mary, firmly. I am of
Mrs. Littlepage's opinion, that churches ought to contain as
little as possible to mark worldly distinctions. Such
distinctions
are inseparable from life, I know; but it is to
prepare
for death that we enter such buildings.
And your father, Miss Warren  have you ever heard
him speak of my unfortunate pew?
Mary hesitated an instant, changed colour, then looked
up into my face with a countenance so ingenuous and
lovely, that I would have forgiven her ever a severe
comment
on some act of folly of my own.
My father is an advocate for doing away with pews
altogether, she answered, and, of course, can have no
particular wish to preserve yours. He tells me, that in the
churches of the Romanists, the congregation sit, stand, or
kneel, promiscuously before the altar, or crowd around the
pulpit, without any distinctions of rank or persons. Surely,
that is better than bringing into the very temple the most
pitiful of all worldly classifications, that of more money.
It
is
better, Miss Warren; and I wish, with all my
heart, the custom could be adopted here. But the church
that might best dispense with the support obtained from
pews, and which, by its size and architecture, is best fitted
to set the example of a new mode, has gone on in the old
way, I understand, and has its pews as well as another.
Do we get our custom from England, Hugh?
demanded
Martha.
Assuredly; as we do most others, good, bad and
indifferent
.
The property-notion would be very likely to prevail
in a country like England; and then it is not absolutely true
that everybody sits in common, even in the churches of the
continent of the old world. The Seigneur, under the old
regime, in France, had
his
pew, usually; and high
dignitaries
of the State in no country are found mingling with the
mass of worshippers, unless it be in good company. It is
true, a duchesse will kneel in the crowd, in most Romish
churches, in the towns, for there are too many such persons
to accommodate all with privileged seats, and such honours
are reserved for the very great; but, in the country, there
are commonly pews, in by-places, for the great personages
of the neighbourhood. We are not quite so bad as we fancy
ourselves, in this particular, though we might be better.
But, you will allow that a canopied pew is unsuited to
this country, brother?
Not more to this, than to any other. I agree that it is
unsuited to all places of worship, where the petty differences
between men, which are created by their own usages, should
sink into insignificance, in the direct presence, as it might
be, of the power of God. But, in this country, I find a
spirit rising, which some persons would call the `spirit of
the Institutions,' that is for ever denying men rewards, and
honours, and credit exactly in the degree in which they
deserve
them. The moment a citizen's head is seen above the
crowd of faces around him, it becomes the mark of rotten
eggs, as if he were raised in the pillory, and his
fellow-creatures
would not tolerate any difference in moral stature.
How do you reconcile that with the great number of
Catos, and Brutuses, not to say of the Gracchi, that are to
be found among us? asked Mary Warren, slily.
Oh! these are the mere creatures of partygreat men
for the nonce. They are used to serve the purposes of
factions
,
and are be-greated for the occasion. Thus it is, that
nine-tenths of the Catos you mention, are forgotten, even by
name, every political
lustrum
. But let a man rise,
independently
of the people
, by his own merit, and see how the
people will tolerate him. Thus it is with my pewit is a
great
pew, and become great without any agency of the
`folks;' and the `folks' don't like it.
The girls laughed at this sally, as light-hearted, happy
girls will laugh at anything of the sort; and Patt put in her
retort, in her own direct, spirited manner.
It is a
great
ugly thing, if that concession will flatter
your vanity, she said, and I do entreat it may come
down
greatly
, this present week. Really, you can have no
notion, Hugh, how much talk it has made of late.
I do not doubt it, my dear. The talk is all aimed at
the leases; everything that can be thought of, being dragged
into the account against us poor landlords, in order to
render
our cause unpopular, and thus increase the chances of
robbing us with impunity.
The good people of this State
little imagine that the very evil that the enemies of the
institutions
have long predicted, and which their friends have
as warmly repudiated, are now actively at work among us,
and that the great experiment is in imminent danger of
failing, at the very moment the people are loudly exulting
in its success. Let this attempt on property succeed, ever
so indirectly
, AND IT WILL BE FOLLOWED UP BY OTHERS,
WHICH WILL AS INEVITABLY DRIVE US INTO DESPOTISM, AS
A REFUGE AGAINST ANARCHY, AS EFFECT SUCCEEDS TO
CAUSE. The danger exists, now, in its very worst form
that of political demagogueismand must be met, face to
face, and put down manfully, and on true principles, or, in
my poor judgment, we are gone. Cant is a prevailing vice
of the nation, more especially political and religious cant,
and cant can never be appeased by concessions. My
canopy
shall
stand, so long as anti-rentism exists at Ravensnest,
or be torn down by violence; when men return to their
senses, and begin to see the just distinctions between
meum
and
tuum
, the cook may have it for oven-wood, any day in
the week.
As we were now about to cross the stile that
communicated
with the highway, directly in front of the church, the
conversation ceased, as unsuited to the place and the
occasion
.
The congregation of St. Andrew's was small, as is
usually the case with the country congregations of its sect,
which are commonly regarded with distrust by the
descendants
of the Puritans in particular, and not unfrequently with
strong aversion. The rowdy religionhalf-cant,
half-blasphemy
that Cromwell and his associates entailed on so
many Englishmen, but which was not without a degree of
ferocious, narrow-minded sincerity about it, after all, has
probably been transmitted to this country, with more of its
original peculiarities than exist, at the present day, in any
other part of the world. Much of the narrow-mindedness
remains; but, unhappily, when liberality does begin to show
itself in these sects, it is apt to take the character of
latitudinarianism
.
In a word, the exaggerations and false
principles
that were so common among the religious fanatics of
the American colonies in the seventeenth century, which
burnt witches, hanged Quakers, and denounced all but the
elect few, are now running their natural race, with the goal
of infidelity in open view before them. Thus will it be, also,
with the abuses of political liberty, which must as certainly
terminate in despotism, unless checked in season; such
being, not the
spirit
of the Institutions, but the tendency
of human nature, as connected with everything in which the
right is abandoned to sustain the wrong.
Mr. Warren, I found, was a popular preacher,
notwithstanding
the disfavour with which his sect was generally
regarded. A prejudiced and provincial people was
naturally
disposed to look at everything that differed from their
own opinions and habits with dislike; and the simple
circumstance
that he belonged to a church that possessed
bishops
,
was of itself tortured into a proof that his sect favoured
aristocracy and privileged classes. It is true that nearly
every other sect in the country had orders in the church,
under the names of ministers, elders, and deacons, and was
just as liable to the same criticism; but then they did not
possess
bishops
, and having that which we do not happen to
have ourselves, usually constitutes the
gist
of an offence, in
cases of this sort. Notwithstanding these obstacles to
popularity
,
Mr. Warren commanded the respect of all around him;
and, strange as it may seem, none the less because, of all
the clergy in that vicinity, he alone had dared to rebuke the
spirit of covetousness that was abroad, and which it suits the
morals of some among us to style the spirit of the
Institutions
;
a duty he had discharged on more than one
occasion
,
with great distinctness and force, though temperately
and under the full influence of a profound feeling of
Christian
charity. This conscientious course had given rise to
menaces and anonymous letters, the usual recourse of the
mean and cowardly; but it had also increased the weight
of his character, and extorted the secret deference of many
who would gladly have entertained a different feeling towards
him, had it been in their power.
My grandmother and uncle were already seated in the
canopied pew when we pedestrians entered the church.
Mary Warren turned into another aisle, and proceeded to
the pew reserved for the rector, accompanied by my sister,
while the other two young ladies passed up to the chancel,
and took their customary places. I followed, and for the
first time in my life was seated beneath the offensive canopy,
vested with all the rights of ownership. By the term
canopy
,
however, the reader is not to imagine anything like
festooned drapery  crimson colours and gilded laces; our
ambition had never soared so high. The amount of the
distinction
between this pew and any other in the church was
simply this: it was larger and more convenient than those
around it, an advantage which any other might have equally
enjoyed who saw fit to pay for it, as had been the case with
us, and it was canopied with a heavy, clumsy, ill-shaped
sort of a roof, that was a perfect caricature of the celebrated
baldachino
of St. Peter's, in Rome. The first of these
advantages
probably excited no particular envy, for it came
within the common rule of the country, of play and pay;
but as for the canopy, that was aristocratic, and was not to
be tolerated. Like the leasehold tenure, it was opposed to
the `spirit of the Institutions.' It is true, it did no real harm,
as an existing thing; it is true, it had a certain use, as a
memorial of past opinions and customs; it is true, it was
property, and could not be touched without interfering with
its privileges; it is true, that every person who saw it
secretly
felt there was nothing, after all, so very inappropriate
in such a pew's belonging to a Littlepage; and, most of all,
it was true that they who sat in it never fancied for a
moment
that it made them any better or any worse than the
rest of their fellow-creatures. There it was, however; and,
next to the feudal character of a lease, it was the most
offensive object then existing in Ravensnest. It may be
questioned if the cross, which occupied the place that,
according
to provincial orthodoxy, a weathercock should have
adorned, or Mr. Warren's surplice, was one-half as
offensive
.
When I raised my head, after the private devotions which
are customary with us semi-papishes, on entering a place
of worship, and looking around me, I found that the
building
was crowded nearly to overflowing. A second glance
told me that nearly every eye was fastened on myself. At
first, the canopy having been uppermost so lately in my
mind, I fancied that the looks were directed at
that;
but I
soon became satisfied that I, in my own unworthy person,
was their object. I shall not stop to relate most of the idle
and silly reports that had got abroad, in connection with the
manner and reason of my disguised appearance in the
hamlet
,
the preceding day, or in connection with anything else,
though one of those reports was so very characteristic, and
so entirely peculiar to the subject in hand, that I cannot
omit it. That report was simply a rumour that I had caused
one of my own barns to be set on fire, the second night of
my arrival, in order to throw the odium of the act on those
virtuous and hard-working husbandmen, who only
maintained
an illegal and armed body on foot, just to bully and
worry me out of my property. Yes, there I sat; altogether
unconscious of the honour done me; regarded by quite half
that congregation as the respected and just-minded youth,
who had devised and carried out precisely such a rascally
scheme. Now, no one who has not had the opportunity to
compare, can form any idea how much more potent and
formidable is the American folks say, than the vulgar
reports of any other state of society. The French
on dit
is
a poor, pitiful report, placed by the side of this vast lever,
which, like that of Archimedes, only wants a stand for its
fulcrum, to move the world. The American folks say
has a certain omnipotence, so long as it lasts, which arises
from, not the spirit, but the
character
of the institutions,
themselves. In a country in which the people rule, `folks'
are resolved that their `say' shall not pass for nothing. So
few doubt the justice of the popular decision, that holy writ,
itself, has not, in practical effect, one-half the power that
really belongs to one of these reports, so long as it suits the
common mind to entertain it. Few dare resist it; fewer
still call in question its accuracy; though, in sober truth, it
is hardly ever right. It makes and unmakes reputation, for
the time being
bien entendy;
it even makes and unmakes
patriots, themselves. In short, though never quite truth,
and not often very much like the truth, paradoxical as it
may appear, it
is
truth, and nothing but the truth,
pro hac
vice
. Everybody knows, nevertheless, that there is no
permanency
to what folks say about anything; and that
`folks' frequently, nay, almost invariably, unsay what
has been said six months before; yet, all submit to the
authority
of its
dicta
, so long as `folks' choose to `say.' The
only exception to this rule, and it merely proves it, is in the
case of political parties, when there are always two folks
Vol. II.  12
say which flatly contradict each other; and sometimes
there are half-a-dozen, no two of which are ever precisely
alike!
There I sat, as I afterwards learned, the observed of
all observers, merely because it suited the purposes of those
who wished to get away my estate to raise various reports to
my prejudice,not one of which, I am happy to have it in
my power to say, was in any manner true. The first good
look that I took at the congregation satisfied me that very
much the larger part of it consisted of those who did not
belong to St. Andrew's church. Curiosity, or some worse
feeling, had trebled the number of Mr. Warren's hearers
that day,or, it might be more correct to say, of my
observers
.
There was no other interruption to the services than that
which was produced by the awkwardness of so many who
were strangers to the ritual. The habitual respect paid to
religious rites kept every one in order; and, in the midst of
a feeling that was as malignant and selfish as well could
exist under circumstances of so little provocation, I was safe
from violence, and even from insult. As for myself, little
was or could be known of my character and propensities at
Ravensnest. School, college, and travelling, with winter
residences in town, had made me a sort of stranger in my
own domain, and I was regarded through the covenants of
my leases, rather than through any known facts. The
same was true, though in a less degree, with my uncle, who
had lived so much abroad as to be considered a sort of half
foreigner, and one who preferred other countries to his own.
This is an offence that is rarely forgiven by the masses in
America, though it is probably the most venial sin that one
who has had the opportunities of comparing can commit. Old
nations offer so many more inducements than young nations
to tempt men of leisure and cultivation to reside in them,
that it is not surprising the travelled American should
prefer
Europe to his own quarter of the world; but the jealousy
of a provincial people is not apt to forgive this preference.
For myself, I have heard it said, and I believe it to be true,
to a certain extent, that countries on the decline, supposing
them to have been once at the summit of civilization, make
pleasanter abodes for the idler than nations on the advance.
This is one of the reasons why Italy attracts so many more
visiters than England, though climate must pass for
something
in such a comparison. But these long absences, and
supposed preferences for foreign life, had made my uncle
Ro, in one sense, unpopular with the mass, which has been
taught to believe, by means of interested and fulsome
eulogies
on their own state of society, that it implies something
more than a want of taste, almost a want of principle, to
prefer any other. This want of popularity, however, was
a good deal relieved by a wide and deep conviction of my
uncle's probity, as well as of his liberality, his purse having
no more string to it than General Harrison's door was
thought to have of a latch. But the case was very different
with my grandmother. The early part of her life had been
spent at the Nest, and it was impossible so excellent a
woman
could be anything but respected. She had, in truth,
been a sore impediment with the anti-renters; more
especially
in carrying out that part of their schemes which is
connected with traduction, and its legitimate offspring,
prejudice
.
It would hardly do to traduce this noble-minded,
charitable, spirited, and just woman; yet, hazardous as the
experiment must and did seem, it was attempted, and not
altogether without success. She was accused of an
aristocratic
preference of her own family to the families of other
people. Patt and I, it was urged, were only her
grandchildren
,
and had ample provision made for us in other
estates besides this,and a woman of Mrs. Littlepage's
time of life, it was said, who had one foot in the grave,
ought to have too much general philanthropy to give a
preference
to the interests of mere grandchildren, over the
interests
of the children of men who had paid her husband and
sons rent, now, for quite sixty years. This attack had
come from the pulpit, too, or the top of a molasses
hogshead
,
which was made a substitute for a pulpit, by an
itinerant
preacher, who had taken a bit of job-work, in which
the promulgation of the tenets of the gospel and those of
anti-rentism was the great end in view.
As I have said, my good grandmother suffered somewhat,
in public estimation, in consequence of this assault. It is
true, had any one openly charged the circulators of this silly
calumny with their offence, they would have stoutly denied
it; but it was none the less certain that this charge, among
a hundred others, varying from it only in degree, and not
at all in character, was industriously circulated in order
to render the Littlepages unpopular; unpopularity being
among us the sin that is apt to entail all the evil consequences
of every other offence.
The reader who is not acquainted with the interior of our
social habits, must not suppose that I am colouring for effect.
So far from this, I am quite conscious of having kept the
tone of the picture down, it being an undeniable truth that
nothing of much interest, now-a-days, is left to the simple
decision of principles and laws, in this part of the country at
least. The supremacy of numbers is so great, that scarce
a private suit of magnitude is committed to a jury without
attempts, more or less direct, to influence the common mind
in favour of one side or the other, in the hope that the jurors
will be induced to think as the majority thinks. In Europe,
it is known that judges were, nay,
are
, visited and solicited
by the parties; but, here, it is the public that must be treated
in the same way. I am far from wishing to blazon the
defects
of my own country, and I know from observation, that
corresponding evils, differing only in their exterior aspects,
and in their mode of acting, exist elsewhere; but these are
the forms in which some of our defects present themselves,
and he is neither a friend to his country, nor an honest man,
who wishes them to be bundled up and cloaked, instead of
being exposed, understood, and corrected. This notion of
`
nil nisi bene
' has done an infinite degree of harm to the
country; and, through the country, to freedom.
I do not think the worship of the temple amounted to any
great matter that day in St. Andrew's Church, Ravensnest.
Quite half the congregation was blundering through the
liturgy, and every man who lost his place in the
prayerbook
,
or who could not find it at all, seemed to fancy it was
quite sufficient for the ritual of us semi-papists if he kept his
eye on
me
and my canopied pew. How many pharisees
were present, who actually believed that I had caused my
own barn to be burned, in order to throw opprobrium on the
`virtuous,' `honest,' and `hard-working' tenants, and who
gave credit to the stories affecting my title, and all the rest
of the stuff that calculating cupidity had set afloat in the
country, I have no way of knowing; but subsequent
circumstances
have given me reason to suppose they were not a
few. A great many men left the House of God that
morning
,
I make no doubt, whose whole souls were wrapped up
in effecting an act of the grossest injustice, professing to
themselves to thank God that they were not as wicked as
the being whom they desired to injure.
I stopped to say a word to Mr. Warren, in the
vestryroom
,
after the people were dismissed, for he had not passed
the night with us at the Nest, though his daughter had.
After we had said a word about the occurrence of the
morning
,
the good rector, having heard a rumour of the arrest of
certain incendiaries, without knowing who they were, I
made a more general remark or two previously to quitting
the place.
Your congregation was unusually large this morning,
sir, I said, smiling, though not altogether as attentive as
it might have been.
I owe it to your return, Mr. Littlepage, aided by the
events of the past day or two. At one moment I was afraid
that some secret project was on foot, and that the day and
place might be desecrated by some scene of disgraceful
violence
.
All has gone off well in that respect, however, and
I trust that no harm will come of this crowd. We
Americans
have
a respect for sacred things which will ordinarily
protect the temple.
Did you, then, think St. Andrew's ran any risk to-day,
sir?
Mr. Warren coloured a little, and he hesitated an instant
before he answered.
You doubtless know, young sir, he said, the nature
of the feeling that is now abroad in the country. With a
view to obtain its ends, anti-rentism drags every auxiliary
it can find into its ranks, and, among other things, it has
assailed your canopied pew. I own, that, at first, I
apprehended
some assault might be contemplated on
that
.
Let it come, sir; the pew shall be altered on a general
and right principle, but not until it is let alone by envy,
malice, and covetousness. It would be worse to make a
concession
12 *
to these than to let the pew stand another half
century
.
With these words in my mouth, I took my leave,
hastening
on to overtake the girls in the fields.
CHAPTER X.
There is a pure republic  wild, yet strong
A `fierce democracie,' where all are true
To what themselves have voted,  right or wrong,
And to their laws denominated blue;
(If red, they might to Draco's code belong.)
Halleck
.
Such
was my haste in quitting the church, that I did not
turn to the right or the left. I saw the light, but
well-rounded
form of Mary Warren loitering along with the rest
of the party, seemingly in waiting for me to join them;
and crossing the road, I sprang upon the stile, and thence
to the ground, coming up with the girls at the next instant.
What is the meaning of the crowd, Hugh? asked my
sister, pointing down the road with the stick of her parasol,
as she put the question.
Crowd! I have seen no crowd. Everybody had left
the church before I quitted it, and all has gone off
peaceably
.
Ha! sure enough, that does look like a crowd yonder
in the highway. It seems an organized meeting, by George!
Yes, there is the chairman, seated on the upper rail of the
fence, and the fellow with a bit of paper in his hand is
doubtless the secretary. Very American, and regular, all
that! Some vile project is hatching, I 'll answer for it, under
the aspect of an expression of public opinion. See, there is
a chap speaking, and gesticulating manfully!
We all stopped, for a moment, and stood looking at the
crowd, which really had all the signs of a public meeting
about it. There it had been, the girls told me, ever since
they had quitted the church, and seemingly engaged much
as it was at that moment. The spectacle was curious, and
the day being fine, while time did not press, we lingered in
the fields, occasionally stopping to look behind us, and note
what was going on in the highway.
In this manner, we might have walked half the distance
to the Nest, when, on turning to take another look, we
perceived
that the crowd had dispersed; some driving off in
the ever-recurring one-horse wagon, some on horseback,
and others on foot. Three men, however, were walking
fast in our direction, as if desirous of overtaking us. They
had already crossed the stile, and were on the path in the
field, a route rarely or never taken by any but those who
desired to come to the house. Under the circumstances, I
determined at once to stop and wait for them. First feeling
in my pocket, and making sure of the revolver, which is
getting to be an important weapon, now that private battles
are fought not only yard-arm and yard-arm, but by
regular broadsides, starboard and larboard, I intimated
my intention to the girls.
As these men are evidently coming in quest of me, I
remarked, it may be as well, ladies, for you to continue
your walk towards home, while I wait for them on this
stile.
Very true, answered Patt. They can have little to
say that we shall wish to hear, and you will soon overtake
us. Remember, we dine at two on Sundays, Hugh; the
evening service commencing at four, in this month.
No, no, said Mary Warren, hurriedly, we ought not,
cannot
, quit Mr. Littlepage. These men may do him some
harm.
I was delighted with this simple, natural manifestation of
interest, as well as with the air of decision with which it
was made. Mary, herself, coloured at her own interest,
but did not the less maintain the ground she had taken.
Why, of what use can we be to Hugh, dear, even
admitting
what you say to be true? answered Patt; it were
better for us to hurry on to the house, and send those here
who can assist him in such a case, than stand by idle and
useless.
As if profiting by this hint, Miss Coldbrooke and Miss
Marston, who were already some little distance in advance,
went off almost on a run, doubtless intending to put my
sister's project into execution. But Mary Warren stood
firm, and Patt would not desert her friend, whatever might
have been her disposition to treat me with less consideration.
It is true, we may not be able to assist Mr. Littlepage,
should violence be attempted, the first remarked; but
violence
is, perhaps, what is least to be apprehended. These
wretched people so little regard truth, and they will be three
to one, if your brother be left alone; that it is better we stay
and
hear
what is said, in order that we may assert what
the facts really were, should these persons see fit to pervert
them, as too often happens.
Both Patt and myself were struck with the prudence and
sagacity of this suggestion; and the former now came quite
near to the stile, on which I was still standing, with an air
as steady and resolute as that of Mary Warren herself. Just
then the three men approached. Two of them I knew by
name, though scarcely in person, while the third was a
total stranger. The two of whom I had some knowledge,
were named Bunce and Mowatt, and were both tenants of
my own; and, as I have since learned, warm anti-renters.
The stranger was a travelling demagogue, who had been at
the bottom of the whole affair connected with the late
meeting
,
and who had made his two companions his tools. The
three came up to the stile, with an air of great importance,
nor could the dignity of their demeanour have been greater
had they been ambassadors extraordinary from the Emperor
of China.
Mr. Littlepage, commenced Mr. Bunce, with a
particularly
important physiognomy, there has been a
meeting
of the public, this morning, at which these resolutions
was passed. We have been appointed a committee to
deliver
a copy of them to you, and our duty is now performed,
by handing you this paper.
Not unless I see fit to accept it, I presume, sir, was
my answer.
I should think no man, in a free country, would refuse
to receive a set of resolutions that has been passed by a
meeting of his fellow-citizens.
That might depend on circumstances; the character of
the resolutions, in particular. The freedom of the country
it is, precisely, which gives one man the same right to say
he cares nothing about your resolutions, as it does you to
pass them.
But you have not looked at the resolutions, sir; and
until you do, you cannot know how you may like them.
That is very true; but I have looked at their bearers,
have seen their manner, and do not quite like the
assumption
of power which says any body of men can send me
resolutions, whether I like to receive them or not.
This declaration seemed to strike the committee aghast!
The idea that
one
man should hesitate to submit himself to
a yoke imposed by
a hundred
, was so new and
inconceivable
to those who deem majorities all in all, that they hardly
knew how to take it.
[3]
[3]
The prevalence of the notion of the omnipotence of majorities, in
America, is so wide-spread and deep, among the people in general, as
to form a distinctive trait in the national character. It is doing an
infinity of mischief, by being mistaken for the governing principle of
the institutions, when in fact it is merely a necessary expedient to
decide
certain questions which must be decided by somebody, and in some
mode or other. Kept in its proper sphere, the use of majorities is
replete
with justice, so far as justice
can
be exercised among men;
abused, it opens the highway to the most intolerable tyranny. As a
matter of course, the errors connected with this subject vary through
all the gradations of intellect and selfishness. The following anecdote
will give the reader some notion how the feeling impressed a stranger
shortly after his arrival in this country.
A year or two since, the writer had in his service an Irishman who
had been only two years in the country. It was a part of this man's
duty to look after the welfare of certain pigs, of which one occupied
the position of a `runt.' Has your honour looked at the pigs lately,
said the honest fellow, one day. No, not lately, Pat; is there any
change. That is there, indeed, sir, and a great change. The little
fellow is getting the
majority
of the rest, and will make the best hog
of 'em all!
Editor
.
At first there was an obvious
disposition
to resent the insult; then came reflection which
probably told them that such a course might not prove so
well, the whole terminating in a more philosophical
determination
of getting along easily.
Am I to understand, Mr. Littlepage, that you refuse to
accept the resolutions of a public meeting?
Yes; of half-a-dozen public meetings put together, if
those resolutions are offensive, or are offered offensively.
As to the resolutions, you can know nothing, having
never seen them. Of the right of any number of the people
to pass such resolutions as they may think proper, I presume
there can be no question.
Of that right, sir, there is a very great question, as has
been settled within the last few years, in our own Courts.
But, even if the right existed, and in as broad a way as you
seem to think, it would not form a right to force these
resolutions
on me.
I am, then, to tell the people you refuse even to read
their resolutions, 'Squire Littlepage.
You can tell them what you please, sir. I know of no
people, except in the legal sense, and under the limited
powers that they exercise by law. As for this new power,
which is rising up in the country, and has the impudence to
call itself the people, though composed of little knots of men
got together by management, and practised on by falsehood,
it has neither my respect nor dread; and as I hold it in
contempt, I shall treat it with contempt, whenever it comes
in my way.
I am, then, to tell the people of Ravensnest, you hold
them in contempt, sir.
I authorize you to tell the people of Ravensnest nothing,
as coming from me, for I do not know that the people of
Ravensnest have employed you. If you will ask me,
respectfully
,
as if you were soliciting a favour instead of
demanding
a right, to read the contents of the paper you hold
in your hand, I may be willing to comply. What I object
to, is a handful of men's getting together, setting themselves
up as the people, pretending to authority in that capacity,
and claiming a right to
force
their notions on other folks.
The three committee-men now drew back a few paces,
and consulted together apart, for two or three minutes.
While they were thus employed, I heard the sweet gentle
voice of Mary Warren say at my elbowTake their
resolutions
,
Mr. Littlepage, and get rid of them. I dare say
they are very silly, but you will get rid of them all the
sooner, by receiving the paper. This was woman's
advice
,
which is a little apt to err on the side of concession,
when her apprehensions are aroused; but I was spared the
pain of not complying with it, by the altered tone of the trio,
who now came up to the stile again, having apparently
come to a final decision in the premises.
Mr. Hugh Roger Littlepage, junior, said Bunce in a
solemn voice, and in a manner as precise as if he were
making some legal tender that was of the last importance,
and which required set phrases, I now ask you, in a
most respectful manner, if you will consent to receive this
paper. It contains certain resolutions, passed with great
unanimity by the people of Ravensnest, and which may be
found to affect you. I am directed respectfully to ask you,
if you will accept this copy of the said resolutions.
I cut the rest of the speech short by receiving the
proffered
paper, and I thought all three of the worthy
ambassadors
looked disappointed at my having done so. This gave
a new turn to my ideas, and had they now demanded their
resolutions back again, they should not have had them, so
long as the revolvers could do their duty. For a moment,
I do believe Bunce was for trying the experiment. He and
his companions would have been delighted to have it in
their power to run up and down the country crying out that
the aristocrat-landlord, young Littlepage, held the people in
contempt, and had refused even to accept the resolutions
they had deigned, in their majesty, to pass. As it was,
however, I had sufficiently rebuked the presumption of these
pretenders to liberty, avoided all the consequences of their
clamour in that behalf, and had an opportunity to gratify a
curiosity to know what the leaders of the meeting had been
about, and to read their resolutions. I say, the leaders of
the meeting, for it is very certain the meetings themselves,
on all such occasions, have no more to do with the forming,
or entertaining the opinions that are thus expressed, than if
they had been in Kamtschatka, the whole time. Folding
the paper, therefore, and putting it in my pocket, I bowed
to the committee, saying, as I descended the stile on the
other side of the fence
It is well, gentlemen; if the resolutions require any
notice
,
they'll be sure to receive it. Public meetings held of a
Sunday are so unusual in this part of the world, that this
may have interest with that small portion of the State which
does not dwell at Ravensnest.
I thought the committee was a little abashed; but the
stranger, or the travelling demagogue, caught at my words,
and answered as I walked away, in company with Patt and
Mary Warren
The better day, the better deed. The matter related to
the Sabbath, and no time so suitable as the Sabbath to act
on it.
I will down I was dying with curiosity to read the
resolutions
,
but dignity prevented any such thing until we had
reached a spot where the path led through a copse, that
concealed
us from observation. Once under that cover,
however
,
I eagerly drew out the paper, the two girls drawing
near to listen, with as lively an interest as that I felt myself
in the result.
Here you may see at a glance, I cried, shaking open
the folds of the paper, the manner in which the
people
so
often pass their resolutions! All this writing has a very
school-master air, and has been done with care and
deliberation
,
whereas there was certainly no opportunity to make
a copy as fair as this of anything out in the highway where
the meeting was actually held. This proves that matters
have been cut and dried for the sovereign people, who, like
other monarchs, are saved a great deal of trouble by their
confidential servants.
I dare say, said Patt, two or three men down at the
village prepared everything, and then brought their work
up to the meeting to be read and approved, and to go forth
as public sentiment.
If it were only honestly approved by even those who
heard it read, it would be another matter; but two-thirds of
every meeting are nothing but dough-faces, that are moulded
to look whichever way the skilful manager may choose. But
let us see what these notable resolutions are; we may like
them, possibly, after having read them.
It is so extraordinary to have a public meeting of a
Sunday in this part of the world! exclaimed Mary
Warren.
I now set about reading the contents of the paper, which,
at a glance, I saw had been very carefully prepared for
publication
,
and no doubt would soon figure in some of the
journals. Fortunately, this business has been so much
overdone
,
and so many meetings are held that flatly contradict
each other, though all represent public sentiment, fire is
made so effectually to fight fire, that the whole procedure is
falling into contempt, and the public is actually losing the
great advantage which, under a more temperate use of its
power, it might possess, by making known from time to
time, as serious occasions offered, its true opinions and
wishes. As things actually are, every man of intelligence
is fully aware that simulated public opinions are much the
most noisy and active in the country, and he regards nothing
of the sort of which he hears or reads, unless he happen to
know something of the authority. It is the same with the
newspaper press generally; into such deep discredit has it
fallen, that not only is its power to do evil much curtailed,
but it has nearly lost all power to do good; for, by indulging
in licentiousness, and running into the habit of crying
wolf, nobody is disposed to believe, were the beast actually
committing its ravages in the flocks of the nation. There
are but two ways for a man to regain a position from which
he has departed; the one is by manfully retracing his steps,
and the other is by making a circuit so complete that
all who choose to watch him may see and understand all
sides of him, and estimate him accordingly. The last is
likely to be the career of demagogueism and the press; both
of which have already gone so far as to render retreat next
to impossible, and who can only regain any portion of public
confidence by being satisfied with completing their circuit,
and falling in the rear of the nation, content to follow those
whom it has been their craving ambition to lead.
At a meeting of the citizens of Ravensnest, I began to
read aloud, spontaneously convened, June 22d, 1845, in
the public highway, after attending divine service in the
Episcopal meeting-house, according to the forms of the
established
denomination of England, on the church and state
system, Onesiphoras Hayden, Esquire, was called to the
chair, and Pulaski Todd, Esquire, was appointed Secretary.
After a luminous and eloquent exposition of the objects of
the meeting, and some most pungent strictures on aristocracy
and the rights of man, from Demosthenes Hewlett and John
Smith, Esquires, the following expression of public
sentiment
was sustained by an undivided unanimity:Resolved,
that a temperate expression of public opinion is useful to the
Vol. II.  13
rights of freemen, and is one of the most precious privileges
of freedom, as the last has been transmitted to us in a free
country by our ancestors, who fought and bled for free and
equal institutions on free and equal grounds.
Resolved, That we prize this privilege, and shall ever
watch over its exercise with vigilance, the price of liberty.
Resolved, That, as all men are equal in the eyes of the
law, so are they much more so in the eyes of God.
Resolved, That meeting-houses are places constructed
for the convenience of the people, and that nothing ought to
be admitted into them that is opposed to public sentiment,
or which can possibly offend it.
Resolved, That, in our judgment, the seat that is good
enough for one man is good enough for another; that we
know no difference in families and races, and that pews
ought to be constructed on the principles of equality, as well
as laws.
Resolved, That canopies are royal distinctions, and quite
unsuited to republicans; and most of all, to republican
meeting-houses
.
Resolved, That religion should be adapted to the
institutions
of a country, and that a republican form of
government
is entitled to a republican form of religion; and that
we do not see the principles of freedom in privileged seats
in the House of God.
That resolution has been got up as a commentary on
what has been circulated so much, of late, in the
newspapers
,
cried Mary Warren, quickly; in which it has been
advanced, as a recommendation of certain sects, that their
dogmas and church-government are more in harmony with
republicanism than certain others, our own church
included
.
One would think, I answered, if this conformity be
a recommendation, that it would be the duty of men to make
their institutions conform to the church, instead of the church's
conforming to the institutions.
Yes; but it is not the fashion to reason in this way,
now-a-days. Prejudice is just as much appealed to in
matters
connected with religion, as with anything else.
Resolved, I continued to read, That in placing a
canopy over his pew, in St. Andrew's meeting-house,
Ravensnest
,
Gen. Cornelius Littlepage conformed to the spirit
of a past age, rather than to the spirit of the present time,
and that we regard its continuance there as an aristocratical
assumption of a superiority that is opposed to the character
of the government, offensive to liberty, and dangerous as an
example.
Really that is too bad! exclaimed Patt, vexed at heart,
even while she laughed at the outrageous silliness of the
resolutions, and all connected with them. Dear,
liberal-minded
grandpapa, who fought and bled for that very liberty
about which these people cant so much, and who was actively
concerned in framing the very institutions that they do not
understand, and are constantly violating, is accused of being
false to what were notoriously his own principles!
Never mind that, my dear; there only remain three
more resolutions: let us hear them. `Resolved, That we
see an obvious connection between crowned heads, patents
of nobility, canopied pews, personal distinctions, leasehold
tenures, land-
Lords
, days' works, fat fowls, quarter-sales,
three-lives leases, and
Rent
.'
Resolved, That we are of opinion that, when the owners
of barns wish them destroyed, for any purpose whatever,
there is a mode less alarming to a neighbourhood than by
setting them on fire, and thus giving rise to a thousand
reports
and accusations that are wanting in the great merit of
truth.
Resolved, That a fair draft be made of these
resolutions
,
and a copy of them delivered to one Hugh Roger
Littlepage
,
a citizen of Ravensnest, in the county of
Washington
;
and that Peter Bunce, Esq., John Mowatt, Esq., and
Hezeckiah Trott, Esq., be a committee to see that this act
be performed.
Whereupon the meeting adjourned,
sine die
.
Onesiphorus
Hayden, chairman; Pulaski Todd, secretary.
Whe-e-e-w! I whistled, here 's gunpowder enough
for another Waterloo!
What means that last resolution, Mr. Littlepage? asked
Mary Warren, anxiously. That about the barn.
Sure enough; there is a latent meaning there which has
its sting. Can the scoundrels intend to insinuate that
I
caused that barn to be set on fire!
If they should, it is scarcely more than they have
attempted
to do with every landlord they have endeavoured to
rob, said Patt, with spirit. Calumny seems a natural
weapon of those who get their power by appealing to
numbers
.
That is natural enough, my dear sister; since prejudice
and passion are quite as active agents as reason and facts,
in the common mind. But this is a slander that shall be
looked to. If I find that these men really wish to circulate a
report that I caused my own barn to be set on firepshaw!
nonsense, after all; have we not Newcome, and that other
rascal in confinement, at this moment, for attempting to set
fire to my
house?
Be not too confident, Mr. Littlepage, said Mary, with
an anxiety so pointed that I could not but feel its flattery
my dear father tells me he has lost most of his confidence
in innocence, except as One above all weaknesses shall be
the judge: this very story may be got up expressly to throw
distrust on your accusations against the two incendiaries
you have taken in the act. Remember how much of the
facts will depend on your own testimony.
I shall have
you
to sustain me, Miss Warren, and the
juror is not living, who would hesitate to believe that to
which you will testify. But here we are approaching the
house; we will talk no more on the subject, lest it distress
my grandmother.
We found all quiet at the Nest, no report of any sort
having come from the red-men. Sunday was like any other
day to them, with the exception that they so far deferred to
our habits, as to respect it, to a certain extent, while in our
presence. Some writers have imagined that the aborigines
of America are of the lost tribes of Israel; but it seems to
me that such a people could never have existed apart,
uninfluenced
by foreign association, and preserved no tradition,
no memorial of the Jewish Sabbath. Let this be as it may,
John, who met us at the door, which we reached just after
my uncle and grandmother, reported all quiet, so far as he
knew anything of the state of the farm-buildings.
They got enough last night, I 'se thinking, Mr. Hugh,
and has found out by this time, that it 's better to light a fire
in one of their own cook-stoves, than come to light it on the
floor of a gentleman's kitchen. I never heard it said, sir,
that the Hamericans was as much Hirish as they be
Henglish
,
but to me they seems to grow every day more like the
wild Hirishers, of whom we used to hear so much in Lun'un.
Your honoured father, sir, would never have believed that
his own dwelling would be entered, at night, by men who
are his very neighbours, and who act like burglariouses, as
if they were so many Newgate birds,no. Why, Mr.
Hugh, this 'Squire Newcome, as they call him, is an
hattorney
,
and has often dined here at the Nest. I have 'anded
him his soup, and fish, and wine, fifty times, just as if he
was a gentleman, and to his sister, Miss Hopportunity, too;
and they to come to set fire to the house, at midnight!
You do Miss Opportunity injustice, John; for
she
has
not had the least connection with the matter.
Well, sir, nobody knows anything, now-a-daysI
declare
,
my eyes be getting weak, or there is the young lady,
at this very instant!
Young lady! where?you do not mean Opportunity
Newcome, surely.
I does though, sir, and it 's she, sure enough. If that
is n't Miss Hopportunity, the prisoner that the savages has
got up in the cellar of the old farm-house, is n't her
brother.
John was quite right; there was Opportunity standing in
the very path, and at the very spot where I had last seen
her disappear from my sight, the past night. That spot
was just where the path plunged into the wooded ravine, and
so far was her person concealed by the descent, that we could
only perceive the head, and the upper part of the body. The
girl had shown herself just that much, in order to attract
my attention, in which she had no sooner succeeded, than,
by moving downward a few paces, she was entirely hid
from sight. Cautioning John to say nothing of what had
passed, I sprang down the steps, and walked in the direction
of the ravine, perfectly satisfied I was expected, and far
from certain that this visit did not portend further evil.
The distance was so short that I was soon at the verge
of the ravine, but when I reached it Opportunity had
disappeared
.
Owing to the thicket, her concealment was easily
obtained, while she might be within a few yards from me,
13 *
and I plunged downwards, bent only on ascertaining her
object. One gleam of distrust shot across my mind, I will
own, as I strided down the declivity; but it was soon lost in
the expectation and curiosity that were awakened by the
appearance
of the girl.
I believe it has already been explained, that in this part
of the lawn a deep, narrow ravine had been left in wood, and
that the bridle-path that leads to the hamlet had been carried
directly through it, for effect. This patch of wood may be
three or four acres in extent, following the course of the
ravine until it reaches the meadows, and it contains three or
four rustic seats, intended to be used in the warmer months.
As Opportunity was accustomed to all the windings and
turnings of the place, she had posted herself near one of
these seats, which stood in a dense thicket, but so near the
main path as to enable her to let me know where she was
to be found, by a low utterance of my name, as my tread
announced my approach. Springing up the by-path, I was
at her side in an instant. I do believe that, now she had so
far succeeded, the girl sunk upon the seat from inability to
stand.
Oh! Mr. Hugh! she exclaimed, looking at me with a
degree of nature and concern in her countenance that it was
not usual to see thereSenmy poor brother Senwhat
have
I done?what
have
I done?
Will you answer me one or two questions, Miss
Opportunity
,
with frankness, under the pledge that the replies
never shall be used to injure you or yours? This is a very
serious affair, and should be treated with perfect frankness.
I will answer any thing to
you
any question you can
put me, though I might blush to do sobut, laying her
hand familiarly, not to say tenderly on my armwhy
should we be
Mr.
Hugh and
Miss
Opportunity to each
other, when we were so long Hugh and Op? Call me Op
again, and I shall feel that the credit of my family and the
happiness of poor Sen are, after all, in the keeping of a
true friend.
No one can be more willing to do this than myself, my
dear Op, and I am willing to be Hugh again. But, you
know all that has passed.
I doyes, the dreadful news has reached us, and
mother would n't leave me a moment's peace till I stole out
again to see you.
Again?Was your mother, then, acquainted with the
visit of last night?
Yes, yesshe knew it all, and advised it all.
Your mother is a most thoughtful and prudent parent,
I answered, biting my lip, and I shall know hereafter
how much I am indebted to her. To
you
, Opportunity, I
owe the preservation of my house, and possibly the lives of
all who are most dear to me.
Well, that 's something, any how. There 's no grief that
has n't its relief. But, you must know, Hugh, that I never
could or did suppose that Sen himself would be so weak as
to come in his own person on such an errand! I did n't
want telling to understand that, in anti-rent times, fire and
sword are the law,but, take him in general, Sen is
altogether
prudent and cautious. I 'd a bit my tongue off before
I 'd a got my own brother into so cruel a scrape. No, no
do n't think so ill of me as to suppose I came to tell of Sen!
It is enough for me that I know how much trouble you
took to warn me of danger. It is unnecessary for me to
think of
you
in any other light than that of a friend.
Ah, Hugh! how happy and merry we all of us used to
be a few years since! That was before your Miss
Coldbrookes
,
and Miss Marstons, and Mary Warrens ever saw the
country.
Then
we
did
enjoy ourselves, and I hope such
times will return. If Miss Martha would only stick to old
friends, instead of running after new ones, Ravensnest
would be Ravensnest again.
You are not to censure my sister for loving her own
closest associates best. She is several years our junior,
you will remember, and was scarcely of an age to be
our
companion six years ago.
Opportunity had the grace to colour a little, for she had
only used Patt as a cloak to make her assaults on me, and
she knew as well as I did that my sister was good seven
years younger than herself. This feeling, however, was
but momentary, and she next turned to the real object of
this visit.
What am I to tell mother, Hugh?You will let Sen
off, I know!
I reflected, for the first time, on the hardships of the
case; but felt a strong reluctance to allow incendiaries to
escape.
The facts must be known, soon, all over the town, I
remarked.
No fear of that: they are pretty much known, already.
News
does
fly
fast
, at Ravensnest, all must admit.
Ay, if it would only fly
true
. But, your brother can
hardly remain here, after such an occurrence.
Lord! How you talk! If the law will only let him
alone, who 'd trouble him for this? You havn't been home
long enough, to learn that folks don't think half as much of
setting fire to a house, in anti-rent times, as they 'd think of
a trespass, under the old-fashioned law. Anti-rent alters
the whole spirit.
How true was this! And we have lads among us, who
have passed from their tenth to their eighteenth and
twentieth
years, in a condition of society that is almost
hopelessly
abandoned to the most corrupting influence of all
the temptations that beset human beings. It is not
surprising
that men begin to regard arson as a venial offence,
when the moral feeling of the community is thus unhinged,
and boys are suffered to grow into manhood, in the midst
of notions so fatal to every thing that is just and safe.
But the law itself will not be quite as complaisant as the
`folks.' It will scarcely allow incendiaries to escape; and
your brother would be compelled to flee the land.
What of that? How many go off, and stay off for a
time; and that 's better than going up north to work at the
new prison. I 'm not a bit afraid of Sen's being hanged, for
these an't hanging times, in this country; but it is
some
disgrace
to a family to have a member in the state's prison.
As for any punishment that is lasting, you can see how it
is, as well as I. There 've been men murdered about
anti-rentism
,
but, Lord! the senators and assemblymen will
raise such a rumpus, if you go to punish them, that it won't
be long, if things go on as they have, before it will be
thought more honourable to be put in jail for shooting a
peace-officer, than to stay out of it, for not having done it.
Talk 's all; and if folks have a mind to make any thing
honourable
,
they 've only to say so often enough, to make it out.
Such were the notions of Miss Opportunity Newcome,
on the subject of modern morals, and how far was she from
the truth? I could not but smile at the manner in which
she treated things, though there was a homely and practical
common sense in her way of thinking, that was probably of
more efficiency than would have been the case with a more
refined and nicer code. She looked at things as they are,
and that is always something towards success.
As for myself, I was well enough disposed to consider
Opportunity, in this unfortunate affair of the fire, for it
would have been a cruel thing to suffer the girl to imagine
she had been an instrument in destroying her brother. It
is true, there is no great danger of a rogue's being hanged,
now-a-days, and Seneca was not sufficiently a gentleman,
though very tenacious of the title, to endanger his neck.
Had he been a landlord, and caught lighting a fire on the
kitchen-floor of one of the tenants, the State would not grow
hemp enough for his execution; but it was a very different
thing to catch a tenant at that work. I could not but ask
myself, how many of the honourable gentlemen at Albany
would interfere in
my
behalf, had matters been reversed; for
this is the true mode of arriving at the `spirit of the
institutions
;'
or, rather, I have just as good a right to affirm such
is their `spirit,' as any one has to assert that the lease-hold
tenure is opposed to them; the laws and institutions
themselves
,
being equally antagonist to both.
The results of the interview I had with Opportunity were,
1stly,I kept my heart just where it was at its
commencement
,
though I am not certain that it was in my own
custody
;
2dly,The young lady left me much encouraged on
the subject of the credit of the Newcomes, though I took
very good care not to put myself in her power, by
promising
to compromise felony; 3dly,I invited the sister to
come openly to the Nest, that evening, as one of the means
to be employed in attaining her endsas respects Seneca,
be it remembered, not as respects
me;
and lastly, we parted
just as good friends as we ever had been, and entertaining
exactly the same views as regards each other. What those
views were, it may not be modest in me to record.
CHAPTER XI.
If men desire the rights of property, they must take their
consequences
;
distinction in social classes. Without the rights of property
civilization can hardly exist; while the highest class of improvements
is probably the result of the very social distinctions that so many decry.
The great political problem to be solved, is to ascertain if the social
distinctions that are inseparable from civilization can really exist with
perfect equality in political rights. We are of opinion they can; and
as much condemn him who vainly contends for a visionary and
impracticable
social equality, as we do him who would deny to men
equal opportunities for advancement.
Political Essay
.
My
interview with Opportunity Newcome remained a
secret between those who first knew of it. The evening
service in St. Andrew's was attended only by the usual
congregation
,
all the curiosity of the multitude seeming to have
been allayed by the visit in the morning. The remainder
of the day passed as usual, and, after enjoying a pleasant
even-tide, and the earlier hours of the night in the company
of the girls, I retired early to bed, and slept profoundly until
morning. My uncle Ro partook of my own philosophical
temper, and we encouraged each other in it by a short
conversation
that occured in his room before we respectively
retired to rest.
I agree with you, Hugh, said my uncle, in reply to a
remark of my own; there is little use in making ourselves
unhappy about evils that
we
cannot help. If we
are
to be
burnt up and stripped of our property, we
shall
be burnt up
and stripped of our property. I have a competency secured
in Europe, and we can all live on
that
, with economy, should
the worst come to the worst.
It is a strange thing, to hear an American talk of
seeking a refuge of any sort in the old world!
If matters proceed in the lively manner they have for
the last ten years, you'll hear of it often. Hitherto, the rich
of Europe have been in the habit of laying by a penny in
America against an evil day; but the time will soon come,
unless there is a great change, when the rich of America will
return the compliment, in kind. We are worse off than if
we were in a state of nature, in many respects; having
our
hands tied by the responsibility that belongs to our position
and means, while those who choose to assail us are under a
mere nominal restraint. They make the magistrates, who
are altogether in their interests; and they elect the sheriffs
who are to see the laws executed. The theory is, that the
people are sufficiently virtuous to perform all these duties
well; but no provision has been made for the case in which
the people themselves happen to go astray,
en masse
.
We have our governors and masters at Albany, sir.
Yes, we
have
our governors and servants at Albany,
and there they are! There has not been the time, probably,
since this infernal spirit first had its rise among us, that a
clear, manly, energetic, and well-principled proclamation,
alone, issued by the Governor of this State, would not have
aroused all the better feelings of the community, and put
this thing down; but, small as would have been that tribute
to the right, it has never been paid, and, until we drop
double-distilled
patriots, and have recourse again to the old-fashioned,
high-principled gentlemen for offices of mark, it never will
be done. Heaven preserve me from extra-virtuous,
patriotic
,
and enlightened citizens; no good ever comes of them.
I believe the wisest way, sir, is to make up our minds
that we have reached the point of reaction in the institutions,
and be ready to submit to the worst. I keep the `revolver'
well primed, and hope to escape being burnt up at least.
After a little more such discourse, we parted and sought
our pillows, and I can say that I never slept more soundly
in my life. If I did lose my estate, it was what other men
had suffered and survived, and why might not I as well as
another? It is true, those other men were, in the main, the
victims of what are called tyrants; but others, again, had
certainly been wronged by the masses. Thousands have
been impoverished in France, for instance, by the political
confiscations of the multitude, and thousands enriched by
illgotten
gains, profiting by the calamities of those around
them; and what has happened there might happen here.
Big words ought to pass for nothing. No man was ever a
whit more free because he was the whole time boasting of
his liberty, and I was not now to learn that when numbers
did inflict a wrong, it was always of the most intolerable
character. Ordinarily, they were not much disposed to this
species of crime; but men in masses were no more
infallible
than individuals. In this philosophic mood, I slept.
I was awoke next morning by John's appearing at my
bedside, after having opened the shutter of my windows.
I declare to you, Mr. Hugh, began this well-meaning,
but sometimes officious servant, I don't know what will
come next at Ravensnest, now the evil spirit has got
uppermost
among the inhabitants!
Tut, tut, Johnwhat you call the evil spirit is only the
`Spirit of the Institutions;' and is to be honoured, instead
of disliked.
Well, sir, I don't know what they calls it, for they talks
so much about the hinstitutions in this country, I never can
find out what they would be at. There was a hinstitution
near where I lived in my last place, at the West End, in
Lon'on, and there they taught young masters to speak and
write Latin and Greek. But hinstitutions in Hamerica must
mean something, for them as doesn't know any more Latin
than I do seems to be quite hintimate with these Hamerican
hinstitutions. But, Mr. Hugh, would you,
could
you,
believe
the people committed parricide last night?
I am not at all surprised at it, for, to me, they have
seemed to be bent on matricide for some time, calling the
country their mother.
It 's hawful, sirit 's truly hawful, when a whole people
commits such a crime as parricide! I know'd you would
be shocked to hear it, Mr. Hugh, and so I just came in to
let you know it.
I am infinitely obliged to you for this attention, my
good fellow, and shall be still more so when you tell me all
about it.
Yes, sir, most willingly, and most unwillingly, too.
But there 's no use in 'iding the fact; it 's gone, Mr. Hugh!
What is gone, John?  Speak out, my good fellow; I
can bear it.
The pew, siror, rather that beautiful canopy that
covered
it, and made it look so much like the Lord Mayor's seat
in Guildhall. I 'ave hadmired and honoured that canopy,
sir, as the most helegant hobject in this country, sir.
So they have destroyed it at last, have they?
Encouraged
and sustained by an expression of public sentiment, as
proclaimed in a meeting that had a chairman and secretary,
they have actually cut it down, I suppose?
They have, sir; and a pretty job they 've made of it.
There it stands, up at Miller's, hover his pig-pen!
This was not a very heroic termination of the career of
the obnoxious canopy; but it was one that made me laugh
heartily. John was a little offended at this levity, and he
soon left me to finish my toilet by myself. I dare say,
many of the honest folk of Ravensnest would have been as
much surprised as John himself, at the indifference I
manifested
at the fate of this dignified pew. But, certainly, so
far as my own social elevation, or social depression, were
concerned, I cared nothing about it. It left me just where I
wasneither greater nor otherwise; and as for any
monuments
to let the world know who my predecessors had been,
or who I was at that moment, the country itself, or the part
of it in which we dwelt, was sufficient. Its history must
be forgotten, or changed, before our position could be
mistaken
;
though I dare say, the time will come when some
extremely sublimated friend of equality will wish to
extinguish
all the lights of the past, in order that there may not
exist that very offensive distinction of one man's name
being illustrated, while another man's name is not. The
pride of family is justly deemed the most offensive of all
pride, since a man may value himself on a possession to
which he has not the smallest claim in the way of personal
merit, while those of the highest personal claims are
altogether
deprived of an advantage, to the enjoyment of which
ancestors alone have created the right. Now, the
institutions
,
both in their letter and their spirit,
do
favour justice,
in this particular, as far as they can; though even they are
obliged to sustain one of the most potent agents to such
distinctions
,
by declaring, through the laws, that the child
shall succeed to the estate of the father. When we shall
get every thing straight, and as it ought to be, in this
progressive
country, Heaven only knows; for I find my tenants
laving stress on the fact that
their
fathers have leased my
Vol. II.14
lands for generations, while they are quite willing to forget
that
my
fathers were the lessors all the while.
I found all four of the girls on the piazza, breathing the
air of as balmy a summer morning as a bountiful nature
ever bestowed. They had heard of the fate of the canopy,
which affected them differently, and somewhat according to
temperament. Henrietta Coldbrooke laughed at it violently,
and in a way I did not like; your laughing young lady
rarely having much beyond merriment in her. I make
all allowance for youthful spirits, and a natural disposition
to turn things into fun; but it was too much to laugh at this
exploit of the anti-renters, for quite half an hour together.
I liked Anne Marston's manner of regarding it better. She
smiled a good deal, and laughed just enough to show that
she was not insensible to the effect of an absurdity; and
then she looked as if she felt that a wrong had been done.
As for Patt, she was quite indignant at the insult; nor was
she very backward in letting her opinions be known. But
Mary Warren's manner of viewing the affair pleased me
best, as indeed was fast getting to be the fact with most of
her notions and conceits. She manifested neither levity nor
resentment. Once or twice, when a droll remark escaped
Henrietta, she laughed a little; a very little, and
involuntarily
,
as it might be  just enough to prove that there was
fun in her  when she would make some sensible
observation
,
to the effect that the evil temper that was up in the
country was the true part of the transaction that deserved
attention; and that she
felt
this as well as saw it. Nobody
seemed to care for the canopy  not even my excellent
grandmother, in whose youth the church had been built,
when distinctions of this sort were more in accordance with
the temper and habits of the times, than they are to-day. I
had been on the piazza just long enough to note this
difference
in the manner of the girls, when my grandmother
joined us.
Oh! grandmother, have you heard what those wretches
of `Injins,' as they are rightly named, have been doing with
the canopy of the pew? cried Patt, who had been at the
bedside of our venerable parent, and kissed her an hour
before
:
they have torn it down, and placed it over the pen
of the pigs!
A common laugh, in which Patt herself now joined,
interrupted
the answer for a moment, old Mrs. Littlepage
herself
manifesting a slight disposition to make one of the
amused.
I have heard it all, my dear, returned my
grandmother
,
and, on the whole, think the thing is well enough
gotten rid of. I do not believe it would have done for Hugh
to have had it taken down, under a menace, while it is
perhaps
better that it should no longer stand.
Were such things common, in your youth, Mrs.
Littlepage
?
asked Mary Warren.
Far from uncommon; though less so in country than in
town churches. You will remember that we were but
recently
separated from England, when St. Andrew's was
built, and that most of the old colonial ideas prevailed among
us. People, in that day, had very different notions of social
station, from those which now exist; and New York was,
in a certain sense, one of the most, perhaps
the
most
aristocratical
colony in the country. It was somewhat so under
the Dutch, republicans as they were, with its patroons; but
when the colony was transferred to the English, it became
a royal colony at once, and English notions were introduced
as a matter of course. In no other colony was there as
many manors, perhaps; the slavery of the south
introducing
quite a different system there, while the policy of Penn
and of New England, generally, was more democratic. I
apprehend, Roger, that we owe this anti-rent struggle, and
particularly the feebleness with which it is resisted, to the
difference of opinion that prevails among the people of New
England, who have sent so many immigrants among us,
and our own purely New York notions.
You are quite right, my dear mother, answered my
uncle, though New Yorkers, by descent, are not wanting
among the tenants, to sustain the innovation. The last act
either from direct cupidity, or to gain popularity with a set:
whereas, as I view the matter, the first are influenced by
the notions of the state of society from which either they
themselves, or their parents, were directly derived. A very
large proportion of the present population of New York is
of New England origin. Perhaps one-third have this
extraction
,
either as born there, or as the sons or grandsons
of those who were. Now, in New England generally, great
equality of condition exists, more especially when you rise
above the lower classes; there being very few, out of the
large trading towns, who would be deemed rich in New
York, and scarcely such a thing as a large landholder, at
all. The relation of landlord and tenant, as connected with
what we should term estates, is virtually unknown to New
England; though Maine may afford some exceptions. This
circumstance is owing to the peculiar origin of the people,
and to the fact that emigration has so long carried off the
surplus population; the bulk of those who remain being able
to possess freeholds. There is a natural antipathy in men
who have been educated in such a state of society, to
anything
that seems to place others in positions they do not,
and cannot occupy themselves. Now, while the population
of New York may be one-third, perhaps, of New England
descent, and consequently more or less of New England
notions, a much larger proportion of the lawyers, editors of
newspapers, physicians, and active politicians, are of that
class. We think little, and talk little of these circumstances;
for no nation inquires into its moral influences, and what I
may call its political statistics, less than the Americans;
but they produce large consequences.
Am I to understand you, sir, to say that anti-rentism is
of New England origin?
Perhaps not. Its origin was probably more directly
derived from the devil, who has tempted the tenants as he is
known once to have tempted the Saviour. The outbreak
was originally among the descendants of the Dutch, for they
happened to be the tenants, and, as for the theories that
have been broached, they savour more of the reaction of
European abuses, than of anything American at all; and
least of all of anything from New England, where there is
generally a great respect for the rights of property, and
unusual
reverence for the law. Still, I think we owe our
greatest danger to the opinions and habits of those of New
England descent among us.
This seems a little paradoxical, uncle Ro, and I confess
I should like to hear it explained.
I will endeavour so to do, and in as few words as
possible
.
The real danger is among those who influence
legislation
.
Now, you will find hundreds of men among us, who
feel the vast importance of respecting contracts, who perceive
much of the danger of anti-rentism, and who wish to see it
defeated in its violent and most offensive forms, but who
lean against the great landlords, on account of those secret
jealousies which cause most men to dislike advantages in
which they do not share, and who would gladly enough see
all leases abolished, if it could be done without a too violent
conflict with justice. When you talk with these men, they
will make you the common-place but unmeaning profession
of wishing to see every husbandman the owner in fee of his
farm, instead of a tenant, and that it is a
hardship
to pay
rent, and quantities of such twaddle. Henry the Fourth, in
a much better spirit, is said to have wished that each of his
subjects had
une poule dans son pt
, but that wish did
not put it there. So it is with this idle profession of wishing
to see every American husbandman a freeholder. We all
know such a state of society never did exist, and probably
never will; and it is merely placing a vapid pretension to
philanthropy in the fore-ground of a picture that should
rigidly represent things as they are. For my part, I am
one of those who do not believe that this or any other country
would be any the better for dispensing with landlords and
tenants.
Mr. Littlepage! exclaimed Mary Warren, you surely
do not mean that competency widely diffused, is not better
than wealth in a few hands, and poverty in a great many!
No, I shall not go as far as that; but, I do say that
what this country most wants just now, is precisely the class
that is connected with the independence of character and
station, the leisure with its attendant cultivation and
refinement
,
and the
principles
as well as taste that are connected
with all.
Principles! Mr. Littlepage! added my uncle's sweet
interlocutor; my father would hardly uphold
that
, though
he agrees with you in so much of what you say.
I do not know that. I repeat the word
principles;
for,
when you have a class of men, who are removed from a
large range of temptations, without being placed above public
opinion, you get precisely those who are most likely to
uphold
that sort of secondary, but highly useful morals, which
14 *
are not directly derived from purely religious duties.
Against the last I shall not say one word, as it comes from
the grace, which is of the power of God, and is happily as
accessible to the poor as to the rich, and more too; but, of
men as they are, not one in a hundred regulates his life by
a standard created under such impulses; and even when they
do, the standard itself is, in some degree, qualified by the
ordinary notions, I apprehend. The Christian morality of an
East Indian is not identical with that of a Puritan, or that
of a man of highly cultivated mind, with that of one who
has enjoyed fewer advantages. There is one class of
principles
,
embracing all those that are adverse to the littlenesses
of daily practice, which is much the more extended among
the liberal-minded and educated, and it is to that set of
principles
I refer. Now we want a due proportion of that class
of men, as our society is getting to be organized; of those
who are superior to meannesses.
All this would be deemed atrociously aristocratic, were
it told in Gath! exclaimed Patt, laughing.
It is atrociously common sense, notwithstanding,
answered
my uncle, who was not to be laughed out of
anything
he felt to be true; and the facts will show it. New
England early established a system of common schools, and
no part of the world, perhaps, has a population that is better
grounded in intelligence. This has been the case so long
as to put the people of Connecticut and Massachusetts, for
instance, as a whole, materially in advance of the people of
any other State, New York included; although, by taking
the system from our eastern brethren, we are now doing
pretty well. Notwithstanding, who will say that New
England
is as far advanced, in many material things, as the
middle States. To begin with the kitchenher best cookery
is much below that of even the humbler classes of the true
middle States' families: take her language for another test,
it is provincial and vulgar; and there is no exaggeration in
saying that the labouring classes of the middle States, if not
of New England origin, use better English than thousands
of educated men in New England itself. Both of these
peculiarities
,
as I conceive, come from the fact that in one
part of the country there has been a class to give a tone
that does not exist in the other. The gentlemen of the larger
towns in the east have an influence where they live, no
doubt; but in the interior, as no one leads, all these matters
are left to the common mind to get along with, as well as it
can.
Aristocratic, sirrank aristocracy!
If it be, has aristocracy, as you call it, which in this
instance must only mean decided social position, no
advantages
?
Is not even a wealthy idler of some use in a nation?
He contributes his full share to the higher civilization that
is connected with the tastes and refinements, and, in fact,
he forms it. In Europe they will tell you that a court is
necessary to such civilization; but facts contradict the
theory. Social classes, no doubt, are; but they can exist
independently of courts, as they can, have, do, and ever will,
in the face of democracy. Now, connect this class with the
landed interest, and see how much your chances for
material
improvement are increased. Coke, of Norfolk,
probably
conferred more benefit on the husbandry of England
than all the mere operatives that existed in his time. It is
from such men, indeed, from their enterprise and their
means, that nearly all the greater benefits come. The fine
wool of America is mainly owing to Livingston's connection
with land; and if you drive such men out of existence, you
must drive the benefits they confer with them. A body of
intelligent, well-educated, liberalized landlords, scattered
through New York, would have more effect in advancing
the highest interests of the community than all the `small
potato' lawyers and governors you can name in a
twelvemonth
.
What is more, this is just the state of society in
which to reap all the benefits of such a class, without the
evils of a real aristocracy. They are and would be
without
any particular political power, and there is no danger
of corn-laws and exclusive legislation for their benefit. Rich
and poor we
must
have; and let any fair-minded man say
whether he wish a state of things in which the first shall
have no inducement to take an extended interest in real
estate, and the last no chance to become agriculturists,
except
as hired labourers?
You do not mince matters, uncle Ro, put in Patt, and
will never go to Congress.
That may be, my dear; but I shall retain my own
self-respect
by fair dealing. What I say I
mean
, while many
who take the other side do not. I say that, in a country
like this, in which land is so abundant as to render the evils
of a general monopoly impossible, a landed gentry is
precisely
what is most needed for the higher order of
civilization
,
including manners, tastes, and the minor principles,
and is the very class which, if reasonably maintained and
properly regarded, would do the most good at the least risk
of any social caste known. They
have
always existed in
New York, though with a lessening influence, and are the
reason, in my judgment, why we are so much before New
England in particular things, while certainly behind that
quarter of the country in many others that are dependent
on ordinary schooling.
I like to hear a person maintain his opinions frankly
and manfully, said my grandmother; and this have you
done, Roger, from boyhood. My own family, on my
father's
side, was from New England, and I subscribe to a
great deal that you say; and particularly to the part that
relates to the apathy of the public to this great wrong. It
is now time, however, to go to the breakfast-table, as John
has been bowing in the door, yonder, for the last minute or
two.
To breakfast we went; and, notwithstanding incendiaries,
anti-rentism, and canopies of pig-pens, a merry time we had
of it. Henrietta Coldbrooke and Anne Marston never came
out with more spirit, though in their several ways, than each
did that morning. I believe I looked a little surprised, for
I observed that my uncle stole occasional glances at me,
that seemed to say  there, my fine fellow, what do you
think of that, now? whenever either of his wards uttered
anything that he fancied cleverer than common.
Have you heard, ma'am, asked my uncle Ro of my
grandmother, that we are to have old Sus and Jaaf here
at the Nest, shortly, and both in grand costume? It seems
the red-men are about to depart, and there is to be smoking
of pipes, and a great council, which the Trackless fancies
will be more dignified if held in front of the house of his
pale-face friends, than if held at his own hut.
How did you ascertain that, Roger?
I have been at the wigwam, this morning, and have the
fact directly from the Onondago, as well as from the
interpreter
,
whom I met there. By the way, Hugh, we must
shortly decide what is to be done with the prisoners, or we
shall have writs of habeas corpus served on us, to know
why we detain them.
Is it possible, uncle Ro, for so his wards called him
habitually  to rescue a gentleman from the gallows by
marrying him? asked Henrietta Coldbrooke, demurely.
That is so strange a question, that as a guardian I feel
curious to hear its meaning.
Tell  tell at once, Henrietta  said the other ward,
urging her companion to speak. I will save your blushes,
and act as your interpreter. Miss Coldbrooke was honoured
by Mr. Seneca Newcome with this letter, within the last
twenty-four hours; and, it being a family matter, I think it
ought to be referred to a family council.
Nay, Anne, said the blushing Henrietta, this is hardly
fair  nor am I sure that it would be quite lady-like in me
to suffer that letter to be generally known
particularly
known to you, it certainly is, already.
Perhaps your reluctance to have it read does not extend
to me, Henrietta? said my uncle.
Certainly not, sir; nor to my dear Mrs. Littlepage, nor
to Marthathough I confess that I cannot see what interest
Mr. Hugh can have in the subject. Here it is; take it and
read it when you please.
My uncle was pleased to read it on the spot. As he
proceeded
,
a frown collected on his brow, and he bit his lip,
like one provoked as well as vexed. Then he laughed, and
threw the letter on the table, where no one presumed to
molest it. As Henrietta Coldbrooke was blushing all this
time, though she laughed and seemed provoked, our
curiosity
was so great and manifest, that my grandmother felt
an inclination to interfere.
May not that letter be read aloud, for the benefit of all?
she asked.
There can be no particular reason for concealing it,
answered uncle Ro, spitefully. The more it is known,
the more the fellow will be laughed at, as he deserves to
be.
Will that be right, uncle Ro? exclaimed Miss
Coldbrooke
,
hastily. Will it be treating a gentleman as
he
Pshaw!  it will not be treating a gentleman, at all.
The fellow is, at this moment, a prisoner for attempting to
set an inhabited house on fire, in the middle of the night.
Henrietta said no more; and my grandmother took the
letter, and read it for the common benefit. I shall not copy
the effusion of Seneca, which was more cunning than
philosophical
;
but it contained a strong profession of love,
urged in a somewhat business manner, and a generous offer
of his hand to the heiress of eight thousand a-year. And
this proposal was made only a day or two before the fellow
was `taken in the act,' and at the very time he was the most
deeply engaged in his schemes of anti-rentism.
There is a class of men among us, said my uncle, after
everybody had laughed at this magnificent offer, who do
not seem to entertain a single idea of the proprieties. How
is it possible, or where could the chap have been bred, to
fancy for an instant that a young woman of fortune and
station, would marry
him
, and that, too, almost without an
acquaintance. I dare say Henrietta never spoke to him ten
times in her life.
Not five, sir, and scarcely anything was said at either
of those five.
And you answered the letter, my dear? asked my
grandmother. An
answer
ought not to have been
forgotten
;
though it might have properly come, in this ease, from
your guardian.
I answered it myself, ma'am, not wishing to be laughed
at for my part of the affair. I declined the honour of Mr.
Seneca Newcome's hand.
Well, if the truth
must
be said, put in Patt, drily,
I
did the same thing, only three weeks since.
And I so lately as last week, added Anne Marston,
demurely.
I do not know that I ever saw my uncle Ro so strangely
affected. While everybody around him was laughing
heartily
,
he looked grave, not to say fierce. Then he turned
suddenly to me, and said
We must let him be hanged, Hugh. Were he to live
a thousand years he would never learn the fitness of things.
You'll think better of this, sir, and become more
merciful
.
The man has only nobly dared. But I confess a
strong desire to ascertain if Miss Warren alone has escaped
his assaults.
Marypretty Maryshe blushed scarlet, but shook her
head, and refused to give any answer. We all saw that her
feelings were not enlisted in the affair in any way; but
there was evidently something of a more serious nature
connected
with Seneca's addresses to her than in connection
with his addresses to either of the others. As I have since
ascertained, he really had a sort of affection for Mary; and
I have been ready to pardon him the unprincipled and
impudent
manner in which he cast his flies towards the other
fish, in consideration of his taste in this particular. But
Mary herself would tell us nothing.
You are not to think so much of this, Mr. Littlepage,
she cried, so soon as a little recovered from her confusion,
since it is only acting on the great anti-rent principle, after
all. In the one case, it is only a wish to get good farms
cheapand in the other, good wives.
In the one case, other men's farms  and in the other,
other men's wives.
Other men's wives, certainly, if wives at all, said Patt,
pointedly. There is no Mr.
Seneky
Newcome there.
We must let the law have its way, and the fellow be
hanged! rejoined my uncle. I could overlook the attempt
to burn the Nest House, but I cannot overlook this.
Fellows
of his class get everything
dessus dessous
, and I do not
wonder there is anti-rentism in the land. Such a
matrimonial
experiment could never have been attempted, as between
such parties, in any region but one tainted with anti-rentism,
or deluded by the devil.
An Irishman would have included my grandmother in
his cast of the net; that 's the only difference, sir.
Sure enough, why have you escaped, my dearest mother?
You, who have a fair widow's portion, too.
Because the suitor was not an Irishman, as Hugh
intimated
,I
know no other reason, Hodge. But a person so
devoted to the ladies must not suffer in the cruel way you
speak of. The wretch must be permitted to get off.
All the girls now joined with my grandmother in
preferring
this, to them, very natural petition; and, for a few
minutes, we heard of nothing but regrets, and solicitations
that Seneca might not be given up to the law. Tender
mercies
of the law might not be an unapt way to express the
idea, as it is now almost certain that the bigger the rogue,
the greater is the chance of escape.
All this is very well, ladies; mighty humane and
feminine
,
and quite in character, answered my uncle; but,
in the first place, there is such a thing as compounding
felony, and its consequences are not altogether agreeable;
then, one is bound to consider the effect on society in general.
Here is a fellow who first endeavours to raise a flame in the
hearts of no less than four young ladies; failing of which,
he takes refuge in lighting a fire in Hugh's kitchen. Do
you know, I am almost as much disposed to punish him for
the first of these offences as for the last?
There 's a grand movement as is making among all the
redskins, ma'am, said John, standing in the door of the
breakfast parlour, and I did n't know but the ladies, and
Mr. Littlepage, and Mr. Hugh, would like to see it. Old
Sus is on his way here, followed by Yop, who comes
grumbling
along after him, as if he did n't like the amusement
any way at all.
Have any arrangements been made for the proper
reception
of our guests this morning, Roger?
Yes, ma'am. At least, I gave orders to have benches
brought and placed under the trees, and plenty of tobacco
provided. Smoking is a great part of a council, I believe,
and we shall be ready to commence at that as soon as they
meet.
Yes, sir, all is ready for 'em, resumed John. Miller
has sent an 'orse cart to bring the benches, and we 've
provided
as much 'baccy as they can use. The servants 'opes,
ma'am, they can have permission to witness the ceremony.
It is n't often that civilized people
can
get a sight at real
savages.
My grandmother gave an assent, and there was a general
movement, preparatory to going on the lawn to witness the
parting interview between the Trackless and his visiters.
You have been very considerate, Miss Warren, I
whispered Mary, as I helped her to put on her shawl, in
not hetraying what I fancy is the most important of all
Seneca's love secrets.
I confess these letters have surprised me, the dear girl
said thoughtfully, and with a look that seemed perplexed.
No one would be apt to think very favourably of Mr.
Newcome; yet it was by no means necessary to complete
his character, that one should think as ill as this.
I said no more,but these few words, which appeared to
escape Mary unconsciously and involuntarily, satisfied me
that Seneca had been seriously endeavouring to obtain an
interest in
her
heart notwithstanding her poverty.
CHAPTER XII.
And underneath that face like summer's dreams,
Its lips as moveless, and its cheek as clear,
Slumbers a whirlwind of the heart's emotions,
Love, hatred, pride, hope, sorrowall save fear.
Halleck
.
The
only singularity connected with the great age of the
Indian and the negro, was the fact that they should have
been associates for near a century, and so long intimately
united in adventures and friendship. I say friendship, for
the term was not at all unsuited to the feeling that connected
these old men together, though they had so little in common,
in the way of character. While the Indian possessed all the
manly and high qualities of a warrior of the woods, of a
chief, and of one who had never acknowledged a superior,
the other was necessarily distinguished by many of the
wickednesses of a state of servitude; the bitter consequences
of a degraded caste. Fortunately, both were temperate, by
no means an every-day virtue among the red-men who dwelt
with the whites, though much more so with the blacks. But
Susquesus was born an Onondage, a tribe remarkable for
its sobriety, and at no period of his long life would be taste
Vol. II.  15
any intoxicating drink, while Jaaf was essentially a sober
man, though he had a thorough `nigger' relish for hard
cider. There can be little doubt that these two aged
memorials
of past ages, and almost forgotten generations, owed
their health and strength to their temperance, fortifying
natural
predispositions to tenacity of life.
It was always thought Jaaf was a little the senior of the
Indian, though the difference in their ages could not be
great. It is certain that the red-man retained much the
most of his bodily powers, though, for fifty years, he had
taxed them the least. Susquesus never worked; never would
work in the ordinary meaning of the term. He deemed it
to be beneath his dignity as a warrior, and, I have heard it
said, that nothing but necessity could have induced him to
plant, or hoe, even when in his prime. So long as the
boundless forest furnished the deer, the moose, the beaver,
the bear, and the other animals that it is usual for the
red-man
to convert into food, he had cared little for the fruits of
the earth, beyond those that were found growing in their
native state. His hunts were the last regular occupation
that the old man abandoned. He carried the rifle, and
threaded the woods with considerable vigour after he had
seen a hundred winters; but the game deserted him, under
the never-dying process of clearing acre after acre, until
little of the native forest was left, with the exception of the
reservation of my own, already named, and the pieces of
woodland that are almost invariably attached to every
American
farm, lending to the landscape a relief and beauty
that are usually wanting to the views of older countries.
It is this peculiarity which gives so many of the views of
the republic, nay, it may be said to all of them, so much of
the character of park-scenery when seen at a distance that
excludes the blemishes of a want of finish, and the coarser
appliances of husbandry.
With Jaaf, though he had imbibed a strong relish for the
forest, and for forest-life, it was different in many respects.
Accustomed to labour from childhood,
he
could not be kept
from work, even by his extreme old age. He had the hoe,
or the axe, or the spade in his hand daily, many years after
he could wield either to any material advantage. The little
he did in this way, now, was not done to kill thought, for he
never had any to kill; it was purely the effect of habit, and
of a craving desire to be Jaaf still, and to act his life over
again.
I am sorry to say that neither of these men had any
essential knowledge, or any visible feeling for the truths of
Christianity. A hundred years ago, little spiritual care was
extended to the black, and the difficulty of making an
impression
,
in this way, on the Indian, has become matter of
history. Perhaps success best attends such efforts when the
pious missionary can penetrate to the retired village, and
disseminate his doctrines far from the miserable illustration
of their effects, that is to be hourly traced, by the most casual
observer, amid the haunts of civilized men. That
Christianity
does produce a deep and benign influence on our social
condition cannot be doubted; but he who is only superficially
acquainted with Christian nations, as they are called, and
sets about tracing the effects of this influence, meets with so
many proofs of a contrary nature, as to feel a strong
disposition
to doubt the truth of dogmas that seem so impotent.
It is quite likely such was the case with Susquesus, who had
passed all the earlier years of his exclusive association with
the pale-faces, on the flanks of armies, or among hunters,
surveyors, runners, and scouts; situations that were not
very likely to produce any high notions of moral culture.
Nevertheless, many earnest and long-continued efforts had
been made to awaken in this aged Indian some notions of
the future state of a pale-face, and to persuade him to be
baptized. My grandmother, in particular, had kept this end
in view for quite half a century, but with no success. The
different clergy, of all denominations, had paid more or less
attention to this Indian, with the same object, though no
visible
results had followed their efforts. Among others, Mr.
Warren had not overlooked this part of his duty, but he had
met with no more success than those who had been before
him. Singular as it seemed to some, though I saw nothing
strange in it, Mary Warren had joined in this benevolent
project with a gentle zeal, and affectionate and tender
interest
,
that promised to achieve more than had been even
hoped for these many years by her predecessors in the same
kind office. Her visits to the hut had been frequent, and I
learned that morning from Patt, that, Though Mary
herself
never spoke on the subject, enough has been seen by
others to leave no doubt that her gentle offices and prayers
had, at last, touched, in some slight degree, the marble-like
heart of the Trackless.
As for Jaaf, it is possible that it was his misfortune to be
a slave in a family that belonged to the Episcopal Church, a
sect that is so tempered and chastened in its religious rites,
and so far removed from exaggeration, as often to seem cold
to those who seek excitement, and fancy quiet and
self-control
incompatible with a lively faith. `Your priests are
unsuited to make converts among the people,' said an
enthusiastic
clergyman of another denomination to me, quite
lately. `They cannot go among the brambles and thorns
without tearing their gowns and surplices.' There may be
a certain degree of truth in this, though the obstacle exists
rather with the convert than with the missionary. The
vulgar love coarse excitement, and fancy that a profound
spiritual sensibility must needs awaken a powerful physical
sympathy. To such, groans, and sighs, and lamentations
must be not only audible to exist at all, but audible in a
dramatic
and striking form with men, in order to be groans, and
sighs, and lamentations acceptable with God. It is certain,
at any rate, that the practices which reason, education, a
good taste, and a sound comprehension of Christian
obligations
condemn, are, if not
most
effective, still effective with
the ignorant and coarse-minded. Thus may it have been
with Jaaf, who had not fallen into the hands of the
exaggerated
during that period of life when he was most likely to
be aroused by their practices, and who now really seemed
to have lived beyond everything but the recollections
connected
with the persons and things he loved in youth.
As men, in the higher meaning of the term, the reader
will remember that Susquesus was ever vastly the superior
of the black. Jaaf's intellect had suffered under the blight
which seems to have so generally caused the African mind
to wither, as we know that mind among ourselves; while
that of his associate had ever possessed much of the loftiness
of a grand nature, left to its native workings by the impetus
of an unrestrained, though savage liberty.
Such were the characters of the two extraordinary men
whom we now went forth to meet. By the time we reached
the lawn, they were walking slowly towards the piazza,
having got within the range of the shrubbery that
immediately
surrounds, and sheds its perfume on the house. The
Indian led, as seemed to become his character and rank.
But Jaaf had never presumed on his years and indulgencies
so far as to forget his condition. A slave he had been
born, a slave had he lived, and a slave he would die. This,
too, in spite of the law of emancipation, which had, in fact,
liberated him long ere he had reached his hundredth year.
I have been told that when my father announced to Jaaf the
fact that he and all his progeny, the latter of which was
very numerous, were free and at liberty to go and do
as they pleased, the old black was greatly dissatisfied.
What good dat all do, Masser Malbone, he growled.
Whey 'ey won't let well alone? Nigger be nigger, and
white gentle'em be white gentle'em. I 'speck, now, nuttin'
but disgrace and poverty come on my breed! We alway
hab
been gentle'em's nigger, and why can't 'ey let us be
gentle'em's nigger, as long as we like? Ole Sus hab liberty
all he life, and what good he get? Nuttin' but poor red
sabbage, for all dat, and never be any t'ing more. If he
could be gentle'em's sabbage, I tell him,
dat
war' somet'ing;
but, no, he too proud for dat! Gosh! so he only he own
sabbage!
The Onondago was in high costume; much higher even
than when he first received the visit of the prairie Indians.
The paint he used, gave new fire to eyes that age had
certainly
dimmed, though they had not extinguished their light;
and fierce and savage as was the conceit, it unquestionably
relieved the furrows of time. That red should be as much
the favourite colour of the redskin is, perhaps, as natural as
that our ladies should use cosmetics to imitate the lilies and
roses that are wanting. A grim fierceness, however, was
the aim of the Onondago; it being his ambition, at that
moment
,
to stand before his guests in the colours of a warrior.
Of the medals and wampum, and feathers, and blankets, and
moccasins, gay with the quills of the porcupine, tinged half
a dozen hues, and the tomahawk polished to the brightness
of silver, it is not necessary to say anything. So much has
15 *
been said, and written, and seen, of late, on such subjects,
that almost every one now knows how the North American
warrior appears, when he comes forth in his robes.
Nor had Jaaf neglected to do honour to a festival that
was so peculiarly in honour of his friend. Grumble he
would and did, throughout the whole of that day; but he
was not the less mindful of the credit and honour of
Susquesus
.
It is the fashion of the times to lament the
disappearance
of the red-men from among us; but, for my part,
I feel much more disposed to mourn over the disappearance of
the nigger. I use the Doric, in place of the more modern
and mincing term of `coloured man;' for the Doric alone
will convey to the American the meaning in which I wish
to be understood. I regret the nigger; the old-fashioned,
careless, light-hearted, laborious, idle, roguish, honest,
faithful
,
fraudulent, grumbling, dogmatical slave; who was at
times good for nothing, and, again, the stay and support of
many a family. But, him I regret in particular is the domestic
slave, who identified himself with the interests, and most of
all with the
credit
of those he served, and who always played
the part of an humble privy counsellor, and sometimes that
of a prime minister. It is true, I had never seen Jaaf
acting
in the latter capacity, among us; nor is it probable he
ever did exactly discharge such functions with any of his
old masters; but, he was a much indulged servant always,
and had become so completely associated with us, by not only
long services, but by playing his part well and manfully in
divers of the wild adventures that are apt to characterize
the settlement of a new country, that we all of us thought of
him rather as an humble and distant relative, than as a slave.
Slave, indeed, he had not been for more than four-score
years, his manumission-papers having been signed and
regularly recorded as far back as that, though they
remained
a perfect dead letter, so far as the negro himself
was concerned.
The costume of Yop Littlepage, as this black was
familiarly
called by all who knew anything of his existence,
and his great age, as well as that of Susquesus, had got
into more than one newspaper, was of what might be termed
the old school of the `nigger!' The coat was scarlet, with
buttons of mother-of-pearl, each as large as a half-dollar;
his breeches were sky blue; the vest was green; the
stockings
striped blue and white, and the legs had no other
peculiarities
about them, than the facts that all that remained of
the calves were on the shins, and that they were stepped
nearer than is quite common to the centre of the foot; the
heel-part of the latter, being about half as long as the part
connected with the toes. The shoes, indeed, were
somewhat
conspicuous portions of the dress, having a length, and
breadth, and proportions that might almost justify a
naturalist
in supposing that they were never intended for a human
being. But, the head and hat, according to Jaaf's own
notion
,
contained the real glories of his toilette and person.
As for the last, it was actually laced, having formed a part
of my grandfather, Gen. Cornelius Littlepage's uniform in
the field, and the wool beneath it was as white as the snow
of the hills. This style of dress has long disappeared from
among the black race, as well as from among the whites;
but vestiges of it were to be traced, my uncle tells me, in
his boyhood; particularly at the pinkster holidays, that
peculiar
festival of the negro. Notwithstanding the incongruities
of his attire, Yop Littlepage made a very respectable figure
on this occasion, the great age of both him and the
Onondago
being the circumstances that accorded least with
their magnificence.
Notwithstanding the habitual grumbling of the negro, the
Indian always led when they made a movement. He
had led in the forest, on the early hunts and on the
war-paths
;
he had led in their later excursions on the
neighbouring
hills; he always led when it was their wont to
stroll to the hamlet together, to witness the militia musters
and other similar striking events; he even was foremost
when they paid their daily visits to the Nest; and, now, he
came a little in advance, slow in movement, quiet, with lips
compressed, eye roving and watchful, and far from dim, and
his whole features wonderfully composed and noble,
considering
the great number of years he had seen. Jaaf
followed
at the same gait, but a very different man in
demeanour
and aspect.
His
face scarce seemed human, even
the colour of his skin, once so glistening and black, having
changed to a dirty grey, all its gloss having disappeared,
while his lips were, perhaps, the most prominent feature.
These, too, were in incessant motion, the old man working
his jaws, in a sort of second childhood; or as the infant
bites its gums to feel its nearly developed teeth, even when
he was not keeping up the almost unceasing
accompaniment
of his grumbles.
As the old men walked towards us, and the men of the
prairies had not yet shown themselves, we all advanced to
meet the former. Every one of our party, the girls included,
shook hands with Susquesus, and wished him a good
morning
.
He knew my grandmother, and betrayed some strong
feeling, when he shook
her
hand. He knew Patt, and
nodded kindly in answer to her good wishes. He knew
Mary Warren, too, and held her hand a little time in his
own, gazing at her wistfully the while. My uncle Ro and
I were also recognised, his look at me being earnest and
long. The two other girls were courteously received, but
his feelings were little interested in them. A chair was
placed for Susquesus on the lawn, and he took his seat.
As for Jaaf, he walked slowly up to the party, took off his
fine cocked-hat, but respectfully refused the seat he too was
offered. Happening thus to be the last saluted, he was the
first with whom my grandmother opened the discourse.
It is a pleasant sight, Jaaf, to see you, and our old
friend Susquesus, once more on the lawn of the old house.
Not so berry ole house, Miss Duss, a'ter all, answered
the negro, in his grumbling way. Remem'er him well
'nough; only built tudder day.
It has been built three-score years, if you call that the
other day. I was then young myself; a bridehappy and
blessed far beyond my deserts. Alas! how changed have
things become since that time!
Yes, you won'erful changed  must say
dat
for you,
Miss Duss. I some time surprise myself so young a lady
get change so berry soon.
Ah! Jaaf, though it may seem a short time to you,
who are so much my senior, four-score years are a heavy
load to carry. I enjoy excellent health and spirits for my
years; but age will assert its power.
Remem'er you, Miss Duss, like dat young lady dere,
pointing at Patt  now you
do
seem won'erful change.
Ole Sus, too, berry much alter of latecan't hole out much
longer, I do t'ink. But Injin nebber hab much raal grit
in 'em.
And you, my friend, continued my grandmother,
turning to Susquesus, who had sat motionless while she
was speaking to Jaaf  do you also see this great change
in me? I have known you much longer than I have known
Jaaf; and
your
recollection of me must go back nearly to
childhoodto the time when I first lived in the woods, as a
companion of my dear, excellent old uncle, Chainbearer.
Why should Susquesus forget little wren? Hear song
now in his ear. No change at all in little wren, in
Susquesus'
eye.
This is at least gallant, and worthy of an Onondago
chief. But, my worthy friend, age will make its mark even
on the trees; and we cannot hope to escape it for ever!
No; bark smooth on young tree  rough on ole tree.
Nebber forget Chainbearer. He 's same age as Susquesus
little ole'er, too. Brave warriorgood man. Know him
when young hunterhe dere when
dat
happen.
When
what
happened, Susquesus? I have long wished
to know what drove you from your people; and why you,
a red-man in your heart and habits, to the last, should have
so long lived among us pale-faces, away from your own
tribe. I can understand why you like
us
, and wish to pass
the remainder of your days with this family; for I know
all that we have gone through together, and your early
connection
with my father-in-law, and
his
father-in-law, too;
but the reason why you left your own people so young, and
have now lived near a hundred years away from them, is
what I could wish to hear, before the angel of death
summons
one of us away.
While my grandmother was thus coming to the point, for
the first time in her life, on this subject, as she afterwards
told me, the Onondago's eye was never off her own. I
thought he seemed surprised; then his look changed to
sadness
;
and bowing his head a little, he sat a long time,
apparently
musing on the past. The subject had evidently
aroused the strongest of the remaining feelings of the old
man, and the allusion to it had brought back images of
things long gone by, that were probably reviewed not
altogether
without pain. I think his head must have been
bowed, and his face riveted on the ground, for quite a
minute.
Chainbearer nebber say why? the old man suddenly
asked, raising his face again to look at my grandmother.
Ole chief, toohe know; nebber talk of it, eh?
Never. I have heard both my uncle and my
father-in-law
say that they knew the reason why you left your
people, so many long, long, years ago, and that it did you
credit; but neither ever said more. It is reported here, that
these red-men, who have come so far to see you, also know
it, and that it is one reason of their coming so much out of
their way to pay you a visit.
Susquesus listened attentively, though no portion of his
person manifested emotion but his eyes. All the rest of the
man seemed to be made of some material that was totally
without sensibility; but those restless, keen, still penetrating
eyes opened a communication with the being within, and
proved that the spirit was far younger than the tenement in
which it dwelt. Still, he made no revelation; and our
curiosity
,
which was getting to be intense, was completely
baffled. It was even some little time before the Indian said
anything more at all. When he did speak, it was merely
to say
Good. Chainbearer wise chief  Gin'ral wise, too.
Good in campgood at council-fire. Know
when
to talk
know
what
to talk.
How much further my dear grandmother might have
been disposed to push the subject, I cannot say, for just
then, we saw the redskins coming out of their quarters,
evidently
about to cross from the old farm to the lawn, this
being their last visit to the Trackless, preparatory to
departing
on their long journey to the prairies. Aware of all this,
she fell back, and my uncle led Susquesus to the tree,
where the benches were placed for the guests, I carrying
the chair in the rear. Everybody followed, even to all the
domestics who could be spared from the ordinary
occupations
of the household.
The Indian and the negro were both seated; and chairs
having been brought out for the members of the family, we
took our places near by, though so much in the back-ground
as not to appear obtrusive.
The Indians of the prairies arrived in their customary
marching order, or in single files. Manytongues led,
followed
by Prairiefire; Flintyheart and Eaglesflight came
next, and the rest succeeded in a nameless but perfect order.
To our surprise, however, they brought the two prisoners
with them, secured with savage ingenuity, and in a way to
render escape nearly impossible.
It is unnecessary to dwell on the deportment of these
strangers, as they took their allotted places onthe benches,
it being essentially the same as that described in their first
visit. The same interest, however, was betrayed in their
manner, nor did their curiosity or veneration appear to be
in the least appeased, by having passed a day, or two, in
the immediate vicinity of their subject. That this curiosity
and veneration proceeded, in some measure, from the great
age and extended experience of the Trackless was probable
enough, but I could not divest myself of the idea that there
lay something unusual behind all, which tradition had made
familiar to these sons of the soil, but which had become lost
to us.
The American savage enjoys one great advantage over
the civilized man of the same quarter of the world. His
traditions ordinarily are true, whereas, the multiplied means
of imparting intelligence among ourselves, has induced so
many pretenders to throw themselves into the ranks of the
wise and learned, that blessed, thrice blessed is he, whose
mind escapes the contamination of falsehood and prejudice.
Well would it be for men, if they oftener remembered that
the very facilities that exist to circulate the truth, are just
so many facilities for circulating falsehood; and that he who
believes even one-half of that which meets his eyes, in his
daily inquiries into passing events, is most apt to throw away
quite a moiety of even that much credulity, on facts that
either never had an existence at all, or, which have been so
mutilated in the relation, that their eye-witnesses would be
the last to recognise them.
The customary silence succeeded the arrival of the
visiters
;
then Eaglesflight struck fire with a flint, touched the
tobacco with the flame, and puffed at a very curiously carved
pipe, made of some soft stone of the interior, until he had
lighted it beyond any risk of its soon becoming extinguished
This done, he rose, advanced with profound reverence in
his air, and presented it to Susquesus, who took it and
smoked for a few seconds, after which he returned it to him
from whom it had been received. This was a signal for
other pipes to be lighted, and one was offered to my uncle
and myself, each of us making a puff or two; and even
John and the other male domestics were not neglected.
Prairiefire, himself, paid the compliment to Jaaf. The negro
had noted what was passing, and was much disgusted with
the niggardliless which required the pipe to be so soon
returned
.
This he did not care to conceal, as was obvious
by the crusty observation he made when the pipe was offered
to him. Cider and tobacco had, from time immemorial, been
the two great blessings of this black's existence, and he felt,
at seeing one standing ready to receive his pipe, after a puff
or two, much as he might have felt had one pulled the mug
from his mouth, after the second or third swallow.
No need wait heregrumbled old Jaafwhen I
done, gib you de pipe, ag'in; nebber fear. Masser Corny,
or Masser Malbone, or Masser Hughdear me, I nebber
knows which be libbin' and which be dead, I get so ole,
now-a-day
!
But nebber mind if he be ole; can smoke yet, and
don't lub Injin fashion of gibbin' t'ings; and dat is gib him
and den take away, ag'in. Nigger is nigger, and Injin is
Injin; and nigger best. Lord! how many years I
do
see
I do seemost get tire of libbin' so long. Don't wait, Injin;
when I done, you get pipe again, I say. Best not make ole
Jaaf
too
mad, or he dreadful!
Although it is probable that Prairiefire did not understand
one-half of the negro's words, he comprehended his wish
to finish the tobacco, before he relinquished the pipe. This
was against all rule, and a species of slight on Indian
usages, but the red-man overlooked all, with the courtesy
of one trained in high society, and walked away as
composedly
as if everything were right. In these particulars
the high-breeding of an Indian is always made apparent.
No one ever sees in his deportment, a shrug, or a
half-concealed
smile, or a look of intelligence; a wink or a nod, or
any other of that class of signs, or communications, which
it is usually deemed underbred to resort to in company. In
all things, he is dignified and quiet, whether it be the effect
of coldness, or the result of character.
The smoking now became general, but only as a
ceremony
;
no one but Jaaf setting to with regularity to finish
his pipe. As for the black, his opinion of the superiority of
his own race over that of the red-man, was as fixed as his
consciousness of its inferiority to the white, and he would
have thought the circumstance that the present mode of
using tobacco was an Indian custom, a sufficient reason
why he himself should not adopt it. The smoking did not
last long, but was succeeded by a silent pause. Then
Prairiefire arose and spoke.
Father, he commenced, we are about to quit you.
Our squaws and pappooses, on the prairies, wish to see us;
it is time for us to go. They are looking towards the great
salt lake for us; we are looking towards the great
freshwater
lakes for them. There the sun sets  here it rises;
the distance is great, and many strange tribes of pale-faces
live along the path. Our journey has been one of peace.
We have not hunted; we have taken no scalps; but we
have seen our Great Father, Uncle Sam, and we have seen
our Great Father, Susquesus; we shall travel towards the
setting sun satisfied.  Father, our traditions are true; they
never lie. A lying tradition is worse than a lying Indian.
What a lying Indian says, deceives his friends, his wife, his
children; what a lying tradition says, deceives a tribe. Our
traditions are true; they speak of the Upright Onondago.
All the tribes on the prairies have heard this tradition, and
are very glad. It is good to hear of justice; it is bad to
hear of injustice. Without justice an Indian is no better
than a wolf. No; there is not a tongue spoken on the
prairies which does not tell of that pleasant tradition. We
could not pass the wigwam of our father without turning
aside to look at him. Our squaws and pappooses wish to
see us, but they would have told us to come back, and turn
aside to look upon our father, had we forgotten to do so.
Why has my father seen so many winters? It is the will
of the Manitou. The Great Spirit wants to keep him here
a little longer. He is like stones piled together to tell the
hunters where the pleasant path is to be found. All the
red-men
Vol. II.  16
who see him think of what is right. No; the Great
Spirit cannot yet spare my father from the earth, lest
red-men
forget what is right. He is stones piled together.
Here Prairiefire ceased, sitting down amidst a low murmur
of applause. He had expressed the common feeling, and
met with the success usual to such efforts. Susquesus had
heard and understood all that was said, and I could perceive
that he felt it, though he betrayed less emotion on this
occasion
than he had done on the occasion of the previous
interview
.
Then, the novelty of the scene, no doubt, contributed
to influence his feelings. A pause followed this opening
speech, and we were anxiously waiting for the renowned
orator, Eaglesflight, to rise, when a singular and somewhat
ludicrous interruption of the solemn dignity of the scene
occurred
.
In the place of Eaglesflight, whom Manytongues
had given us reason to expect would now come forth with
energy and power, a much younger warrior arose and spoke,
commanding the attention of his listeners in a way to show
that he possessed their respect. We were told that this
young warrior's name, rendered into English, was
Deersfoot
,
an appellation obtained on account of his speed, and
which we were assured he well merited. Much to our
surprise
,
however, he addressed himself to Jaaf, Indian courtesy
requiring that something should be said to the constant friend
and tried associate of the Trackless. The reader may be
certain we were all much amused at this bit of homage,
though every one of us felt some little concern on the
subject
of the answer it might elicit. Deersfoot delivered
himself
,
substantially, as follows:
The Great Spirit sees all things; he makes all things.
In his eyes, colour is nothing. Although he made children
that he loved of a red colour, he made children that he loved
with pale-faces, too. He did not stop there. No; he said,
`I wish to see warriors and men with faces darker than the
skin of the bear. I will have warriors who shall frighten
their enemies by their countenances.' He made black men.
My father is black; his skin is neither red, like the skin of
Susquesus, nor white, like the skin of the young chief of
Ravensnest. It is now grey, with having had the sun shine
on it so many summers; but it was once the colour of the
crow. Then it must have been pleasant to look at.  My
black father is very old. They tell me he is even older than
the Upright Onondago. The Manitou must be well pleased
with him, not to have called him away sooner. He has left
him in his wigwam, that all the black men may see whom
their Great Spirit loves.This is the tradition told to us by
our fathers. The pale men come from the rising sun, and
were born before the heat burned their skins. The black
men came from under the sun at noon-day, and their faces
were darkened by looking up above their heads to admire
the warmth that ripened their fruits. The red men were
born under the setting sun, and their faces were coloured
by the hues of the evening skies. The red man was born
here; the pale man was born across the salt lake; the black
man came from a country of his own, where the sun is
always
above his head. What of that? We are brothers.
The Thicklips (this was the name by which the strangers
designated Jaaf, as we afterwards learned) is the friend of
Susquesus. They have lived in the same wigwam, now,
so many winters, that their venison and bear's-meat have
the same taste. They love one another. Whomsoever
Susquesus
loves and honours, all just Indians love and honour.
I have no more to say.
It is very certain that Jaaf would not have understood a
syllable that was uttered, in this address, had not
Manytongues
first given him to understand that Deersfoot was
talking to him in particular, and then translated the
speaker's
language, word for word, and with great deliberation,
as each sentence was finished. Even this care might not
have sufficed to make the negro sensible of what was going
on, had not Patt gone to him, and told him in a manner and
voice to which he was accustomed, to attend to what was
said, and to endeavour, as soon as Deersfoot sat down, to
say something in reply. Jaaf was so accustomed to my
sister, and was so deeply impressed with the necessity of
obeying her, as one of his many `y'ung missuses,'
which
he scarcely knew himself,that she succeeded in perfectly
arousing him; and he astonished us all with the intelligence
of his very characteristic answer, which he did not fail to
deliver exactly as he had been directed to do. Previously
to beginning to speak, the negro champed his toothless
gums together, like a vexed swine; but `y'ung missus' had
told him he
must
answer, and answer he
did
. It is
probable
,
also, that the old fellow had some sort of recollection
of such scenes, having been present, in his younger days,
at various councils held by the different tribes of New York;
among whom my grandfather, Gen. Mordaunt Littlepage,
had more than once been a commissioner.
Well, Jaaf began, in a short, snappish manner, s'pose
nigger
must
say somet'in'. No berry great talker, 'cause I
no Injin. Nigger hab too much work to do, to talk all 'e
time. What you say 'bout where nigger come from, isn't
true. He come from Africa, as I hear 'em say, 'long time
ago. Ahs, me! how ole I do get! Sometime I t'ink poor
ole black man be nebber to lie down and rest himself. It
do
seem dat ebberybody take his rest but old Sus and me.
I berry strong, yet; and git stronger and stronger, dough
won'erful tired; but Sus, he git weaker and weaker ebbery
day. Can't last long, now, poor Sus! Ebberybody
must
die, sometime. Ole, ole, ole Masser and Missus, fust dey
die. Den Masser Corny go; putty well adwanced, too.
Den come Masser Mordaunt's turn, and Masser Malbone,
and now dere anudder Masser Hugh. Well, dey putty
much all de sames to me. I lubs 'em all, and all on 'em
lubs me. Den Miss Duss count for somet'in', but she be
libbin', yet. Most time she die, too, but don't seem to go.
Ahs, me! how ole I
do
git! Ha! dere comes dem debbils
of Injins, ag'in, and dis time we
must
clean 'em out! Get
your rifle, Sus; get your rifle, boy, and mind dat ole Jaaf
be at your elbow.
Sure enough, there the Injins
did
come; but I must
reserve
an account of what followed for the commencement
of another chapter.
CHAPTER XIII.
Hopethat thy wrongs will be by the Great Spirit
Remember'd and revenged when thou art gone;
Sorrowthat none are left thee to inherit
Thy name, thy fame, thy passions, and thy throne.
Red Jacket
.
It
was a little remarkable that one as old and blear-eyed
as the negro, should be the first among us to discover the
approach of a large body of the Injins, who could not be
less than two hundred in number. The circumstance was
probably owing to the fact that, while every other eye was
riveted on the speaker, his eyes were fastened on nothing.
There the Injins did come, however, in force; and this time,
apparently, without fear. The white American meets the
red-man with much confidence, when he is prepared for the
struggle; and the result has shown that, when thrown upon
his resources, in the wilderness, and after he has been
allowed
time to gain a little experience, he is usually the most
formidable enemy. But a dozen Indians, of the stamp of
those who had here come to visit us, armed and painted, and
placed in the centre of one of our largest peopled counties,
would be sufficient to throw that county into a paroxysm of
fear. Until time were given for thought, and the opinions
of the judicious superseded the effects of rumour, nothing
but panic would prevail. Mothers would clasp their
children
to their bosoms, fathers would hold back their sons
from the slaughter, and even the heroes of the militia would
momentarily forget their ardour in the suggestions of
prudence
and forethought.
Such, in fact, had been the state of things in and about
Ravensnest, when Flintyheart so unexpectedly led his
companions
into the forest, and dispersed the virtuous and
oppressed
tenants of my estate on their return from a meeting
held with but one virtuous object; viz., that of transferring
the fee of the farms they occupied, from me to themselves.
No one doubted, at the moment, that in addition to the other
enormities committed by me and mine, I had obtained a
16*
body of savages from the far West, to meet the forces
already
levied by the tenants, on a principle that it would not
do to examine very clearly. If I
had
done so, I am far from
certain that I should not have been perfectly justified in
morals; for an evil of that nature, that might at any time
be put down in a month, and which is suffered to exist
for years, through the selfish indifference of the community,
restores to every man his natural rights of self-defence;
though I make no doubt, had I resorted to such means, I
should have been hanged, without benefit of philanthropists;
the `clergy' in this country not being included in the class,
so far as suspension by the neck is concerned.
But the panic had disappeared, as soon as the truth
became
known concerning the true object of the visit of the
redskins. The courage of the virtuous and honest
revived
,
and one of the first exhibitions of this renewed spirit was
the attempt to set fire to my house and barns. So serious a
demonstration, it was thought, would convince me of the real
power of the people, and satisfy us all that their wishes are
not to be resisted with impunity. As no one likes to have
his house and barns burned, it must be a singular being
who could withstand the influence of such a manifestation
of the spirit of the Institutions; for it is just as reasonable
to suppose that the attempts of the incendiaries came within
their political category, as it is to suppose that the attempt
of the tenants to get a title beyond what was bestowed in
their leases, was owing to this cause.
That habit of deferring to externals, which is so general
in a certain class of our citizens, and which endures in
matters
of religion long after the vital principle is forgotten,
prevented any serious outbreak on the next day, which was
the Sunday mentioned; though the occasion was improved
to coerce by intimidation, the meeting and resolutions
having been regularly digested in secret conclave, among
the local leaders of anti-rentism, and carried out, as has
been described. Then followed the destruction of the
canopy
,
another demonstration of the spirit of the Institutions,
and as good an argument as any that has yet been offered,
in favour of the dogmas of the new political faith. Public
opinion is entitled to some relief, surely, when it betrays so
much excitement as to desecrate churches and to destroy
private property. This circumstance of the canopy had
been much dwelt on, as a favourite anti-rent argument, and
it might now be considered that the subject was carried out
to demonstration.
By the time all this was effected, so completely had the
Injins got over their dread of the Indians, that it was with
difficulty the leaders of the former could prevent the most
heroic portion of their corps from following their blow at
the canopy by a
coup de main
against the old farm-house,
and its occupants. Had not the discretion of the leaders
been greater than that of their subordinates, it is very
probable
blood would have been shed, between these quasi
belligerents
.
But the warriors of the Prairies were the guests
of Uncle Sam, and the old gentleman, after all, has a long
arm, and can extend it from Washington to Ravensnest
without much effort. He was not to be offended heedlessly,
therefore; for his power was especially to be dreaded in
this matter of the covenants, without which Injins and
agitation
would be altogether unnecessary to attaining the great
object, the Albany politicians being so well disposed to do
all they can for the virtuous and honest. Uncle Sam's
Indians, consequently, were held a good deal more in respect
than the laws of the State, and they consequently escaped
being murdered in their sleep.
When Jaaf first drew our attention to the Injins, they
were advancing, in a long line, by the highway, and at a
moderate pace; leaving us time to shift our own position,
did we deem it necessary. My uncle was of opinion it
would never do to remain out on the lawn, exposed to so
great a superiority of force, and he took his measures
accordingly
.
In the first place, the females, mistresses and
maidsand there were eight or ten of the lastwere
requested
to retire, at once, to the house. The latter, with
John at their head, were directed to close all the lower,
outside
shutters of the building, and secure them within. This
done, and the gate and two outer doors fastened, it would
not be altogether without hazard to make an assault on our
fortress. As no one required a second request to move,
this part of the precautions was soon effected, and the house
placed in a species of temporary security.
While the foregoing was in the course of execution,
Susquesus
and Jaaf were induced to change their positions, by
transferring themselves to the piazza. That change was
made, and the two old fellows were comfortably seated in
their chairs, again, before a single man of the redskins
moved a foot. There they all remained, motionless as so
many statues, with the exception that Flintyheart seemed to
be reconnoitring with his eyes, the thicket that fringed the
neighbouring ravine, and which formed a bit of dense cover,
as already described, of some considerable extent.
Do you wish the redskins in the house, Colonel? asked
the interpreter, coolly, when matters had reached to this
pass; if you do, it 's time to speak, or, they 'll soon be off,
like a flock of pigeons, into that cover. There 'll be a fight
as sartain as they move, for there 's no more joke and
making of faces about them critturs, than there is about a
mile-stone. So, it 's best to speak in time.
No delay occurred after this hint was given. The request
of my uncle Ro that the chiefs would follow the Upright
Onondago, was just in time to prevent a flight; in the sense
of Manytongues, I mean, for it was not very likely these
warriors would literally run away. It is probable that they
would have preferred the cover of the woods as more
natural
and familiar to them,  but, I remarked, as the whole
party came on the piazza, that Flintyheart, in particular,
cast a quick, scrutinizing glance at the house, which said
in pretty plain language that he was examining its
capabilities
as a work of defence. The movement, however,
was made with perfect steadiness; and, what most surprised
us all, was the fact that not one of the chiefs appeared to pay
the slightest attention to their advancing foes; or, men
whom it was reasonable for them to suppose so considered
themselves to be. We imputed this extraordinary reserve
to force of character, and a desire to maintain a calm and
dignified deportment in the presence of Susquesus. If it
were really the latter motive that so completely restrained
every exhibition of impatience, apprehension, or disquietude,
they had every reason to congratulate themselves on the
entire success of their characteristic restraint on their
feelings.
The Injins were just appearing on the lawn as our
arrangements were completed. John had come to report
every shutter secure, and the gate and little door barred.
He also informed us that all the men and boys who could
be mustered, including gardeners, labourers, and stable
people
,
to the number of five or six, were in the little passage,
armed; where rifles were ready also for ourselves. In
short, the preparations that had been made by my
grandmother
,
immediately after her arrival, were now of use, and
enabled us to make a much more formidable resistance,
sustained
as we were by the party from the Prairies, than I
could have ever hoped for on so sudden an emergency.
Our arrangement was very simple. The ladies were
seated near the great door, in order that they might be
placed under cover the first, in the event of necessity;
Susquesus
and Jaaf had their chairs a little on one side, but
quite near this group, and the men from the far West
occupied
the opposite end of the piazza, whither the benches had
been removed, for their accommodation. Manytongues
stood between the two divisions of our company, ready to
interpret for either; while my uncle, myself, John, and two
or three of the other servants took position behind our aged
friends. Seneca and his fellow-incendiary were in the
midst of the chiefs.
It was just as the Injins had got fairly on the lawn that
we heard the clattering of hoofs, and every eye was turned
in the direction whence the sound proceeded. This was on
the side of the ravine, and to me it seemed from the first
that some one was approaching us through that dell. So it
proved, truly; for soon Opportunity came galloping up the
path, and appeared in sight. She did not check her horse
until under the tree, where she alighted, by a single bound,
and hitching the animal to a hook in the tree, she moved
swiftly towards the house. My sister Patt advanced to the
steps of the piazza to receive this unexpected guest, and I
was just behind her to make my bow. But the salutations
of Opportunity were hasty and far from being very
composed
.
She glanced around her, ascertained the precise
condition
of her brother,and, taking my arm, she led me into
the library with very little, or, indeed, with no ceremony;
for, to give this young woman her due, she was a person of
great energy when there was anything serious to be done.
The only sign of deviating, in the slightest degree, from the
object in view, was pausing one instant, in passing, to make
her compliments to my grandmother.
What, in the name of wonder, do you mean to do with
Sen? demanded this active young lady, looking at me
intently
,
with an expression half-hostile, half-tender. You
are standing over an earthquake, Mr. Hugh, if you did but
know it.
Opportunity had confounded the effect with the cause,
but that was of little moment on an occasion so
interesting
.
She was much in earnest, and I had learned by
experience
that her hints and advice might be of great service
to us at the Nest.
To what particular danger do you allude, my dear
Opportunity
?
Ah, Hugh! if things was only as they used to be, how
happy might we all be together here at Ravensnest! But,
there is no time to talk of such things; for, as Sarah
Soothings
says, `the heart is most monopolized when grief is the
profoundest, and it is only when our sentiments rise freely
to the surface of the imagination, that the mind escapes the
shackles of thraldom.' But, I haven't a minute for Sarah
Soothings, even, just now. Don't you see the Injins?
Quite plainly; and they probably see my `Indians.'
Oh! they don't regard them now the least in the
world. At first, when they thought you might have hired
a set of desperate wretches to scalp the folks, there was
some misgivings; but the whole story is now known, and
nobody cares a straw about them. If anybody's scalp is
taken, 't will be their own. Why, the whole country is up,
and the report has gone forth, far and near, that you have
brought in with you a set of blood-thirsty savages from the
prairies to cut the throats of women and children, and drive
off the tenants, that you may get all the farms into your
own hands before the lives fall in. Some folks say, these
savages have had a list of all the lives named in your leases
given to them, and that they are to make way with all
such people first, that you may have the law as much as
possible on your side. You stand on an earthquake, Mr.
Hugh;you do, indeed!
My dear Opportunity, I answered, laughing, I am
infinitely obliged to you for all this attention to my interests,
and freely own that on Saturday night you were of great
service to me; but I must now think that you magnify the
dangerthat you colour the picture too high.
Not in the least. I do protest, you stand on an
earthquake
;
and as your friend, I have ridden over here to tell
you as much, while there is yet time.
To get off it, I suppose you mean. But how can all
these evil and blood-thirsty reports be abroad, when the
characters of the Western Indians are, as you own yourself,
understood, and the dread of them that did exist in the
town has entirely vanished? There is a contradiction in
this.
Why, you know how it is, in anti-rent times. When
an excitement is needed, folks don't stick at facts very
closely, but repeat things, and make things, just as it
happens
to be convenient.
True; I can understand this, and have no difficulty in
believing you now. But have you come here this morning
simply to let me know the danger which besets me from
this quarter?
I believe I 'm always only too ready to gallop over to
the Nest! But everybody has some weakness or other, and
I suppose I am to be no exception to the rule, returned
Opportunity
,
who doubtless fancied the moment propitious to
throw in a volley towards achieving her great conquest,
and who reinforced that volley of words with such a glance
of the eye, as none but a most practised picaroon on the
sea of flirtation could have thrown. But, Hugh  I call
you Hugh, Mr. Littlepage, for you seem more like Hugh to
me, than like the proud, evil-minded aristocrat, and
hard-hearted
landlord, that folks want to make you out to be
but I never could have told you what I did last night, had I
supposed it would bring Sen into this difficulty.
I can very well understand how unpleasantly you are
situated as respects your brother, Opportunity, and your
friendly services will not be forgotten in the management of
his affairs.
If you are of this mind, why won't you suffer these
Injins to get him out of the hands of your real savages,
returned Opportunity, coaxingly. I 'll promise for him,
that Sen will go off, and stay off for some months, if you
insist on 't; when all is forgotten, he can come back again.
Is the release of your brother, then, the object of this
visit from the Injins?
Partly so  they 're bent on having him. He 's in all
the secrets of the anti-renters, and they 're afraid for their
very lives, so long as he 's in your hands. Should he get
a little scared, and give up only one-quarter of what he
knows, there 'd be no peace in the county for a
twelvemonth
.
At this instant, and before there was time to make an
answer
,
I was summoned to the piazza, the Injins
approaching
so near as to induce my uncle to step to the door and
call my name in a loud voice. I was compelled to quit
Opportunity, who did not deem it prudent to show herself
among us, though her presence in the house, as an
intercessor
for her brother, could excite neither surprise nor
resentment
.
When I reached the piazza, the Injins had advanced as
far as the tree where we had first been posted, and there
they had halted, seemingly for a conference. In their rear,
Mr. Warren was walking hurriedly towards us, keeping the
direct line, regardless of those whom he well knew to be
inimical to him, and intent only on reaching the house
before it could be gained by the `disguised and armed.'
This little circumstance gave rise to an incident of touching
interest, and which I cannot refrain from relating, though
it may interrupt the narration of matters that others may
possibly think of more moment.
Mr. Warren did not pass directly through the crowd of
rioters  for such those people were, in effect, unless the
epithet should be changed to the still more serious one of
rebels  but he made a little dtour, in order to prevent a
collision that was unnecessary. When about half-way
between
the tree and the piazza, however, the Injins gave a
discordant yell, and many of them sprang forward, as if in
haste to overtake, and probably to arrest, him. Just as we
all involuntarily arose, under a common feeling of interest
in the fate of the good rector, Mary darted from the piazza,
was at her father's side and in his arms so quickly, as to
seem to have flown there. Clinging to his side, she
appeared
to urge him towards us. But Mr. Warren adopted
a course much wiser than that of flight would have been.
Conscious of having said or done no more than his duty,
he stopped and faced his pursuers. The act of Mary
Warren
had produced a check to the intended proceedings of
these lawless men, and the calm, dignified aspect of the
divine completed his conquest. The leaders of the Injins
paused, conferred together, when all who had issued from
the main body returned to their companions beneath the
tree, leaving Mr. Warren and his charming daughter at
liberty to join us unmolested, and with decorum.
The instant Mary Warren left the piazza on her pious
errand, I sprang forward to follow her with an impulse I
could not control. Although my own power over this
impulsive
movement was so small, that of my uncle and
grandmother
was greater. The former seized the skirt of my
frock, and held me back by main strength, while the light
touch of the latter had even greater power. Both
remonstrated
,
and with so much obvious justice, that I saw the
folly of what I was about in an instant, and abandoned my
design. Had
I
fallen into the hands of the anti-renters,
their momentary triumph, at least, would have been
complete
.
Mr. Warren ascended the steps of the piazza with a mien
as unaltered, and an air as undisturbed, as if about to enter
his own church. The good old gentleman had so schooled
his feelings, and was so much accustomed to view himself
as especially protected, or as so ready to suffer, when in
the discharge of any serious duty, that I have had occasions
to ascertain fear was unknown to him. As for Mary, never
had she appeared so truly lovely, as she ascended the steps,
still clinging fondly and confidingly to his arm. The
excitement
of such a scene had brought more than the usual
quantity of blood into her face, and the brilliancy of her
eyes was augmented by that circumstance, perhaps; but I
fancied that a more charming picture of feminine softness,
blended with the self-devotion of the child, could not have
been imagined by the mind of man.
Patt, dear, generous girl, sprang forward to embrace her
friend, which she did with warmth and honest fervour, and
my venerable grandmother kissed her on both cheeks, while
Vol. II.17
the other two girls were not backward in giving the
customary
signs of the sympathy of their sex. My uncle Ro
even went so far as gallantly to kiss her hand, causing the
poor girl's face to be suffused with blushes, while poor Hugh
was obliged to keep in the back-ground, and content
himself
with looking his admiration. I got one glance,
however
,
from the sweet creature, that was replete with
consolation
,
since it assured me that my forbearance was
understood
,
and attributed to its right motive.
In that singular scene, the men of the prairies alone
appeared
to be unmoved. Even the domestics and workmen
had betrayed a powerful interest in this generous act of
Mary Warren's, the females all screaming in chorus, very
much as a matter of course. But, not an Indian moved.
Scarce one turned his eyes from the countenance of
Susquesus
,
though all must have been conscious that something
of interest was going on so near them, by the concern we
betrayed; and all certainly knew that their enemies were
hard by. As respects the last, I have supposed the
unconcern
,
or seeming unconcern of these western warriors, ought
to be ascribed to the circumstance of the presence of the
ladies, and an impression that there could be no very
imminent
risk of hostilities while the company then present
remained
together. The apathy of the chiefs seemed to be
extended to the interpreter, who was coolly lighting his pipe
at the very moment when the whole affair of the Warren
episode occurred; an occupation that was not interrupted
by the clamour and confusion among ourselves.
As there was a delay in the nearer approach of the Injins,
there was leisure to confer together for a moment. Mr.
Warren told us, therefore, that he had seen the `disguised
and armed' pass the rectory, and had followed in order to
act as a mediator between us and any contemplated harm.
The destruction of the canopy of Hugh's pew, must
have given you a serious intimation that things were coming
to a head, observed my grandmother.
Mr. Warren had not heard of the affair of the canopy, at
all. Although living quite within sound of a hammer used
in the church, everything had been conducted with so much
management, that the canopy had been taken down, and
removed bodily, without any one in the rectory's knowing
the fact. The latter had become known at the Nest, solely
by the circumstance that the object which had so lately
canopied aristocracy in St. Andrew's, Ravensnest, was now
canopying pigs up at the farm-house. The good divine
expressed his surprise a little strongly, and, as I thought,
his regrets a little indifferently. He was not one to
countenance
illegality and violence, and least of all that peculiarly
American vice, envy; but, on the other hand, he was not
one to look with favour on the empty distinctions,-as set up
between men equally sinners and in need of grace to redeem
them from a common condemnation, in the house of God.
As the grave is known to be the great leveller of the human
race, so ought the church to be used as a preparatory step
in descending to the plain that all must occupy, in spirit at
least, before they can hope to be elevated to any, even of
the meanest places, among the many mansions of our
Father's
house!
There was but a short breathing time given us, however,
before the Injins again advanced. It was soon evident they
did not mean to remain mere idle spectators of the scene
that was in the course of enactment on the piazza, but that
it was their intention to become actors, in some mode or
other. Forming themselves into a line, that savoured a
great deal more of the militia of this great republic than
of the warriors of the west, they came on tramping, with
the design of striking terror into our souls. Our
arrangements
were made, however, and on our part every thing was
conducted just as one could have wished. The ladies,
influenced
by my grandmother, retained their seats, near the
door; the men of the household were standing, but
continued
stationary, while not an Indian stirred. As for
Susquesus
,
he had lived far beyond surprises and all emotions
of the lower class, and the men of the prairies appeared to
take their cues from him. So long as he continued
immovable
,
they seemed disposed to remain immovable also.
The distance between the tree and the piazza, did not
much exceed a hundred yards, and little time was necessary
to march across it. I remarked, however, that, contrary to
the laws of attraction, the nearer the Injins' line got to its
goal, the slower and more unsteady its movement became.
It also lost its formation, bending into curves, though its
tramps became louder and louder, as if those who were in
it, wished to keep alive their own courage by noise. When
within fifty feet of the steps, they ceased to advance at all,
merely stamping with their feet, as if hoping to frighten us
into flight. I thought this a favourable moment to do that
which it had been decided between my uncle and myself
ought to be done by me, as owner of the property these
lawless
men had thus invaded. Stepping to the front of the
piazza, I made a sign for attention. The tramping ceased
all at once, and I had a profound silence for my speech.
You know me, all of you, I said, quietly I know, and
I trust firmly; and you know, therefore, that I am the
owner of this house and these lands. As such owner, I
order every man among you to quit the place, and to go
into the highway, or upon the property of some other
person
.
Whoever remains, after this notice, will be a
trespasser
,
and the evil done by a trespasser is doubly serious
in the eyes of the law.
I uttered these words loud enough to be heard by
everybody
present, but I cannot pretend that they were attended
by much success. The calico bundles turned towards each
other, and there was an appearance of a sort of commotion,
but the leaders composed the people, the omnipotent people
in this instance, as they do in most others. The sovereignty
of the mass is a capital thing as a principle, and once in a
long while it evinces a great good in practice; in a certain
sense, it is always working good, by holding a particular
class of most odious and intolerable abuses in check; but,
as for the practice of every-day political management, their
imperial majesties, the sovereigns of America, of whom I
happen to be one, have quite as little connection with the
measures they are made to seem to demand, and to sustain,
as the Nawab of Oude; if the English, who are so
disinterested
as to feel a generous concern for the rights of
mankind
,
whenever the great republic adds a few acres to the
small paternal homestead, have left any such potentate in
existence.
So it was with the decision of the disguised and armed,
on the occasion I am describing. They decided that no
other notice should be taken of my summons to quit, than a
contemptuous yell, though they had to ascertain from their
leaders what they had decided before they knew themselves.
The shout was pretty general, notwithstanding, and it had
one good effect; that of satisfying the Injins, themselves,
that they had made a clear demonstration of their contempt
of my authority, which they fancied victory sufficient for
the moment; nevertheless, the demonstration did not end
exactly here. Certain cries, and a brief dialogue, succeeded,
which it may be well to record.
King
Littlepage, called out one, from among the `
disguised
and armed,' what has become of your throne? St.
Andrew's meeting-'us' has lost its monarch's throne!
His pigs have set up for great aristocrats of late;
presently
they 'll want to be patroons.
Hugh Littlepage, be a man; come down to a level with
your fellow-citizens, and don't think yourself any better
than other folks. You 're but flesh and blood, a'ter all.
Why don't you invite me to come and dine with you,
as well as priest Warren? I can eat, as well as any man
in the country, and as much.
Yes, and he 'll
drink
, too, Hugh Littlepage; so provide
your best liquor the day he 's to be invited.
All this passed for wit among the Injins, and among that
portion of the virtuous and honest and hard-working, who
not only kept them on foot, but on this occasion kept them
company also; it having since been ascertained that about
one-half of that band was actually composed of the tenants
of the Ravensnest farms. I endeavoured to keep myself
cool, and succeeded pretty well, considering the inducements
there were to be angry. Argument with such men was out
of the question,and knowing their numbers and physical
superiority, they held my legal rights in contempt. What
was probably worse than all, they knew that the law itself
was administered by the people, and that they had little to
apprehend, and did apprehend virtually nothing from any
of the pains and penalties it might undertake to inflict, should
recourse be had to it at any future day. Ten or a dozen
wily agents sent through the country to circulate lies, and
to visit the county town previously to, and during a trial, in
order to raise a party that will act more or less directly on
the minds of the jurors, with a newspaper or two to scatter
untruths and prejudices, would at least be as effective, at
17 *
the critical moment, as the law, the evidence, and the right.
As for the judges, and their charges, they have lost most of
their influence, under the operation of this nefarious system,
and count but for very little in the administration of justice,
either at Nisi Prius or at Oyer Terminer. These are
melancholy
truths, that any man who quits his theories and
descends into the arena of practice will soon ascertain to be
such, to his wonder and alarm, if he be a novice and an
honest man. A portion of this unhappy state of things is a
consequence of the legislative tinkering that has destroyed
one of the most healthful provisions of the common law, in
prohibiting the judges to punish for contempt unless for
outrages
committed in open court. The press, in particular,
now profits by this impunity, and influences the decision of
nearly every case that can at all enlist public feeling. All
these things men feel, and few who are wrong care for the
law; for those who are right, it is true, there is still some
danger. My uncle Ro says America is no more like what
America was in this respect twenty years since, than
Kamtschatka
is like Italy. For myself, I wish to state the truth;
exaggerating nothing, nor yet taking refuge in a dastardly
concealment.
Unwilling to be browbeaten on the threshold of my own
door, I determined to say something ere I returned to my
place. Men like these before me can never understand that
silence proceeds from contempt; and I fancied it best to
make some sort of a reply to the speeches I have recorded,
and to twenty more of the same moral calibre. Motioning
for silence, I again obtained it.
I have ordered you to quit my lawn, in the character
of its owner, I said, and, by remaining, you make
yourselves
trespassers. As for what you have done to my
pew, I should thank you for it, had it not been done in
violation
of the right; for it was fully my intention to have
that canopy removed as soon as the feeling about it had
subsided. I am as much opposed to distinctions of any
sort in the house of God as any of you can be, and desire
them not for myself, or any belonging to me. I ask for
nothing but equal rights with all my fellow-citizens; that
my
property should be as much protected as
theirs
, but not
more so. But, I do not conceive that you or any man has
a right to ask to share in my world's goods any more than
I have a right to ask to share in his; that you can more
justly claim a portion of my lands than I can claim a share
in your cattle and crops. It is a poor rule that does not
work both ways.
You 're an aristocrat, cried one from among the
Injins
,
or you 'd be willing to let other men have as much
land as you 've got yourself. You 're a patroon; and all
patroons are aristocrats, and hateful.
An aristocrat, I answered, is one of a few who wield
political power. The highest birth, the largest fortune, the
most exclusive association would not make an aristocrat,
without the addition of a narrow political power. In this
country there are no aristocrats, because there is no narrow
political power. There is, however, a spurious aristocracy,
which you do not recognize, merely because it does not
happen to be in the hands of gentlemen. Demagogues and
editors are your privileged classes, and consequently your
aristocrats, and none others. As for your landlord
aristocrats
,
listen to a true tale, which will satisfy you how far
they deserve to be called an aristocracy. Mark! what I
now tell you is religious truth, and it deserves to be known,
far and near, wherever your cry of aristocracy reaches.
There is a landlord in this State, a man of large means,
who became liable for the debts of another to a considerable
amount. At the very moment when
his
rents could not be
collected, owing to
your
interference and the remissness of
those in authority to enforce the laws, the sheriff entered
his
house, and sold its contents, in order to satisfy an execution
against
him!
There is American aristocracy for you, and
I am sorry to add American justice, as justice has got to be
administered among us.
I was not disappointed in the effect of this narration of
what is a sober truth. Wherever I have told it, it has
confounded
even the most brawling demagogue, and
momentarily
revived in his breast some of those principles of right
which God originally planted there. American aristocracy,
in sooth! Fortunate is the gentleman that can obtain even
a reluctant and meagre justice.
CHAPTER XIV.
How far that little candle throws his beams;
So shines a good deed in a naughty world.
Shakspeare
.
I have
said that my narrative of the manner in which
justice is sometimes meted out among us was not without
its effect on even that rude band of selfish and envious
rioters
:
rude, because setting at naught reason and the law;
and selfish, because induced so to do by covetousness, and
the desire to substitute the tenants for those whom they
fancied
to be better off in the world than they were themselves.
A profound stillness succeeded; and after the bundles of
calico had whispered one with another for a moment or two,
they remained quiet, seemingly indisposed, just then, at least,
to molest us any farther. I thought the moment favourable,
and fell back to my old station, determined to let things take
their own course. This change, and the profound stillness
that succeeded, brought matters back to the visit of the
Indians
,
and its object.
During the whole time occupied by the advance of the
Injins, the men of the prairies and Susquesus had
continued
nearly as motionless as so many statues. It is true
that the eyes of Flintyheart were on the invaders, but he
managed to take good heed of them without betraying any
undue uneasiness or care. Beyond this, I do affirm that I
scarce noted a single sign of even vigilance among these
extraordinary beings; though Manytongues afterwards gave
me to understand that they knew very well what they were
about; and then I could not be watching the red-men the
whole time. Now that there was a pause, however, every
body and thing seemed to revert to the original visit, as
naturally
as if no interruption had occurred. Manytongues, by
way of securing attention, called on the Injins, in an
authoritative
voice, to offer no interruption to the proceedings of
the chiefs, which had a species of religious sanctity, and was
not to be too much interfered with, with impunity.
`So long as you keep quiet, my warriors will not molest
you, he added; but if any man amongst you has ever
been on the prer-ies, he must understand enough of the natur
of a redskin to know that when he 's in 'airnest he
is
in
'airnest. Men who are on a journey three thousand miles
in length, don't turn aside for trifles, which is a sign that
serious business has brought these chiefs here.
Whether it was that this admonition produced an effect,
or that curiosity influenced the disguised and armed, or
that they did not choose to proceed to extremities, or that
all three considerations had their weight, is more than I can
say; but it is certain the whole band remained stationary,
quiet and interested observers of what now occurred, until
an interruption took place, which will be related in proper
time. Manytongues, who had posted himself near the centre
of the piazza, to interpret, now signified to the chiefs that
they might pursue their own purposes in tranquillity. After
a decent pause, the same young warrior who had called
up Jaaf, in the first instance, now rose again, and with a
refinement in politeness that would be looked for in vain in
most of the deliberative bodies of civilized men, adverted to
the circumstance that the negro had not finished his address,
and might have matter on his mind of which he wished to
be delivered. This was said simply, but distinctly; and it
was explained to the negro by Manytongues, who assured
him not one among all the chiefs would say a word until
the last person on his legs had an opportunity of
finishing
his address. This reserve marks the deportment of
those whom we call savages; men that have their own
fierce, and even ruthless customs, beyond all controversy,
but who possess certain other excellent qualities that do not
appear to flourish in the civilized state.
It was with a good deal of difficulty that we got old Jaaf
up again; for, though a famous grumbler, he was not much
of an orator. As it was understood that no chief would
speak, however, until the black had exhausted his right, my
dear Patt had to go, and, laying one of her ivory-looking
hands on the shoulder of the grim old negro, persuade him
to rise and finish his speech. He knew her, and she
succeeded
;
it being worthy of remark, that while this aged
black scarce remembered for an hour what occurred,
confounding
dates fearfully, often speaking of my grandmother
as Miss Dus, and as if she were still a girl, he knew every
one of the family then living, and honoured and loved us
accordingly, at the very moments he would fancy we had
been present at scenes that occurred when our
great-grandparents
were young people. But to the speech
What all dem fellow want, bundle up in calico, like so
many squaw? growled out Jaaf, as soon as on his legs,
and looking intently at the Injins, ranged as they were in
a line four deep, quite near the piazza. Why you let 'em
come, Masser Hugh, Masser Hodge, Masser Malbone,
Masser
Mordauntwhich you be here, now, I don't know, dere
so many, and it so hard to 'member ebbery t'ing? Oh! I
so
ole!I do won'er when my time come! Dere Sus, too,
he
good for nuttin' at all. Once he great walker  great
warriorgreat hunterpretty good fellow for redskin; but
he quite wore out. Don't see much use why he lib any
longer. Injin good for nuttin' when he can't hunt.
Sometime
he make basket and broom; but dey uses better broom
now, and Injin lose
dat
business. What dem calico debbil
want here, eh, Miss Patty? Dere redskin, tootwo, t'ree,
four  all come to see Sus. Won'er nigger don't come to
see
me!
Ole black good as ole red-man. Where dem
fellow
get all dat calico, and put over deir face? Masser
Hodge, what all dat mean?
These are anti-renters, Jaaf, my uncle coldly
answered
.
Men that wish to own your Master Hugh's farms,
and relieve him from the trouble of receiving any more rent.
They cover their faces, I presume, to counceal their blushes,
the modesty of their natures sinking under the sense of
their own generosity.
Although it is not very probable that Jaaf understood
the whole of this speech, he comprehended a part; for, so
thoroughly had his feelings been aroused on this subject, a
year or two earlier, when his mind was not quite so much
dimmed as at present, that the impression made was
indelible
.
The effect of what my uncle said, nevertheless, was
most apparent among the Injins, who barely escaped an
outbreak. My uncle has been blamed for imprudence, in
having resorted to irony on such an occasion; but, after all,
I am far from sure good did not come of it. Of one thing,
I am certain; nothing is ever gained by temporizing on the
subject of principles; that which is right, had better always
be freely said, since it is from the sacrifices that are made
of the truth, as concessions to expediency, that error
obtains
one-half its power. Policy, or fear, or some other
motive kept the rising ire of the Injins under, however, and
no interruption occurred, in consequence of this speech.
What you want here, fellow? demanded Jaaf,
roughly
,
and speaking as a scold would break out on some
intrusive
boy. Home wid ye!get out! Oh! I
do
grow
so ole!I wish I was as I was when young for your sake,
you varmint! What you want wid Masser Hugh's land?
why dat you t'ink to get gentle'em's property, eh?
'Member
'e time when your fadder come creepin' and beggin' to
Masser Mordy, to ask just little farm to lib on, and be he
tenant, and try to do a little for he family, like; and now
come, in calico bundle, to tell
my
Masser Hugh dat he shan't
be masser of he own land. Who
you
, I want to know, to
come and talk to gentle'em in dis poor fashion? Go home
get outoff wid you, or you hear what you don't like.
Now, while there was a good deal of nigger in this
argument, it was quite as good as that which was sometimes
advanced in support of the spirit of the Institutions, more
especially that part of the latter which is connected with
aristocracy and poodle usages. The negro had an
idea that all his massers, old and young, were better than
the rest of the human race; while the advocates of the
modern movement seem to think that every right is
concentrated
in the lower half of the great republican family.
Every gentleman is no gentleman; and every blackguard,
a gentleman, for one postulate of their great social
proposition
;
and, what is more, every man in the least elevated
above
the mass, unless so elevated by the mass, who
consequently
retain the power to pull him down again, has no
right at all, when put in opposition to the cravings of
numbers
.
So, that after all, the negro was not much more out
of the way, in his fashion of viewing things, than the
philosophers
of industrious honesty! Happily, neither the
reasoning of one of these parties, nor that of the other, has
much influence on the actual state of things. Facts are
facts, and the flounderings of envy and covetousness can
no more shut men's eyes to their existence, and prove that
black is white, than Jaaf's long-enduring and besetting
notion that the Littlepages are the great of the earth, can
make us more than what we certainly are. I have recorded
the negro's speech, simply to show some, who listen only to
the misstatements and opinions of those who wish to become
owners of other men's farms, that there are two sides to the
question; and, in the way of argument, I do not see but one
is quite as good as the other.
One could hardly refrain from smiling, notwithstanding
the seriousness of the circumstances in which we were
placed, at the gravity of the Indians during the continuance
of this queer episode. Not one of them all rose, turned
round, or manifested the least impatience, or even curiosity.
The presence of two hundred armed men, bagged in calico,
did not induce them to look about them, though their
previous
experience with this gallant corps may possibly have
led them to hold it somewhat cheap.
The time had now come for the Indians to carry out the
main design of their visit to Ravensnest, and Prairiefire
slowly arose to speak. The reader will understand that
Manytongues translated, sentence by sentence, all that
passed
,
he being expert in the different dialects of the tribes, some
of which had carried that of the Onondagoes to the prairies.
In this particular, the interpreter was a somewhat
remarkable
man, not only rendering what was said readily and
without hesitation, but energetically and with considerable
power. It may be well to add, however, that in writing out
the language I may have used English expressions that are
a little more choice, in some instances, than those given by
this uneducated person.
Father, commenced Prairiefire, solemnly, and with a
dignity that it is not usual to find connected with modern
oratory; the gestures he used being few, but of singular force
and significanceFatherthe minds of your children are
heavy. They have travelled over a long and thorny path,
with moccasins worn out, and feet that were getting sore;
but their minds were light. They hoped to look at the face
of the Upright Onondago, when they got to the end of the
path. They have come to the end of that path, and they
see him. He looks as they expected he would look. He
is like an oak that lightning may burn, and the snows cover
with moss, but which a thousand storms and a hundred
winters cannot strip of its leaves. He looks like the oldest
oak in the forest. He is very grand. It is pleasant to look
on him. When we see him, we see a chief who knew our
fathers' fathers, and
their
fathers' fathers. That is a long
time ago. He is a tradition, and knows all things. There
is only one thing about him, that ought not to be. He was
born a red-man, but has lived so long with the pale-faces,
that when he does go away to the Happy Hunting-Grounds,
we are afraid the good spirits will mistake him for a
pale-face
,
and point out the wrong path. Should this happen,
the red-men would lose the Upright of the Onondagoes, for
ever. It should not be. My father does not wish it to
be. He will think better. He will come back among his
children, and leave his wisdom and advice among the
people
of his own colour. I ask him to do this.
It is a long path, now, to the wigwams of red-men. It
was not so once, but the path has been stretched. It is a
very long path. Our young men travel it often, to visit the
graves of their fathers, and they know how long it is. My
tongue is not crooked, but it is straight; it will not sing a
false song  it tells my father the truth. The path is very
long. But the pale-faces are wonderful! What have they
not done? What will they not do? They have made
canoes and sledges that fly swift as the birds. The deer
could not catch them. They have wings of fire, and never
weary. They go when men sleep. The path is long, but
it is soon travelled with such wings. My father can make
the journey, and not think of weariness. Let him try it.
His children will take good care of him. Uncle Sam will
give him venison, and he will want nothing. Then, when
he starts for the Happy Hunting-Grounds, he will not
mistake
the path, and will live with red-men for ever.
A long, solemn pause succeeded this speech, which was
delivered with great dignity and emphasis. I could see that
Susquesus was touched with this request, and at the homage
paid his character, by having tribes from the prairies
tribes of which he had never even heard through traditions
in his younger days  come so far to do justice to his
character; to request him to go and die in their midst. It
Vol. II.  18
is true, he must have known that the fragments of the old
New York tribes had mostly found their way to those
distant
regions; nevertheless, it could not but be soothing to
learn that even they had succeeded in making so strong an
impression in his favour, by means of their representations.
Most men of his great age would have been insensible to
feelings
of this sort. Such, in a great degree, was the fact with
Jaaf; but such was not the case with the Onondago. As he
had said in his former speech to his visiters, his mind dwelt
more on the scenes of his youth, and native emotions came
fresher to his spirit, now, than they had done even in middle
age. All that remained of his youthful fire seemed to be
awakened, and he did not appear that morning, except when
compelled to walk and in his outward person, to be a man
who had seen much more than his three-score years and ten.
As a matter of course, now that the chiefs from the
prairies
had so distinctly made known the great object of their
visit, and so vividly portrayed their desire to receive back,
into the bosom of their communities, one of their colour
and race, it remained for the Onondago to let the manner
in which he viewed this proposition be known. The
profound
stillness that reigned around him must have assured
the old Indian how anxiously his reply was expected. It
extended even to the `disguised and armed,' who, by this
time, seemed to be as much absorbed in the interest of this
curious scene as any of us who occupied the piazza. I do
believe that anti-rentism was momentarily forgotten by all
partiestenants, as well as landlords; landlords, as well as
tenants. I dare say, Prairiefire had taken his seat three
minutes ere Susquesus arose; during all which time, the
deep stillness, of which I have spoken, prevailed.
My children, answered the Onondago, whose voice
possessed just enough of the hollow tremulousness of age
to render it profoundly impressive, but who spoke so
distinctly
as to be heard by all presentMy children, we do
not know what will happen when we are young  all is
young, too, that we see. It is when we grow old, that all
grows old with us. Youth is full of hope; but age is full
of eyes; it sees things as they are. I have lived in my
wigwam alone, since the Great Spirit called out the name
of my mother, and she hurried away to the Happy
Hunting-Grounds
to cook venison for my father, who was called
first. My father was a great warrior. You did not know
him. He was killed by the Delawares, more than a
hundred
winters ago.
I have told you the truth. When my mother went
to cook venison for her husband, I was left alone in my
wigwam.
Here a long pause succeeded, during which Susquesus
appeared to be struggling with his own feelings, though he
continued erect, like a tree firmly rooted. As for the
chiefs, most of them inclined their bodies forward to listen,
so intense was their interest; here and there one of their
number explaining in soft guttural tones, certain passages
in the speech to some other Indians, who did not fully
comprehend
the dialect in which they were uttered. After a
time, Susquesus proceeded: Yes, I lived alone. A young
squaw
was
to have entered my wigwam and staid there.
She never came. She wished to enter it, but she did not.
Another warrior had her promise, and it was right that she
should keep her word. Her mind was heavy at first, but
she lived to feel that it is good to be just. No squaw has
ever lived in any wigwam of mine. I did not think ever to
be a father: but see how different it has turned out! I am
now the father of all red-men! Every Indian warrior is
my son.
You
are my children; I will own you when we
meet on the pleasant paths beyond the hunts you make
to-day
.
You will call me father, and I will call you sons.
That will be enough. You ask me to go on the long
path with you, and leave my bones on the prairies. I have
heard of those hunting-grounds. Our ancient traditions
told us of them. `Towards the rising sun,' they said,
`is a great salt lake, and towards the setting sun, great
lakes of sweet water. Across the great salt lake is a
distant
country, filled with pale-faces, who live in large
villages
,
and in the midst of cleared fields. Towards the
setting
sun were large cleared fields, too, but no pale-faces, and
few villages. Some of our wise men thought these fields
were the fields of red-men following the pale-faces round
after the sun; some thought they were fields in which the
pale-faces were following them. I think this was the truth.
The red-man cannot hide himself in any corner, where the
pale-face will not find him. The Great Spirit will have it
so. It is his will; the red-man must submit.'
My sons, the journey you ask me to make is too long
for old age. I have lived with the pale-faces, until one-half
of my heart is white; though the other half is red.
One-half
is filled with the traditions of my fathers, the other half
is filled with the wisdom of the stranger. I cannot cut my
heart in two pieces. It must all go with you, or all stay
here. The body must stay with the heart, and both must
remain where they have now dwelt so long. I thank you,
my children, but what you wish can never come to pass.
You see a very old man, but you see a very unsettled
mind. There are red traditions and pale-face traditions.
Both speak of the Great Spirit, but only one speak of his
son. A soft voice has been whispering in my ear, lately,
much of the Son of God. Do they speak to you in that way
on the prairies? I know not what to think.I wish to
think what is right; but it is not easy to understand.
Here Susquesus paused; then he took his seat, with the
air of one who was at a loss how to explain his own
feelings
.
Prairiefire waited a respectful time for him to
continue
his address, but perceiving that he rose not, he stood
up, himself, to request a further explanation.
My father has spoken wisdom, he said, and his
children
have listened. They have not heard enough; they
wish to hear more. If my father is tired of standing, he can
sit; his children do not ask him to stand. They ask to
know where that soft voice came from, and what it said?
Susquesus did not rise, now, but he prepared for a reply.
Mr. Warren was standing quite near him, and Mary was
leaning on his arm. He signed for the father to advance a
step or two, in complying with which, the parent brought
forth the unconscious child also.
See, my children, resumed Susquesus. This is a
great medicine of the pale-faces. He talks always of the
Great Spirit, and of his goodness to men. It is his business
to talk of the Happy Hunting-Ground, and of good and bad
pale-faces. I cannot tell you whether he does any good or
not. Many such talk of these things constantly among the
whites, but I can see little change, and I have lived among
them, now, more than eighty winters and summersyes,
near ninety. The land is changed so much, that I hardly
know it; but the people do not alter. See, there; here are
menpale-faces in calico bags. Why do they run about,
and dishonour the red-man by calling themselves Injins? I
will tell you.
There was now a decided movement among the `virtuous
and industrious,' though a strong desire to hear the old man
out, prevented any violent interruption at that time. I
question if ever men listened more intently, than we all lent
our faculties now, to ascertain what the Upright of the
Onondagoes
thought of anti-rentism. I received the opinions he
expressed with the greater alacrity, because I knew he was
a living witness of most of what he related, and because I
was clearly of opinion that he knew quite as much of the
subject as many who rose in the legislative halls to discuss
the subject.
These men are not warriors, continued Susquesus.
They hide their faces and they carry rifles, but they frighten
none but the squaws and pappooses. When they take a scalp,
it is because they are a hundred, and their enemies one.
They are not braves. Why do they come at all?  What
do they want? They want the land of this young chief.
My children, all the land, far and near, was ours. The
pale-faces came with their papers, and made laws, and said
`It is well! We want this land. There is plenty farther
west for you red-men. Go there, and hunt, and fish, and
plant your corn, and leave us this land.' Our red brethren
did as they were asked to do. The pale-faces had it as
they wished. They made laws, and sold the land, as the
red-men sell the skins of beavers. When the money was
paid, each pale-face got a deed, and thought he owned all
that he had paid for. But the wicked spirit that drove out
the red-man is now about to drive off the pale-face chiefs.
It is the same devil, and it is no other. He wanted land
then, and he wants land now. There is one difference, and
it is this. When the pale-face drove off the red-man there
was no treaty between them. They had not smoked
together
,
and given wampum, and signed a paper. If they had,
it was to agree that the red-man should go away, and the
pale-face stay. When the pale-face drives off the pale-face,
there is a treaty; they have smoked together, and given
18 *
wampum, and signed a paper. This is the difference.
Indian
will keep his word with Indian; pale-face will not keep
his word with pale-face.
Susquesus stopped speaking, and the eye of every chief
was immediately, and for the first time that morning, turned
on the disguised and armed  the virtuous and
hard-working
.
A slight movement occurred in the band, but
no outbreak took place; and, in the midst of the sensation
that existed, Eaglesflight slowly arose. The nature, dignity
and ease of his manner more than compensated for his
personal
appearance, and he now seemed to us all one of those
by no means unusual instances of the power of the mind to
overshadow, and even to obliterate, the imperfections of the
body. Before the effect of what Susquesus had just said
was lost, this eloquent and much-practised orator began his
address. His utterance was highly impressive, being so
deliberate, with pauses so well adjusted, as to permit
Manytongues
to give full effect to each syllable he translated.
My brethren, said Eaglesflight, addressing the Injins
and the other auditors, rather than any one else, you have
heard the words of age. They are the words of wisdom.
They are the words of truth. The Upright of the
Onondagos
cannot lie. He never could. The Great Spirit made
him a just Indian; and, as the Great Spirit makes an
Indian
,
so he is. My brethren, I will tell you his story; it
will be good for
you
to hear it. We have heard your story;
first from the interpreter, now from Susquesus. It is a bad
story. We were made sorrowful when we heard it. What
is right, should be done; what is wrong, should not be done.
There are bad red-men, and good red-men; there are bad
pale-faces, and good pale-faces. The good red-men and
good pale-faces do what is right; the bad, what is wrong.
It is the same with both. The Great Spirit of the Indian
and the Great Spirit of the white man are alike; so are the
wicked spirits. There is no difference in this.
My brethren, a red-man knows in his heart when he
does what is right, and when he does what is wrong. He
does not want to be told. He tells himself. His face is
red, and he cannot change colour. The paint is too thick.
When he tells himself how much wrong he has done, he
goes into the bushes, and is sorry. When he comes out, he
is a better man.
My brethren, it is different with a pale-face. He is
white, and uses no stones for paint. When he tells himself
that he has done wrong, his face can paint itself.
Everybody
can see that he is ashamed. He does not go into the
bushes; it would do no good. He paints himself so quickly
that there is no time. He hides his face in a calico bag.
This is not good, but it is better than to be pointed at with
the finger.
My brethren, the Upright of the Onondagoes has never
run into the bushes because he was ashamed. There has
been no need of it. He has not told himself he was wicked.
He has not put his face in a calico bag; he cannot paint
himself, like a pale-face.
My brethren, listen; I will tell you a story. A long
time ago everything was very different here. The clearings
were small, and the woods large. Then the red-men were
many, and the pale-faces few. Now it is different. You
know how it is, to-day.
My brethren, I am talking of what was a hundred
winters
since. We were not born, then. Susquesus was then
young, and strong, and active. He could run with the deer,
and battle with the bear. He was a chief, because his
fathers
were chiefs before him. The Onondagoes knew him
and loved him. Not a war-path was opened, that he was
not the first to go on it. No other warrior could count so
many scalps. No young chief had so many listeners at the
Council-Fire. The Onondagoes were proud that they had
so great a chief, and one so young. They thought he would
live a long time, and they should see him, and be proud of
him for fifty winters more.
My brethren, Susquesus has lived twice fifty winters
longer; but he has not lived them with his own people.
No; he has been a stranger among the Onondagoes all that
time. The warriors he knew are dead. The wigwams
that he went into, have fallen to the earth with time; the
graves have crumbled, and the sons' sons of his companions
walk heavily with old age. Susquesus is there; you see
him; he sees you. He can walk; he speaks; he sees: he
is a living tradition! Why is this so?  The Great Spirit
has not called him away. He is a just Indian, and it is
good that he be kept here, that all red-men may know how
much he is loved. So long as he stays, no red-man need
want a calico bag.
My brethren, the younger days of Susquesus, the
Trackless, were happy. When he had seen twenty
winters
,
he was talked of in all the neighbouring tribes. The
scalp notches were a great many. When he had seen thirty
winters, no chief of the Onondagoes had more honour, or
more power. He was first among the Onondagoes. There
was but one fault in him. He did not take a squaw into
his wigwam. Death comes when he is not looked for; so
does marriage. At length my father became like other
men, and wished for a squaw. It happened in this way.
My brethren, red-men have laws, as well as the
pale-faces
.
If there is a difference, it is in keeping those laws.
A law of the red-men gives every warrior his prisoners. If
he bring off a warrior, he is his; if a squaw, she is his.
This is right. He can take the scalp of the warrior; he
can take the squaw into his wigwam, if it be empty. A
warrior, named Waterfowl, brought in a captive girl of the
Delawares. She was called Ouithwith, and was handsomer
than the humming-bird. The Waterfowl had his ears open,
and heard how beautiful she was. He watched long to take
her, and he did take her. She was his, and he thought to
take her into his wigwam when it was empty. Three moons
passed, before that could be. In the meantime, Susquesus
saw Ouithwith, and Ouithwith saw Susquesus. Their eyes
were never off each other. He was the noblest moose of
the woods, in her eyes; she was the spotted-fawn, in his.
He wished to ask her to his wigwam; she wished to go.
My brethren, Susquesus was a great chief; the
Waterfowl
was only a warrior. One had power and authority;
the other had neither. But there is authority among
red-men
beyond that of the chief. It is the red-man's law.
Ouithwith belonged to the Waterfowl, and she did not
belong
to Susquesus. A great council was held, and men
differed
.
Some said that so useful a chief, so renowned a
warrior as Susquesus, ought to be the husband of Ouithwith;
some said her husband ought to be the Waterfowl, for he
had brought her out from among the Delawares. A great
difficulty arose on this question, and the whole Six Nations
took part in it. Many warriors were for the law, but most
were for Susquesus. They loved him, and thought he would
make the best husband for the Delaware girl. For six
moons the quarrel thickened, and a dark cloud gathered
over the path that led among the tribes. Warriors who had
taken scalps in company, looked at each other, as the
panther
looks at the deer. Some were ready to dig up the
hatchet for the law; some for the pride of the Onondagoes,
and the Humming-Bird of the Delawares. The squaws took
sides with Susquesus. Far and near, they met to talk
to-gether
,
and they even threatened to light a Council-Fire,
and smoke around it, like warriors and chiefs.
Brethren, things could not stand so another moon.
Ouithwith must go into the wigwam of the Waterfowl, or
into the wigwam of Susquesus. The squaws said she should
go into the wigwam of Susquesus; and they met together,
and led her to his door. As she went along that path,
ouithwith looked at her feet with her eyes, but her heart
leaped like the bounding fawn, when playing in the sun.
She did not go in at the door. The Waterfowl was there,
and forbade it. He had come alone; his friends were but
few, while the heads and arms of the friends of Susquesus
were as plenty as the berries on the bush.
My brethren, that command of the Waterfowl's was
like a wall of rock before the door of the Trackless's
wigwam
.
Ouithwith could not go in. The eyes of Susquesus
said `no,' while his heart said `yes.' He offered the
Waterfowl
his rifle, his powder, all his skins, his wigwam; but
Waterfowl would rather have his prisoner, and answered,
`no.' `Take my scalp,' he said; `you are strong and can
do it; but do not take my prisoner.'
My brethren, Susquesus then stood up, in the midst of
the tribe, and opened his mind. `The Waterfowl is right,'
he said. `She is his, by our laws; and what the laws of
the red-man say, the red-man must do. When the
warrior
is about to be tormented, and he asks for time to go
home and see his friends, does he not come back at the day
and hour agreed on? Shall I, Susquesus, the first chief of
the Onondagoes, be stronger than the law? Nomy face
would be for ever hid in the bushes, did that come to pass.
It should not be  it
shall
not be. Take her, Waterfowl;
she is yours. Deal kindly by her, for she is as tender as
the wren when it first quits the nest. I must go into the
woods for a while. When my mind is at peace, Susquesus
will return.
Brethren, the stillness in that tribe, while Susquesus was
getting his rifle, and his horn, and his best moccasins, and
his tomahawk, was like that which comes in the darkness.
Men saw him go, but none dare follow. He left no trail,
and he was called the Trackless. His mind was never at
peace, for he never came back. Summer and winter came
and went often before the Onondagoes heard of him among
the pale-faces. All that time the Waterfowl lived with
Ouithwith
in his wigwam, and she bore him children. The chief
was gone, but the law remained. Go you, men of the
pale-faces
,
who hide your shame in calico bags, and do the same.
Follow the example of an Indianbe honest, like the Upright
of the Onondagoes!
While this simple narrative was drawing to a close, I
could detect the signs of great uneasiness among the leaders
of the calico bags. The biting comparison between
themselves and their own course, and an Indian and his
justice, was intolerable to them, for nothing has more
conduced
to the abuses connected with anti-rentism than the
wide-spread delusion that prevails in the land concerning
the omnipotency of the masses. The error is deeply rooted
which persuades men that fallible parts can make an
infallible
whole. It was offensive to their self-conceit, and
menacing
to their success. A murmur ran through the
assembly
,
and a shout followed. The Injins rattled their rifles,
most relying on intimidation to effect their purpose; but a few
seemed influenced by a worse intention, and I have never
doubted that blood would have been shed in the next minute,
the Indians now standing to their arms, had not the sheriff
of the county suddenly appeared on the piazza, with Jack
Dunning at his elbow. This unexpected apparition produced
a pause, during which the `disguised and armed' fell back
some twenty yards, and the ladies rushed into the house. As
for my uncle and myself, we were as much astonished as
any there at this interruption.
CHAPTER XV.
Strong sense, deep feeling, passions strong,
A hate of tyrant and of knave,
A love of right, a scorn of wrong,
Of coward and of slave.
Halleck's Wild Rose of Alloway
.
Although
experience has shown that the appearance of
a sheriff is by no means a pledge of the appearance of a
friend of the law in this anti-rent movement, in our instance
the fact happened to be so. It was known to the `disguised
and armed' that this functionary was disposed to do his duty.
[4]
[4]
The editor may as well say here, that, for obvious reasons, the
names
, counties, &c., used in these manuscripts are feigned, the real
localities being close enough to those mentioned for the double
purposes
of truth and fiction. As one of the honourable gentlemen of
the Legislature has quoted our references to `
provincial
' feelings and
notions, with a magnificence that proves how throughly he is a man
of the world himself, we will tell all the rest of the human race, who
may happen to read this book, that we have made this explanation lest
that comprehensive view of things, which has hitherto been so eager,
because a street and a house are named in the pages of a fiction, to
suppose that everybody is to believe they know the very individual who
dwelt in it, should fancy that our allusions are to this or that particular
functionary.
Editor
.
One of the rank absurdities into which democracy has fallen,
and democracy is no more infallible than individual
democrats
,
has been to make the officers of the militia, and the
sheriffs of counties, elective. The consequences are, that
the militia is converted into a farce, and the execution of the
laws in a particular county is very much dependent on the
pleasure of that county to have them executed or not. The
last is a capital arrangement for the resident debtor, for
instance
,
though absent creditors are somewhat disposed to
find fault. But all this is of no great moment, since the
theories for laws and governments in vogue just now are of
such a character as would render laws and governments
quite unnecessary at all, were they founded in truth.
Restraints
of all kinds can only be injurious when they are
imposed
on perfection!
The instant the commotion commenced, and the ladies
fled, I took Seneca and his fellow-prisoner by the arm, and
led them into the library. This I did, conceiving it to be
unfair to keep prisoners in a situation of danger. This I
did, too, without reflecting in the least on anything but the
character of the act. Returning to the piazza immediately,
I was not missed, and was a witness of all that passed.
As has been intimated, this particular sheriff was known
to be unfavourable to the anti-rent movement, and, no one
supposing he would appear in their midst unsupported, in such
a scene, the Injins fell back, thus arresting the danger of an
immediate collision. It has since been privately intimated
to me, that some among them, after hearing the narrative of
Eaglesflight, really felt ashamed that a red-skin should have
a more lively sense of justice than a white man. Whatever
may be said of the hardships of the tenants, and of poodle
usages, and of `aristocracy,' and `fat hens,' by the leaders
in this matter, it by no means follows that those leaders
believe
in their own theories and arguments. On the contrary,
it is generally the case with such men, that they keep
themselves
quite free from the excitement that it is their business
to awaken in others, resembling the celebrated John Wilkes,
who gravely said to George III., in describing the character
of a former co-operator in agitation,
He
was a Wilksite,
sir;
I
never was.
The unexpected appearance of Dunning, the offending
agent, too, was not without its effect,  for they who were
behind the curtains found it difficult to believe that he would
dare to show himself at Ravensnest without a sufficient
support
.
Those who thought thus, however, did not know
Jack Dunning. He had a natural and judicious aversion
to being tarred and feathered, it is true; but, when it was
necessary to expose himself, no man did it more freely. The
explanation of his unlooked-for arrival is simply this.
Uneasy at our manner of visiting Ravensnest, this
trustworthy
friend, after the delay of a day or two, determined
to follow us. On reaching the county he heard of the firing
of the barn, and of the attempt on the house, and went in
quest of the sheriff without a moment's delay. As the
object
of Dunning was to get the ladies out of the lion's den,
he did not wait for the summoning of the
posse comitatus
;
but, hiring a dozen resolute fellows, they were armed, and
all set out in a body for the Nest. When within a mile or
two of the house, the rumour reached the party that we
were besieged; and it became expedient to have recourse to
some manuvring, in order to throw succour into the
garrison
.
Dunning was familiar with all the windings and
turnings of the place, having passed many a month at the
Nest with my uncle and father, both as man and boy, and
he knew the exact situation of the cliff, court, and of the
various peculiar features of the place. Among other
arrangements
that had been made of late years, a door had been
opened at the end of the long gallery which led through one
of the wings, and a flight of steps been built against the
rocks, by means of which certain paths and walks that
meandered through the meadows and followed the windings
of the stream might be reached. Dunning determined to
attempt an ascent from this quarter, trusting to making
himself
heard by some one within, should he find the door
fastened
.
Everything succeeded to his wishes,  the cook,
alone, of all the household, being at her post in the other
wing, and seeing him the instant he presented himself on
the upper part of the steps. Jack Dunning's face was so
well known at the Nest, that the good woman did not
hesitate
a moment about admitting him, and he thus penetrated
into the buildings, followed by all his party. The last he
kept concealed by sending them into the chambers, while
he and the sheriff drew near the door, and heard most of
the speech of Eaglesflight, the attention of everybody being
given to the narrative. The reader knows the rest.
I might as well say at once, however, that Opportunity,
who, by her position, had seen the entrance of Dunning
and his party, no sooner found herself alone with the
prisoners
,
than she unbound them, and showed them the means
of flight, by the same passage, door and steps. At least,
such has been my supposition, for the sister has never been
questioned on the subject. Seneca and his co-rascal
vanished
,
and have not since been seen in our part of the
country. In consequence of the flight, no one has ever
complained of either for arson. The murder of Steele, the
Vol. II.  19
deputy-sheriff of Delaware, has given a check to the `Injin'
system, and awakened a feeling in the country that was not
to be resisted, in that form at least, by men engaged in a
scheme so utterly opposed to the first principles of honesty
as anti-rentism.
When I regained the piazza, after thrusting Seneca into
the library, the Injins had fallen back to the distance of
twenty or thirty yards from the piazza, in evident
confusion
;
while the Indians, cool and collected, stood to their
arms, watchful as crouching panthers, but held in hand by the
calmness with which their leaders watched the progress of
events. The sheriff now required the first to disperse, as
violaters of the law; with the penalties of which he menaced
them, in a voice sufficiently clear and distinct to make itself
audible. There was a moment during which the Injins
seemed undecided. They had come with the full intent to
inflict on my uncle and myself the punishment of the
tarbucket
,
with the hope of frightening us into some sort of a
compromise; the cowardly expedient of a hundred men's
attacking and annoying one being particularly in favour
with a certain class of those ultra-friends of liberty, who
fancy that they alone possess all the public virtue of the
nation, which public virtue justifies any of their acts. All
of a sudden, the entire body of these virtuous citizens, who
found it necessary to hide their blushes beneath calico, fell
rapidly back; observing a little order at first, which soon
degenerated, however, into confusion, and shortly after into
a downright, scampering flight. The fact was, that
Dunning's
men began to show themselves at the windows of
the chambers, thrusting muskets and rifles out before them,
and the `disguised and armed,' as has invariably been the
case in the anti-rent disturbances, exhibited a surprising
facility at the retreat. If he is `thrice-armed who hath his
quarrel just,' ten times is he a coward who hath his quarrel
unjust. This is the simple solution of the cowardice that
has been so generally shown by those who have been
engaged
in this `Injin' warfare; causing twenty to chase one,
secret attempts on the lives of sentinels, and all the other
violations of manly feeling that have disgraced the
proceedings
of the heroes.
As soon as released from all immediate apprehension on
the score of the Injins, we had time to attend to the Indians.
These warriors gazed after those who were caricaturing
their habits, and most of all their spirit, with silent
contempt
;
and Prairiefire, who spoke a little English, said to me
with emphasis, Poor Injin  poor triberun away from
own whoop! This was positively every syllable the men
of the prairies deigned to bestow on these disturbers of the
public peace, the agents of covetousness, who prowl about
at night, like wolves, ready to seize the stray lamb, but are
quick to sneak off at the growl of the mastiff. One
cannot
express himself in terms too harsh of such wretches,
who in no instance have manifested a solitary spark of the
true spirit of freemen; having invariably quailed before
authority when that authority has assumed in the least the
aspect of its power, and as invariably trampled it under foot,
whenever numbers put danger out of the question.
Old Susquesus had been a quiet observer of all that
passed. He knew the nature of the disturbance, and
understood
everything material that was connected with the
outbreaks
.
As soon as order was restored on the piazza, he
rose once more to address his guests.
My children, he said, solemnly, you hear my voice
for the last time. Even the wren cannot sing for ever.
The very eagle's wing gets tired in time. I shall soon cease
to speak. When I reach the happy hunting-grounds of the
Onondagoes, I will tell the warriors I meet there of your
visit. Your fathers shall know that their sons still love
justice. Let the pale-faces sign papers, and laugh at them
afterwards. The promise of a red-man is his law. If he is
made a prisoner, and his conquerors wish to torment him,
they are too generous to do so without letting him go to his
tribe to take leave of his friends. When the time is reached,
he comes back. If he promises skins, he brings them,
though no law can follow into the woods to force him to do
so. His promise goes with him; his promise is stronger
than chainsit brings him back.
My children, never forget this. You are not pale-faces,
to say one thing and do another. What you say, you do.
When you make a law, you keep it. This is right. No
red-man wants another's wigwam. If he wants a wigwam,
he builds one himself. It is not so with the pale-faces.
The man who has no wigwam tries to get away his
neighbour's
.
While he does this, he reads in his bible and goes
to his church. I have sometimes thought, the more he reads
and prays, the more he tries to get into his neighbour's
wigwam
.
So it seems to an Indian, but it may not be so.
My children, the red-man is his own master. He goes
and comes as he pleases. If the young men strike the
war-path
,
he can strike it, too. He can go on the war-path, or
the hunt, or he can stay in his wigwam. All he has to do,
is to keep his promise, not steal, and not to go into another
red-man's wigwam unasked. He is his own master. He
does not
say
so; he
is
so. How is it with the pale-faces?
They say they are free when the sun rises; they say they
are free when the sun is over their heads; they say they
are free when the sun goes down behind the hills. They
never stop talking of their being their own masters. They
talk of
that
more than they read their bibles. I have lived
near a hundred winters among them, and know what they
are. They do that; then they take away another's
wigwam
.
They talk of liberty; then they say you shall have
this farm, you shan't have that. They talk of liberty, and
call to one another to put on calico bags, that fifty men may
tar and feather one. They talk of liberty, and want
everything
their own way.
My children, these pale-faces might go back with you
to the prairies, and learn to do what is right. I do not
wonder they hide their faces in bags. They feel ashamed;
they ought to feel ashamed.
My children, this is the last time you will hear my voice.
The tongue of an old man cannot move for ever. This is
my counsel: do what is right. The Great Spirit will tell
you what that is. Let it be done. What my son said of
me is true. It was hard to do; the feelings yearned to do
otherwise, but it was not done. In a little time peace came
on my spirit, and I was glad. I could not go back to live
among my people, for I was afraid of doing what was
wrong. I staid among the pale-faces, and made friends here.
My children, farewell; do what is right, and you will be
happier than the richest pale-face who does what is wrong.
Susquesus took his seat, and at the same time each of the
redskins advanced and shook his hand. The Indians make
few professions, but let their acts speak for them. Not a
syllable was uttered by one of those rude warriors as he
took his leave of Susquesus. Each man had willingly paid
this tribute to one whose justice and self-denial were
celebrated
in their traditions, and having paid it, he went his
way satisfied, if not altogether happy. Each man shook
hands, too, with all on the piazza, and to us they expressed
their thanks for their kind treatment. My uncle Ro had
distributed the remains of his trinkets among them, and they
left us with the most amicable feelings. Still there was
nothing dramatic in their departure. It was simple as
their arrival. They had come to see the Upright of the
Onondagoes, had fulfilled their mission, and were ready to
depart. Depart they did, and as I saw their line winding
along the highway, the episode of such a visit appeared to us
all more like a dream than reality. No interruption occurred
to the return of these men, and half an hour after they had
left the piazza we saw them winding their way up the hill,
descending which we had first seen them.
Well, Hodge, said Jack Dunning, two or three hours
later, what is your decision; will you remain here, or will
you go to your own place in Westchester.
I will remain here until it is our pleasure to depart;
then we will endeavour to be as free as Indians, and go
where we please, provided always we do not go into our
neighbour's wigwam against his will.
Jack Dunning smiled, and he paced the library once or
twice before he resumed.
They told me, as soon as I got into the county, that
you, and all belonging to you, were preparing to retreat the
morning after the attempt to fire your house.
One of those amiable perversions of the truth that so
much embellish the morality of the whole affair. What
men wish, they fancy, and what they fancy, they say. The
girls, even, protest they would not quit the house while it
has a roof to cover their heads. But, Jack, whence comes
this spirit?
I should think that was the last question a reasonably
informed man need ask, answered Dunning, laughing. It
is very plain where it comes from.It comes from the devil,
and has every one of the characteristics of his handywork.
19 *
In the first place, love of money, or covetousness, is at its
root. Then lies are its agents. Its first and most
pretending
lie is that of liberty, every principle of which it
tramples under foot. Then come in the fifty auxiliaries in
the way of smaller inventions, denying the facts of the
original settlement of the country, fabricating statements
concerning its progress, and asserting directly in the teeth
of truth, such statements as it is supposed will serve a turn.
[5]
[5]
The frightful propensity to effect its purposes by lying, has come
to such a head in the country, as seriously to threaten the subversion
of all justice. Without adverting to general facts, two circumstances
directly connected with this anti-rent question, force themselves on my
attention. They refer to large estates that were inherited by an
Englishman, who passed half of a long life in the country. In public
legislative documents it has been pretended that the question of his
title to his estates is still open, when the published reports of the
highest court of the country show that a decision was made in
his favour thirty years since; and, in reference to his heir, it has
been officially stated that he has invariably refused to give any leases
but such as run on lives. Now, it is of little moment whether this
be true or not, since the law allows every man to do as he may
please in this respect. But the fact, as I understand from the agent
who draws the leases, is precisely the reverse of that which has been
openly stated in this legislative document; THE PRESENT POSSESSOR
OF THE ESTATE IN QUESTION, HAVING BEEN EARNESTLY SOLICITED
BY THE TENANTS TO GRANT NEW LEASES ON LIVES, AND ABSOLUTELY
REFUSED TO COMPLY! In this instance the Legislature, doubtless,
have been deceived by the interested representations of anti-renters.
Editor
.
There can be no mistaking the origin of such contrivances,
or all that has been taught us of good and evil is a fiction.
Really, Hodge, I am astonished that so sensible a man should
have asked the question.
Perhaps you are right, Jack; but to what will it lead?
Ay, that is not so easily answered. The recent events
in Delaware have aroused the better feelings of the country,
and there is no telling what it may do. One thing,
however
,
I hold to be certain; the spirit connected with this
affair must be put down, thoroughly, effectually, completely,
or we are lost. Let it once be understood, in the country,
that men can control their own indebtedness, and fashion
contracts to suit their own purposes, by combinations and
numbers, and pandemonium would soon be a paradise
compared
to New York. There is not a single just ground of
complaint in the nature of any of these leases, whatever
hardships may exist in particular cases; but, admitting that
there were false principles of social life, embodied in the
relation
of landlord and tenant, as it exists among us,
it would
be a far greater evil to attempt a reform under such a
combination, than to endure the original wrong
.
I suppose these gentry fancy themselves strong enough
to thrust their interests into politics, and hope to succeed by
that process. But anti-masonry, and various other schemes
of that sort have failed, hitherto, and this may fail along
with it. That is a redeeming feature of the institutions,
Jack; you may humbug for a time, but the humbuggery is
not apt to last for ever. It is only to be regretted that the
really upright portion of the community are so long in
making themselves felt; would they only be one-half as
active as the miscreants, we should get along well enough.
The result is unknown. The thing
may
be put down,
totally, effectually, and in a way to kill the snake, not scotch
it; or it may be met with only half-way measures; in which
case it will remain like a disease in the human system,
always existing, always menacing relapses, quite possibly to
be the agent of the final destruction of the body.
My uncle, nevertheless, was as good as his word, and did
remain in the county, where he is yet. Our establishment
has received another reinforcement, however, and a change
occurred, shortly after our visit from the Injins, in the policy
of the anti-renters, the two giving us a feeling of security
that might otherwise have been wanting. The
reinforcement
came from certain young men, who have found their
way across from the springs, and become guests at the Nest.
They are all old acquaintances of mine, most of them
schoolfellows
,
and also admirers of the young ladies. Each of my
uncle's wards, the Coldbrooke and the Marston, has an
accepted
lover, as we now discovered, circumstances that have
left me unobstructed in pursuing my suit with Mary Warren.
I have found Patt a capital ally, for she loves the dear girl
almost as much as I do myself, and has been of great service
in the affair. I am conditionally accepted, though Mr.
Warren's
consent has not been asked. Indeed, I much question
if the good rector has the least suspicion of what is in the
wind. As for my uncle Ro, he knew all about it, though I
have never breathed a syllable to him on the subject.
Fortunately
,
he is well satisfied with the choice made by his two
wards, and this has somewhat mitigated the disappointment.
My uncle Ro is not in the least mercenary; and the
circumstance
that Mary Warren has not a cent, gives him no
concern. He is, indeed, so rich himself that he knows it is
in his power to make any reasonable addition to my means,
and, if necessary, to place me above the dangers of
anti-rentism
.
The following is a specimen of his humour, and
of his manner of doing things when the humour takes him.
We were in the library one morning, about a week after the
Injins were shamed out of the field by the Indians, for that
was the secret of their final disappearance from our part of
the country; but, one morning, about a week after their last
visit, my grandmother, my uncle, Patt and I were seated in
the library, chatting over matters and things, when my
uncle suddenly exclaimed
By the way, Hugh, I have a piece of important news to
communicate to you; news affecting your interests to the
tune of fifty thousand dollars.
No more anti-rent dangers, I hope, Roger? said my
grandmother, anxiously.
Hugh has little to apprehend from that source, just now.
The Supreme Court of the United States is his buckler, and
it is broad enough to cover his whole body. As for his
future
leases, if he will take my advice, he will not grant one
for a term longer than five years, and then his tenants will
become clamorous petitioners to the legislature to allow them
to make their own bargains. Shame will probably bring
your free-trade-men round, and the time will come when
your double-distilled friends of liberty will begin to see it is
a very indifferent sort of freedom which will not permit a
wealthy landlord to part with his farms for a long period, or
a poor husbandman to make the best bargain in his power.
No, no; Hugh has nothing serious to apprehend, just now
at least, from that source, whatever may come of it
hereafter
.
The loss to which I allude is much more certain, and
to the tune of fifty thousand dollars, I repeat.
That is a good deal of money for me to lose, sir, I
answered, but little disturbed by the intelligence; and it
might embarrass me to raise so large a sum in a hurry.
Nevertheless, I confess to no very great concern on the
subject, notwithstanding your announcement. I have no
debts, and the title to all I possess is indisputable, unless it
shall be decided that a
royal
grant is not to be tolerated by
republicans.
All very fine, Master Hugh, but you forget that you are
the natural heir of my estate. Patt knows that she is to
have a slice of it when she marries, and I am now about to
make a settlement of just as much more on another young
lady, by way of marriage portion.
Roger! exclaimed my grandmother, you surely do
not mean what you say! Of as much more!
Of precisely that money, my dear mother. I have
taken a fancy to a young lady, and as I cannot marry her
myself, I am determined to make her a good match, so far
as money is concerned, for some one else.
But why not marry her yourself? I asked. Older
men than yourself marry every day.
Ay, widowers, I grant you;
they
will marry until they
are a thousand; but it is not so with us bachelors. Let a
man once get fairly past forty, and it is no easy matter to
bring him to the sacrifice. No, Jack Dunning's being here
is the most fortunate thing in the world, and so I have set
him at work to draw up a settlement on the young lady to
whom I refer, without any rights to her future husband, let
him turn out to be whom he may.
It is Mary Warren! exclaimed my sister, in a tone of
delight.
My uncle smiled, and he tried to look demure; but I
cannot
say that he succeeded particularly well.
It isit isit is Mary Warren, and uncle Ro means to
give her a fortune! added Patt, bounding across the floor
like a young deer, throwing herself into her guardian's lap,
hugging and kissing him, as if she were nothing but a child,
though a fine young woman of nineteen. Yes, it is Mary
Warren, and uncle Hodge is a delightful old gentleman
no, a delightful young gentleman, and were he only thirty
years younger he should have his own heiress for a wife
himself. Good, dear, generous, sensible uncle Ro.This
is so like him, after all his disappointment; for I know,
Hugh, his heart was set on your marrying Henrietta.
And what has my marrying, or not marrying Henrietta,
to do with this settlement of fifty thousand dollars on Miss
Warren? The young ladies are not even connected, I
believe
.
Oh! you know how all such things are managed, said
Patt, blushing and laughing at the passing allusion to
matrimony, even in another; Mary Warren will not be
Mary Warren always.
Who will she be, then? demanded uncle Ro, quickly.
But Patt was too true to the rights and privileges of her
sex to say anything directly that might seem to commit her
friend. She patted her uncle's cheek, therefore, like a saucy
minx as she was, coloured still higher, looked archly at
me, then averted her eyes consciously, as if betraying a
secret
,
and returned to her seat as demurely as if the subject
had been one of the gravest character.
But are you serious in what you have told us, Roger?
asked my grandmother, with more interest than I supposed
the dear old lady would be apt to feel on such a subject.
Is not this settlement a matter of fancy?
True as the gospel, my dear mother.
And is Martha right? Is Mary Warren really the
favoured
young lady?
For a novelty, Patt is right.
Does Mary Warren know of your intention, or has her
father been consulted in the matter?
Both know of it; we had it all over together, last
evening
,
and Mr. Warren
consents
.
To what? I cried, springing to my feet, the emphasis
on the last word being too significant to be overlooked.
To receive Hugh Roger Littlepage, which is my own
name, recollect, for a son-in-law; and what is more, the
young lady `is agreeable.'
We all know that she is more than agreeable, put in
Patt; she is delightful, excellent; agreeable is no word to
apply to Mary Warren.
Pshaw, girl! If you had travelled, now, you would
know that this expression is cockney English for agreeing to
a thing. Mary Warren agrees to become the wife of Hugh
Roger Littlepage, and I settle fifty thousand dollars on her,
in consideration of matrimony.
This Hugh Roger Littlepage, cried Patt, throwing an
arm around my neck; not that Hugh Roger Littlepage.
Do but add that, dearest, dearest uncle, and I will kiss you
for an hour.
Excuse me, my child; a fourth of that time would be
as much as I could reasonably expect. I believe you are
right, however, as I do not remember that
this
Hugh Roger
had any connection with the affair, unless it were to give
his money. I shall deny none of your imputations.
Just as this was said, the door of the library was slowly
opened, and Mary Warren appeared. The moment she
saw who composed our party, she would have drawn back,
but my grandmother kindly bade her come in.
I was afraid of disturbing a family party, ma'am, Mary
timidly answered.
Patt darted forward, threw her arm around Mary's waist,
and drew her into the room, closing and locking the door.
All this was done in a way to attract attention, and as if the
young lady wished to attract attention. We all smiled but
Mary, who seemed half pleased, half frightened.
It
is
a family party, cried Patt, kissing her affianced
sister, and no one else shall be admitted to it, unless good
Mr. Warren come to claim his place. Uncle Ro has told us
all about it, and we know all.
Mary hid her face in Patt's bosom, but it was soon drawn
out by my dear grandmother to kiss it; then my uncle had his
turn, and Patt her's. After this, the whole party, except
Mary and I, slid out of the room, and  yes, and then it
was
my
turn.
We are not yet married, but the day is named. The
same is true with respect to the two wards, and even Patt
blushes, and my grandmother smiles, occasionally, when
gentlemen who are travelling in Egypt just now, are named.
The last letters from young Beekman, they tell me, say that
he was then there. The three marriages are to take place
in St. Andrew's church, Mr. Warren being engaged to
officiate
.
The reader will be surprised to hear two things. My
engagement
with the daughter of a poor clergyman has
produced
great scandal among the anti-renters, they who so
loudly decry aristocracy! The objection is that the match
is not equal! That equality which is the consequence of
social position, connections, education and similarity of
habits, thoughts, and, if you will, prejudices, is all thrown
away on these persons. They have no notion of its
existence
;
but they can very well understand that the owner of
an unencumbered and handsome estate is richer than the
heiress of a poor divine, who can just make the year meet
on $500 per annum. I let them grumble, as I know they
must and will find fault with something connected with
myself
,
until they have got away my land, or are satisfied it is
not to be had. As for Opportunity, I have been assured that
she threatens to sue me for a breach of promise; nor
should I be at all surprised were she actually to make the
attempt. It is by no means unusual, when a person sets his
or her whole soul on a particular object, to imagine
circumstances
favourable to his or her views, which never had an
existence; and Opportunity may fancy that what I have
heard has been the buzzing in her own ear. Then the
quackery of legislatures has set the ladies at work in earnest,
and he will soon be a fortunate youth who can pass through
his days of celibacy without some desperate assault, legal or
moral, from the other sex. Besides, nothing can be out of
the way, when it is found that the more popular and most
numerous branch of the Legislature of New York really
believes it can evade that solemn provision of the
Constitution
of the United States, which says no state shall pass
any law impairing the obligations of contracts, by enacting,
as they can regulate the statute of descent, that whenever a
landlord dies, the tenant, by applying to the chancellor, can
have his leasehold tenure converted into a mortgage, on
discharging
which the land will be his, unencumbered! We
have heard of a thimble-rig administration in England,
and really that industrious nation seems to have exported
the breed to this country. How many of those who voted
for such a law will like to see the ays and noes on the
journals of the assembly ten years hence? If there should
be one such man left in the state, he will be an object of
humane commiseration. We have had many efforts at
legislative chicanery, and some that have been tolerably clever;
but this is a palpable experiment in the same way, made for
a reason that everybody understands, that has not even the
negative merit of ingenuity. Our own courts will probably
disregard it, should the Senate even concur; and as for those
of the United States, they will, out of all doubt, treat it as it
ought to be treated, and brand it with ignominy. The next step
will be to pass a law regulating descents, as it is called,
under
the provisions of which the debtors of the deceased can
meet his obligations with a coin technically called puppies.
Jaaf drivels away. The black occasionally mumbles out
his sentiments concerning past events, and the state of the
country. An anti-renter he regards as he would a thief, and
makes no bones of saying so. Sometimes he blunders on a
very good remark in connection with the subject, and one
he made no later than yesterday, is worthy of notice.
What dem feller want, Masser Hugh? he demanded.
Dey 's got one half of deir farms, and now dey wants
tudder
half. S'pose I own a cow, or a sheep, in par'nership,
what right I got to say I will have him all? Gosh! dere
no sich law in ole time. Den, who ebber see sich poor
Injin
!
Redskin mis'rubble enough, make 'e bess of him, but
dis Injin so mis'rubble dat I doesn't won'er you can't bear
him. Oh! how ole I do gitI
do
t'ink ole Sus can't last
much longer, too!
Old Susquesus still survives, but an object of great hatred
to all the anti-renters, far and near. The `Injin' system has
been broken up, temporarily at least, but the spirit which
brought it into existence survives under the hypocritical
aspect of human rights. The Upright of the
Onondagoes
is insensible of the bad feeling which is so active
against him, nor is it probable that most of those who
entertain
this enmity are conscious of the reason; which is
simply the fact that he is a man who respected laws to the
making of which he was a party, and preferred to suffer
rather than to be guilty of an act of injustice.
Vol. II.  20
NOTE BY THE EDITOR.
Here the manuscript of Mr. Hugh Roger Littlepage, jun.,
terminates. That gentleman's feelings have probably
forbidden
his relating events so recent as those which have
since occurred. It remains, therefore, for us to add a few
words.
Jaaf died about ten days since, railing at the redskins to
the last, and talking about his young massers and missuses
as long as he had breath. As for his own descendants, he
had not been heard to name
them
, for the last forty years.
Susquesus still survives, but the Injins are all defunct.
Public opinion has, at last, struck that tribe out of existence,
and it is hoped that their calico bags have been transmitted
to certain politicians among us, who, as certain as the sun
rises and sets, will find them useful to conceal their own
countenances, when contrition and shame come, as contrition
and shame will be sure to succeed such conduct as theirs.
It may be well to add a word on the subject of the tone
of this book. It is the language of a man who feels that he
has been grievously injured, and who writes with the ardour
of youth increased by the sense of wrong. As editors, we
have nothing more to do with that than to see, while calling
things by their right names, that language too strong for the
public taste should not be introduced into our pages. As to
the moral and political principles connected with this matter,
we are wholly of the side of the Messrs. Littlepages, though
we do not think it necessary to adopt all their phrases
phrases that may be natural to men in their situations, but
which would be out of place, perhaps, in the mouths of those
who act solely in the capacity of essayists and historians.
To conclude:  Mr. Littlepage and Mary Warren were
married, in St. Andrew's church, a very few days since.
We met the young gentleman, on his wedding tour, no later
than yesterday, and he assured us that, provided with such
a companion, he was ready to change his domicile to any
other part of the Union, and that he had selected
Washington
,
for the express purpose of being favourably situated for
trying the validity of the laws of the United States, as
opposed
to the thimble-rigging of the New York
Legislature
.
It is his intention to have every question connected
with the covenants of his leases, that of taxing the landlord
for property on which the tenant has covenanted to pay all
taxes; that of distress for rent, when distress must precede
the re-entry stipulated for by the leases; and that of any
other trick or device which the brains of your small-potato
legislator may invent in order to wrong him out of his
property
.
As for ourselves, we can only say, God give him
success! for we are most deeply impressed that the more
valuable parts of the institutions of this country can be
preserved
only by crushing into the dust this nefarious spirit
of cupidity, which threatens the destruction of all moral
feeling, and every sense of right, that remains among us.
In our view, Oregon, Mexico, and Europe, united against us,
do not threaten this nation with one-half as much real danger
as that which menaces it at this moment, from an enemy
that is now in possession of many of its strong-holds, and
which is incessantly working its evil under the cry of
liberty, while laying deeper the foundation of a most atrocious
tyranny.
I forgot to add, Mr. Littlepage significantly remarked,
at parting, that should Washington fail him, he has the
refuge of Florence open, where he can reside among the
other victims of oppression, with the advantage of being
admired
as a refugee from republican tyranny.
THE END.